LAFITTE:
THE PIRATE OF THE GULF.
BOOK II.
CONTINUED.
CHAPTER XIII.
As no privation is so great as the loss of personal liberty, so no
enjoyment
is so great as its restoration.
President Edwards
.
Count D'Oyley and Constanzaan alarmupon the sea
hope brightens
.
Shortly
after Juana entered the cavern, two
figures, one slight and boyish, the other taller and
stouter, came forth from the cave, passed with a
hasty and suspicious tread by the drunken guard,
whose pistols they secured, and crossed carefully
the plank bridge over which the taller, who was in
female apparel, carefully assisted the lighter, who
wore a cap and pea-jacket.
On gaining the shrouds, the apparent female
passed her arm around the waist of the boy, and
supported his unsteady and unpractised footsteps
down the descent to the deck.
Now dearest Constanza, all your energy and
presence of mind is necessary. There stands the
watch with his head leaning upon the quarter rail,
holding to a stay. He is not wholly intoxicated,
but we must pass him as Juana and Thodore; now
move lightly and firmly.
Va usted a los infirnos! muttered one of the
sleepers, as the count's foot pressed heavily upon
his hand.
Constanza had the presence of mind not to scream,
when the disturbed sleeper turned over upon his
hard bed, and grumblingly fell asleep again.
Who are you, there? Carramba! Is it you Juana?
Por amor de dios! but that agua de vita of yours
JuJuana
my beauty, has made the schoo-schooner,
and the bay, and the land, go rou-round in a merry
reel, he said, slowly and thickly articulatingFa
la r la ra l, la! But who is that Juana? he said,
suddenly stopping in the midst of a drunken
pirouette
.
Oh, I see! Seor Thodore. Your humble
servant; I kiss my hand to you. It is your next
watch Seor Thodore, your watch! Do you take
Seor Thodore? I b-believe I am drunk or getting
sobut it's all owing toto that beauty thereshe
fascinated me master Thodore, she fascinated me.
There sweet Juana, hold up your pretty face, let
me banquet on it. So, gi-give me a small sip more,
one si-sip at that fl-flask; what kills may cure,
yo-you
know, Seor Thodore!
The disguised count handed him the bottle, and
while he was diligently engaged in quaffing its
contents
,
he handed Constanza over the side of the
schooner into the boat, and immediately followed
himself.
Ho! wh-where are you go-going, Juana?oh!
I, I see, to get the clothe-clothes. Well, I'll take
them uptake them up,and as he made an
attempt
to reach over the quarter-railing, he lost his
equilibrium, and staggering backward, fell across
the companion-way, where he lay nearly insensible.
1*
Now, Constanza, dearest, said the count, sit
perfectly still. Are you alarmed? have you all
firmness?
Perfectperfect, Alphonse, she whispered,
I can assist, if you require it.
No no, dearest, brave girl! I shall need only
your mental energies.
Cutting with a cutlass which he had taken from
the deck, the painter, or rope which secured the
boat to the schooner, he cautiously, and without
noise, shoved off from her. Then seizing an
oar, five or six of which besides a mast with a
single sail lay along the thwarts, he wrapped a
portion of the carpet which he severed for the
purpose, around it, and placing it in the rowlock
or cavity fitted for its reception in the stern, gently
as though he plied a glass oar, he turned the head
of the boat, and impelled her, by sculling, across
the basin to the entrance of the rock-bound passage
which communicated with the open sea.
Constanza, with a fluttering pulse but courageous
heart, sat silently by him. Not a word was spoken,
and not a sound was heard around them. Even the
motion of the blade of his oar as it divided the
water
,
was noiseless, and the ripple under the stem
scarcely reached her ear.
They had now entered the passage, and with
more boldness and assurance the count urged
forward
his little bark. Their bosoms began to swell
with hope, as the schooner, the mouth of the cave,
and the tall cliff gradually faded in the distance;
when suddenly, the loud voice of one giving the
alarm as they thought, fell upon their ears with
fearful distinctness, curdling the current of life in
the bosom of the maiden, while a cold thrill passed
over the heart of her lover.
We are missed, said the count incited to
greater exertion, but the chances are on our side.
With a seaman's skill he worked the single oar,
and urged the boat through the water with
increasing
rapidity.
But a single voice had yet been heard by them,
and listening, they recognized the air of a song,
which some oneDiego, as they judged from the
sound of the voice, was singing in a wild air
The winds are fairfar on the main,
The waves are dashing free,
Heave, comrades, heave the anchor in,
The order isTo sea!
Square broad the yards, trim down the sail,
We'll bowl along before the gale!
Heave O! heave O! ye ho!
What life, so stirring, free as ours?
Where'er we list, we roam:
The broad, blue seathis gallant bark
Our heritageour home.
The white surge dashes from our bow,
As fleet and far the waves we plough.
Heave O! heave O! ye ho!
Our bold and daring deeds resound
In many a distant clime;
Minstrels and gray-beard sires shall tell
Our fame in after time
When those who cavil at our sway,
Forgotten, shall have passed away.
Heave O! heave O! ye ho!
Though landsmen frown upon our deeds,
And deem us men of fear,
Bright-eyed signoras bend with smiles
Our bold exploits to hear.
Our life is in their smilesthe brave
They love, but scorn the coward, slave!
Heave O! heave O! ye ho!
We lack not golda princess' dower
Each brave heart may command;
We lack not winewe've vintage rare
From many a sunny land.
No wants have weno cares we know!
We're proud to call the world our foe!
Heave O! heave O! ye ho!
Here's lady's lovebright gold and wine,
Freedom from all control;
Here's dastard's hatehere's all that loves
The free and fearless soul.
Then bring the ruby winefill high,
Drain to the chief your goblets dry.
Heave O! heave O! ye ho!
It is but that drunken watch, he said, as he
listened to the last notes of the song dying away in
the distance, he has recovered from his
momentary
stupor, and is now giving vent to his excitement
in a bacchanalian song. Would to heaven he had
been as much of the animal as the guard. Be not
alarmed dear Constanza, he continued, stooping to
kiss her brow, do not fear; there is no real
danger
;
and he still swayed vigorously to the oar.
But may not Lafitte, who is so rigid in his
exactions
of duty, if he is awakened by this man,
come to learn the cause and discover us?
Heaven
forbid! Holy Maria bless us, and aid us with
thy presence! and she sought her crucifix to press
it to her lips, as she lifted her heart in devotion.
Oh! AlphonseI have lost my crucifix, my
mother's dying gift; she exclaimed, alarmed, my
long cherished medium of communication with
heaven
!
Oh! have you it?
No, dearest, you have probably dropped it.
My sainted mother! it is an augury of evil.
Holy virgin protect me! and tears filled the eyes
of the lovely petitioner, as with locked hands she
gazed upwards.
Calm your feelings, sweetest, he said
cheeringly
,
we shall soon be free. See! they pursue
us not. Listen! the voice of the singer is scarcely
heard; and look about you! we are just at the
mouth of the passage with the open sea before us,
and Port au Prince but a few leagues to leeward.
Courage my brave Constanza, he added
encouragingly
.
Now we are out of the passI feel
the sea breeze already upon my cheek. See how
it is playing with your hair. No, do not fear; do
you see that bright burning star, deep set in the
heavens, directly above us? That star, my love, I
have always regarded as the star of my destiny
whenever that is in the ascendant I am successful.
Be happy, for with that eye of light open above us,
we have nothing to fear.
Feel the wind! how refreshing it comes from
the sea! Now Constanza we will hoist our sail;
and the gull shall not skim the water with a
swifter wing than our little bark.
He raised the mast, and hoisted the little latteen
sail, which swelling and distending as it caught the
breeze, instantly depressed the boat down to one
side, and impelled her rapidly over the water.
Under
the influence of this new agent, it sprung
lightly forward, skipping from wave to wave and
dashing their broken crests from her bows.
The count who had taken his seat by the side of
Constanza now that the boat was urged forward by
the wind was congratulating her upon their escape.
She silently pressed his hand, and kept her eyes
fixed steadily on the shore.
Did you see that light? she said, suddenly
clinging
to his arm.
The count, who was intent upon his duty of
governing
the boat, whose head he turned towards the
entrance of St. Marc's channel in the direction of
Port au Prince, where he expected to find his
frigate
,
turned and saw the edge of the moon just
appearing
above the distant cliff and broken into
apparent
flame by the woods over which it was rising.
No no, sweetest, it is the moon; a second
augury
for good. It smiles upon our departure. See
now, as she ascends the skies, how she flings her
silvery scarf out upon the waters.
No no, not that, it was a flash. Hark! did you
hear that? she exclaimed, as the heavy report of a
gun came booming over the sea.
It is indeed a gun, and fired from the schooner;
but be not alarmed, they can hardly reach us.
Hark! what whizzing, rushing sound is that
over our heads?
A bird, merely, said the count quietly; and then
added to himself, That shot was well aimed.
Courage my dearest, this beautiful boat was built
for sailing. If this wind holds, we shall make Cape
St. Marc by sunrise, and then if we are pursued,
which I doubt, we can run into the townbut if
not, we will continue on to Port au Prince, which
is but fifteen leagues farther. Ah! there is another
flash.
A few seconds after he spoke, the report of a
second gun came sharply from the shore.
Courage, Constanza! they cannot reach us now.
That too was shotted, he added. If they have
discovered our escape, Constanza, dearest, they are
firing at some object which they think is our boat.
It will require time to take them off and put them
on the right track. Blow bravely winds! Are you
confident, dearest? he asked, pressing her to his
heart; there is now no longer cause for fear.
Yes, now I begin to hope we may yet escape.
Heaven, I thank thee! and she looked devoutly
upward, the mellow moonlight falling upon her fair
forehead, and adding a richer gloss to her dark hair.
In that attitude something fell from her bosom, and
rung as it struck the bottom of the boat.
There is your crucifix, sweet Constanza, he
said, bending to pick it upWhat! no, a dagger!
What means this?
My last hope on earth, if yon outlaw had
retaken
us, she answered, with firmness and emotion.
God forbid! Constanza;noble spirited
woman
!
he exclaimed, embracing her.
Morning found the lovers in sight of the town
of St. Marc. At the first moment of dawn the
count eagerly searched the horizon for an indication
of being pursued, and just as the sun lifted his disc
above the inland mountains, his beams fell upon a
white spot many leagues to the northward, and on
the verge of the sky and sea.
Pointing out to her the pleasant town of St. Marc
at the head of the bay of the same name, he
suggested
to Constanza the expediency of continuing
their course to the port of their original destination;
as the sail which he saw in the distance, even if in
pursuit, was too far off to overtake them. To this
she acquiesced with buoyant spirits.
Before a steady wind, they now held on their way
along the romantic and cultivated shores of the
channeltheir bosoms elated with the hope of soon
terminating their varied and trying adventures.
CHAPTER XIV.
Lesio
.Hast heard the news, Vesca?
Vesca
.What news?
L.The Pole's escaped, and carried with him my master's
daughter
.
V.The Saints! you jest, Lesio!
L.'Tis true as the cross. My master has ta'en horse and half a
score of followers and spurred in pursuit.
V.Heaven grant he catch them not.
L.Amen!
An alarmdiscoveryresultpursuit
.
We
will now return to Lafitte, whom we left
lying in troubled sleep on one of the rude benches
in the cave upon which he had thrown himself, after
having, with a severe struggle between his passions
and desire to act honourably towards his fair
captive
,
decided upon giving her and her lover their
freedom, and convey them to Port au Prince in the
morning. His sleep though deep, was still tortured
with dreams.
A fourth time he dreamed. He was upon the
deck of his vessel, contending hand to hand with an
officer. At length he disarmed him, and passed his
cutlass through his breast, from which the blood
flowed as he drew out the steel. He uttered a cry
of horror! It was the bosom of Constanza! A loud
voice rung in his ears, which sounded like a chorus
of triumph at the fatal deed. He sprung to his feet,
and the cry To armsto arms! rung loudly
in his ears.
To arms, seor, shouted his lieutenanta
boat is in the passagewe may be surprised!
The outlaw, shouting to the men who slept
about him to arm and follow, hastened to the
terrace, where two or three of the buccaneers had
collected.
Awake the crew in the schooner, he shouted.
Where is the guard? Ho! there! Ho! the guard!
where is he? he sternly demanded.
His commands, issued in the cavern, had been
followed by a hasty and simultaneous rising of
the sleeping crew, who had not heard the alarm
given by Thodore, who, leaving a recess within
the cavern where he slept, had gone forth to stand
his watch, when the boat of the fugitives in the
passage caught his quick eye, and he instantly
flew to communicate his discovery to Lafitte.
There was now a bustle of preparation on board
the schooner, when Lafitte gave orders to the crew
to ascend to the platform and defend it. Having
lost so many men in the severe fight of the previous
night, he did not wish to expose the lives of his men
needlessly.
Up! who is that lagger there? he demanded,
as the form of the guard lying on the quarter-deck
caught his eye.
It is Diego, seorhe is dead, or dead drunk,
replied one of the men.
Drunk? Throw him down the hatches, and
leave him to the knives of the enemy, if there be
any.
Thodore, how do you make that boat? you
said you saw her in the passage; he inquired,
turning quickly to the youth: I can see nothing.
Look sir! there! just beyond the farthest rock
Vol. II.2
see! she has a sail, which I did not before
discover
she
must have set it since.
That boat is not approaching, replied Lafitte,
after looking for a moment in the direction indicated
by Thodore, she is outside, and standing to the
south. What can it mean?
Whoever it is, seor, they seem to have been
ashore on mischief! said one of the crew. Here
is Gil also drunk or dead.
The pirate turned as he spoke, and saw the body
of the guard, insensible where he had fallen.
Ho! a light here. He is warm, he said,
placing
his hand upon him. Faugh! he breathes like
a distillery. Up, brute, up! he cried fiercely; but
the drunkard remained immoveable. With an
execration
,
the chief raised him from the ground with
an iron grasp upon his throat, and hurled him over
the precipice into the sea.
Say you the watch is drunk too? he inquired,
as the waters closed over the body of his victim.
Yes sir, as dead as the guard; replied the man
whom he addressed.
By the holy cross! I would like to know what
this means! he shouted.
Diable! Now I think, seor, said one of the
men; somebody stepped on my hand while I was
asleep, and I afterward dreamed of hearing a boat
leave the schooner.
Fool! dolt! dreaming idiot! there may have
been good cause for your dreamyou deserve to
be swung from the yard arm, he said, striking the
man with the hilt of his cutlass. But why do I
dallylight that matchdepress that piece
Theodore
,
if you see the boat.
Yes, seor! replied the youth in a voice which
had lost its former animation. He now began to
suspect whom the boat contained, having, as the
man spoke of his dreams, cast his eyes over the
terrace and discovered that the schooner's boat was
gone. Obeying the command of his chief, he
levelled
the gun high over the true mark which was
now visible as the white sail of the boat gleamed in
the rising moonwhile his bosom beat with
apprehension
lest his good intention should be
unsuccessful
.
The chief seized the match and fired the piece,
the report of which reverberated among the cliffs,
and died away like distant thunder along the
caverned
shores of the bay.
A useless shotthey still move on, he
exclaimed
.
See! the white sail glances in the
moonlight. Do better than that. The gun was
eagerly depressed and fired by Lafitte himself, with
no better result, and in a few moments the object of
their attention and alarm, was entirely invisible in
the haze and darkness of the sea.
I would give my right hand to know what this
means! said the pirate musingly.
The schooner's boat is gone sir! said one of
the men hastily.
Gone! he exclaimed, springing to the verge of
the terraceGone indeed! hell and devils! it is
so! he shouted, as apparently a new thought flashed
across his mind. That light here! and seizing
a lamp from one of his men, he rushed through the
long passage into the inner cavern with rapidity,
and entered the chamber recently occupied by his
prisoners.
It was silent and deserted. He looked into every
recesssprung through the breach into the
opposite
room, and called upon their names, yet the
echoes of his own voice and footsteps only replied.
Again he traversed the apartments, scaled the walls
and searched every niche and corner of the room,
before he was thoroughly convinced of the flight of
his captives. Then he dashed the lamp upon the
pavement, and muttered between his clenched teeth
deep execrations.
For several minutes he paced the cavern like a
madman; gradually he became calmer and spoke:
They have escaped me then! she whom I
worshipped has doubted my faithno! no! he
added quickly, she has not; it was he
he!
I
will pay him back this deed. Curse, curse the
fates that are ever crossing me! Here I have been
humbling my passion to hisschooling my mind to
virtuous resolves, for the happiness of this woman
who despises me. For the bliss of this titled fool
who doubts my word, I have let slip the fairest
prize that ever fell into the possession of man. But
the charm is brokennow will I win her! There
are now no terms between him and me. I will
pursue him to the death, and her I will win and
wear. She shall yet become the bride of the
detested
outlaw.
Ho! he shouted, without having formed any
decisive plan to pursue with regard to the fugitives
Cast off and make sail on the schoonerspring!
we must overhaul that boat. Lively! men, lively!
he added, as hastily issuing from the cavern, he
energetically
repeated his orders for immediately
getting
under weigh.
The morning sun shone upon the sails of the
pirate's
schooner, many leagues from the point of her
departure, crowding all sail and standing towards
the south and east as the most probable course taken
by those of whom Lafitte was in pursuit.
The outlaw was upon the deck which he had
not quitted since the schooner left the basin, his
eager
eye scanning the faint lines of the horizon.
Do you see nothing yet, Thodore? he
inquired
of his young protege, whom he had sent aloft
See you nothing?
No, seor, the sun is just lifting the haze from
the wateryou can see better from the deck.
Sail ahead! shouted a man on the
forecastle
.
I see it, cried Thodore, as the haze rises
it is ahead, just off St. Marc's town. If it is the
boat we seek it is useless to pursue it, as it has at
least two leagues the start of us, and unless we take
her out from under the guns of the town we must
give her up.
If it were from under the guns of the Moro, I
would take her out, exclaimed the buccaneer chief.
Set the fore top mast studding sailwe will
yet reach them before they get under the land, he
added, bringing his spy-glass to his eye.
It is the boat! he exclaimed joyfully after a
moment's scrutiny; I would know my little gig as
far as I could see her. It is the fugitives! they
have hauled their wind and are passing the port no
doubt for Port au Prince.
Now favour me, hell or heaven, and I will yet
have my revenge! he added through his shut teeth;
and under additional sail the pirate dashed on after
the boat of the fugitives.
Thodore descended to the deck after the
discovery
of the boat, with a thoughtful brow and a
gravity
unusual to his years and to the individual, who
was naturally gay and light hearted, while a vein of
delicacy, high moral sentiments, and an honourable
feeling in spite of his education formed the basis of
his character. Perhaps, howeveralthough
gratitude
in every shape should be a virtue; perhaps, it
was shaded by a grateful attachment to his
benefactor
which influenced him to do that against which
his heart and judgment revolted. Sometimes he
had modified his obedience to the instructions of his
friend and chief, and occasionally he had dissuaded
2*
him from insisting upon the act, or when this was
impossible to appoint some other agent. Whenever
he thought his own presence would diminish the
amount of human suffering, he would often with the
hope of doing good when evil was intended,
overcome
his own repngnance, and himself voluntarily
become the agent of the outlaw.
Knowing the character of his proteg, and
desiring
when he parted from Constanza to render her
situation as comfortable as circumstances would
admit
of, Lafitte had appointed his young friend to
the pleasing and congenial duty of protecting her to
Kingston. How he executed this task is well
known.
In the fair Castillian he had taken a deep and
lively interest; and her helpless situation, her
extreme
beauty and gentleness had captivated him
and made him, if not her lover, her enthusiastic
devotee
.
Her image was ever present in the waking
hours of the romantic youth, and he could never
picture a paradise without filling it with angels
whose bright faces were only some beautiful
modification
of that of the Spanish maiden.
When the shipwreck of the brig again threw her
into the power of Lafitte, knowing his impulsive
character, Thodore trembled for her happiness.
In the silence of his own bosom he had sworn that
he would protect her from insult, even to the
shedding
of the blood of his benefactor. When he
discovered
the absence of the boat and her escape, his
heart leaped with joy, and the darkness of the night
alone kept him from betraying his emotion upon his
tell-tale features.
Appearing to second Lafitte's anxiety to overtake
them, he did all in his power to retard the
preparations
for commencing the pursuit. During the dark
hours of the morning as he leaned over the
quarter-rail
watching with a trembling heart the indistinct
horizon, fearing to look lest he should discover the
boat, yet by a kind of fascination constantly keeping
his eyes wandering over the water, his thoughts
were busy in devising means to prevent the
recapture
of the lovers.
CHAPTER XV.
No man, however abandoned, has utterly lost that heavenly spark
by which he participates in the Divine Nature.
If charity rather than censure, governed our intercourse with the
depraved, we might kindle this spark into a fire that should purify the
whole man, instead of mercilessly quenching the smoking flax and
breaking the bruised reed.
Newton
.
Lafitte and Theodorepersuasiona victorychange of
purpose
.
When
morning showed clearly the object of
their pursuit, the cry of the sailor, which made the
blood of Lafitte leap, sent the life-current of the
youth's veins back to his heart chilled and dead.
What means that sad countenance, my young
child of the sea? inquired Lafitte, playfully, as, in
pacing with an elastic step, fore and aft the
quarter-deck
,
he stopped and tapped lightly the shoulder
of the boy who was leaning thoughtfully against
the rigging, gazing upon the glimmering sail of the
boat diminished in the distance to a mere sparkle
upon the water.
Want of sleep has paled you, Thodore. Go
below and turn in, and when the watch is next called
you shall once more become fair lady's page. Ha!
your blood mounts quickly to your cheek! Nay,
never be ashamed to be esquire of dames. It is the
best school of gallantry for a spirited youth! Silent,
sir page? and pale again!but I crave your
pardon
,
my boy, I meant not to jest with you, he
added
as the youth's emotion although from a different
cause than he imagined, visibly increased.
You do not jest with me, seor, my more than
parent; but there is something weighs heavily upon
my spirits. I cannot throw it off! he replied in a
serious and impressive tone of voice.
What is it, Thodore? tell me freely. It
must indeed be heavy to chill you thus; you are not
wont to give room to sadness without causea deep
cause must there be for this. Tell me freely what
so saddens your spirit, you have never yet asked
favour of me in vain. Surrounded as I am by men
who fear, but love me not, there is happiness in
feeling that there is one whose attachment for me
is sincere.
You have been a greater source of happiness to
me since first I took you from amidst the ocean
than words can express. Till then my heart was
like a wild vine running riot upon the dank earth;
but you, my child, have caught up at least one
tendril
,
and so trained, nourished and twined it about
your heart, unpromising as it may have seemed, it
bears some fruit of human affection.
It tells too what the whole vine might have
become. he continued sadly, had it not been
trampled upon and laid waste by him who should
have cherished it, instead of being sought out and
nurtured by the hand of affection. To all but you
I am cast out as a loathsome and poisonous weed;
and if I did not know that one human breast knew
me better, I should be, if you can believe it, a much
worse man than I am. It is this little tendril your
love has nurtured which binds me to my species
which makes me not forget that I am a man!
There is one other breast that does you equal
justice, seor? said the boy inquiringly and with
embarrassment, as the outlaw turned away and
walked the deck in silence.
One other! whatwhose? none but the
all-seeing
Virgin, who knows me by my heart, and not
by my actions, as men know me. It is the will, not
the deed, boy, which makes the guilt.
Father Arnaud whom you sent for to Havana
to confess the men, says differently, remarked
Thodore.
No matter what he said, replied the chief
hastily
.
The father was bigoted, and loved his wine
too well for his doctrine, to be seasoned with the
right spirit. It is the will
Ha! we gain on the boat rapidly, he said
interrupting
himself, and looking out forward, and
then continued:
It is the will, that stamps the guilt or innocence
of an action. If I, waking suddenly from a dream
discharge a pistol at the phantom which scared me,
and pierce your heart, I am absolved by heaven of
murder. I had not the will to slay you;there is
no guilt involved in the act. But if I resolve to kill
you and place the dagger in my slave's hand, and
he strikes home the blow which releases your soul,
then I am guilty, though my hand struck not the
blow. No, no! he added with energy, I am not
so guilty before heaven as I seem. God is
merciful
.
I would rather He and all heaven should read
my heart than manman! guiltiest of all, yet the
most unforgiving of guilt; and his lip writhed with
a scornful smile as he spoke.
But, seor, inquired his companion, his mind
diverted from his anxiety for the fugitives by the
language of his friendyou have been engaged
in scenes of strife and carnage; was not the blow
the agent of the will at such times?
Not alwaysno! he replied, after a moment's
reflection, apparently appealing to memorywith
but two exceptions have I voluntarily and
deliberately
spilled human life; for these I am
accountable
.
May God in his mercy, assoilzie me for them!
But am I accountable, strictly, for impulses which
are beyond my controlwhich are not truly my
own acts? Seldom have I done deeds of violence,
where I did not regret the fatality which impelled
me to do themrevolting at the act, of which at the
same time I felt the necessity.
Then you resolve all actions into one single
causeirresistible fatedividing them into three
kindsaccidental, impulsive, deliberative. But
shall we not change the subject sir? he added
abruptly
,
as he thought of the fugitives.
There is one, who regards you with the same
feelings I do; she
She? Whom mean you? No, you do not mean
her!
I mean the Castillian.
Say you so, Thodore? he said, grasping his
arm. You have been much with her. Do you
know her heart? and he looked steadily and
eagerly
into his face.
It is not of her heart I speak, seor, but of her
expressed opinions. The pirate's brow changed,
but he listened in silence. I have heard your
name frequently upon her lips, and never as the
world uses it. She spoke of you with interest.
Ha!
The interest she would feel for a brother; he
continued, without noticing the interruption. She
asked me of your character, the tone of your mind,
and indeed all I knew of you.
And how did you speak of me to her? he
inquired
eagerly.
As I can only speak of my benefactor, he said
taking and warmly pressing his hand; As I, and
no one else know you.
Thank you, thank you, Thodore; he said,
moved at the generous sincerity of the boy. And
what said she further?
She alluded to her captureto her interview
with you; and she spoke of and enlarged upon your
generous nature; she said she could never cease to
remember you with kindness, and that next to the
stranger count, you shared a place in her heart.
Said she so much? he exclaimed, his eye
lighting with hope. Prosper me Heaven! and she
may yet, voluntarily be mine!
But the Count D'Oyley, sir! said Thodore
with emphasis.
Abruptly changing his tone and manner, which
were softened by his conversation with his young
friend he exclaimed almost fiercely
And what of him? Has he not outraged me?
has he not stolen off, when my plighted word that
he should have safe conduct to Port au Prince was
yet warm upon his ear? what shall bind me to
terms of courtesy to him? We gain upon them
bravely; he added eagerly, as he turned in his
walk, and looked steadily ahead. I almost fancy
I can see the mantilla of the maiden floating in
the breeze.
And what is your purpose with the lady sir, if
we recapture her? inquired the youth with
firmness
and respect.
Lafitte started at this abrupt question, and his
face flushed and paled again before he spoke.
Purpose? purpose? purpose sure enough! he
slowly articulated.
Seor, you would not do the sweet lady harm?
Harm! what mean you sir? he said, turning
fiercely upon the boy and grasping his cutlass hilt.
Forgive me seor! but rather than so gentle a
creature should come to harm, I would be willing
he continued, mildly and firmly, to pour out my
heart's best blood.
Do you dare me to my face, Thodore? do
you presume upon my affection, to use such
language
?
Know you that where deep love has been
planted, hate takes deeper root. Boyboy,
below
!
and his anger rising with his words, he struck
the youth violently upon the breast. He reeled
against the main-mast, but recovering himself, with
a face in which resentment and wounded feelings
struggled forcibly, he silently descended to the
cabin.
His captain paced the deck alone for awhile, with
agitation in his step and manner, and then hastily
followed him.
Thodore, my son, my brother, forgive me that
blow! It was an angry one, and I would atone for
it. Oh! if you knew how I have been punished for
a blow like that given in a moment of passion in
early life, you would forgive and pity me.
The youth rose from the table, where he sat with
his head leaning upon his hand, and threw himself
into the arms of his benefactor.
Forgive you! It is all forgiven. Ungrateful
should I be to let this cancel all I owe you, my
more than parent. I spoke warmly for the lady,
for I feel much for herso gentle! so lovely! and
then her whole soul wrapped up in her lover. Oh!
if you could see how their hearts are bound up in
one anotherhow pure and deep their lovehow
fondly she doats on him; you wouldI am sure
you would, like me, be willing to sacrifice even
your life to make them happy. For my sake, he
continued warmly, if you regard mefor her sake,
if you love her, pursue them no farther. Seek not
to capture them. Oh! let them go free, let them
be happy and their prayers will be for you; your
Vol. II.3
name will be graven upon their hearts for ever, in
letters of gratitude. What is your purpose, if you
take them? It is true, they are almost in your
power; but let them go in peace. Stain not your
heart and hand with innocent blood, and far deeper
moral guilt. Let there be no more marks of crime
upon your brow; for oh! my benefactor, you
cannot
possess her even as your wife without dark and
dreadful crime! Observing that Lafitte remained
silent and moved by his appeal, the noble and
youthful
advocate for innocence and love continued;
You love her deeply,intensely. I know it is
an honourable love you cherish. Let her still be
free, and such it will be always, and your soul
sinless
of the crime I fear you meditate. But take
her once more captive, and you debase her to the
earth either as a bride or mistress. Your love will
turn to disgust; and hatred instead of gratitude
which now reigns there, will fill her breast for the
slayer of her lover, the violator, even with the
sanction
of the Holy Church, of her honor, and plighted
troth.Nay sir! please listen to meit is for your
honor, from love to you, my best benefactor, I speak
so freely. Do you not remember, just before
Constanza
left your vessel, I remarked how cheerfully
you smiled, and what a calmness dwelt upon your
brow, and how consciousness of doing right and
governing your own impulses, elevated and
ennobled
the expression of your features?
I do, Thodore.
And were you not then happyhappier than
you had been beforehappier than you have been
to-day?
I wasI was!
Was it not the victory over yourself, and the
resolutions which on bended knee you made to the
lady, that henceforward your course should be one
that she would feel proud to markOh! was it not
the calm confidence of rectitude, when you let the
maiden go free, and the resolution to win an
honourable
name which thus restored peace to your
bosom
and composure to your brow, and ennobled
you in your own mind with sentiments of
self-respect
?
It wasit was, my Thodore.
And were you not very happy; and did you not
feel better satisfied with yourself than ever in your
life before, when your eye dwelt upon the faint speck
indicating the fast disappearing vessel which
contained
the being who had called up these holy and
honourable feelings?
Thodore, I did my boy!
Oh! then why will you throw away this cup of
happiness, when it is once more offered to your
lips? why will not my excellent benefactor create
for himself again, this happiness? he said, taking
the passive hand of his friend and chief, and looking
up with an entreating smile in his face.
I will Thodore, I will! you have conquered!
exclaimed Lafitte, touched by the passionate and
affectionate appeal of his ardent young friend; and
yielding to his better feelings, he said, after a few
moments' affecting silence. Thodore, you have
conqueredgo to the deck and give what orders
you will.
Yet, for Constanza I will live; for her sake,
he said mentally as the happy boy disappeared up
the companion-wayI will become an honourable
man. Oh! that some good angel would help me
to do what I wish to do, but have not the power!
Bright spirit of my departed mother! he said
looking
upward calmly and thoughtfully, if there is a
communication between saints and men, give me
thy assistance; temper my passions, allure me to
virtue, make me to abhor my present mode of
existence
and refrain evermore from dying my hand
in guilt. To thee, I offer my broken and subdued
spirit; I am in thy hand, take me and mould me
as thou wilt!
Sail ho! shouted the lookout from the
foretop-mast
head. The cry was again repeated by the
officer of the deck at the entrance of the
companion-way
,
before the pirate moved from his
statue-like
attitude.
Where away, Thodore? he quietly asked, as
he slowly ascended to the deck.
Off the starboard quarter, sir. I have put the
schooner about? he said inquiringly to his captain,
looking with sympathy into his pale face.
It is well, Thodore!
The stranger, sir, is in a line with the boat. If
he should be one of our cruisers
True boy, true; we must watch over their
safety. Alter her course again, we must see that
they come not to harm.
In a few minutes the schooner was once more
under sail, standing for the boat which was now
about five miles ahead.
What do you make her? he hailed to the man
aloft.
I can't see her very distinctly now sir, she is
almost in the sun's wake. There! now I make her
out sira large vessel, and very square-rigged. I
think she must be a man of war. I can't make her
hull yet, she's down, to her fore-yard, under the
horizon
.
We must look out, and not run into the lion's
den; said Lafitte; there is a stir I see among
the craft in the bay of St. Marc, as though they
suspected the wolf was abroad, he continued with
a saddened smile. Stir up the crew, Ricardo.
Aye, aye, sir. Forward there all! Be ready to
tack ship, shouted Ricardo. To your posts
men. A momentary bustle ensued, and dispersed
in different parts of the vessel, the crew remained
silently awaiting the next command of their officer.
The stranger gradually rose above the horizon,
and showed the majestic proportions of a large
frigate
,
standing close-hauled on the wind out of St.
Marc's channel. The boat containing the lovers,
was now within a mile of the ship of war.
That is the French frigate seor, that passed us
the night we came out of the devil's punch bowl,
said Ricardo. See, she has the French ensign
flying at her peak.
Ha! it must then be the Count D'Oyley's
frigate
,
said Lafitte. So we shall in our turn, have
to play the fugitive.
No, seor, said Thodore, he will not
pursue
us; but were it not as well to put about. See,
the boat steers for her.
After watching with his glass for a long time, and
with much interest, Lafitte saw her run along side
of the stranger, who lay too and took the lovers on
board.
He then laid down the spy-glass, and giving in a
calm and measured tone, his orders to put about and
stand for Barritaria, with a melancholy expression
upon his fine features, he descended into his
state-room
,
leaving the command of the vessel for the
remainder
of the day, to his lieutenant.
BOOK III.
BARRITARIA.
Came you here to insult us, or remain
As spy upon us, or as hostage for us?
The two Foscari
.
And now he stood upon the dazzling height
For which he long had laboured.
The Conqueror
.
wealth, such as
The state accords her worthiest servants; nay,
Nobility itself I guaranty thee.
Marino Faliero
.
BOOK III.
CHAPTER I.
It was a rational conjecture that, on account of the difficulty of
ascending the Mississippi river, the British would seek a passage
through the pass of Barritaria. It was also feared they would form an
alliance with the Barritarian chief, to promote their object, as he was
perfectly acquainted with every inlet and entrance to the gulf, through
which a passage could be effected.
History of the war
.
Barritariathe chief and his adherentsa strange sail
a chase
.
The
third part, or natural division, of our tale,
opens in that portion of Louisiana, described in the
historical sketch of the Barritarians commencing
the second book, to which we refer the reader, and
six days later than the period with which we closed
that book.
On the seventh morning after the scenes and events
just related, nearly the whole of the fleet, consisting
of thirteen vessels, over which Lafitte held
command
,
composed principally of brigantines,
polaccas
,
small schooners of that peculiar class known
then, and now, as the Baltimore Clipper, two or
three gun boats and feluccas, besides many small
boats with and without masts, were anchored in the
little harbour behind the island, and under cover of
the guns of the strong hold of the smugglers,
crowning
the western extremity of the island of Grand
Terre.
Between these vessels and the smooth beach,
boats were constantly passing and repassing, whilst
the wild air of some popular French or Spanish song
the loud laugh of reckless merriment, or bandied
jokes, mingled with strange and fierce oaths, floated
over the water to the shore with wonderful
distinctness
in the clear morning air.
On the southern or opposite side of the island,
upon a gentle eminence commanding a prospect of
the sea to the southwhile over the intercepting
trees was an uninterrupted and distant view of the
masts of the anchored fleetin various natural
attitudes
,
was congregated a group apparently deeply
engaged in watching the movements of two vessels
standing towards the island.
The shape and number of sails of the
approaching
objects which engrossed the attention of the
observers
,
indicated vessels of small and equal
burden
;
apparently sailing side by side, and making,
with all their canvass spread, for the western pass.
As they lessened their distance from the island,
and their low hulls rose above the sphericity of the
sea, the interest of the spectators became more
intense
.
Suddenly a little triangular flag was run
up to the peak of one of the vessels nearest the
entrance
to the lake, and at the same instant a light
cloud of blue smoke shot suddenly from the side of
the more distant vessel, and curled upwards,
wreathing
over her tall masts. This was followed by the
sharp report, deadened by the distance, of a shotted
gun.
The knoll upon which this party were assembled,
consisted of a grassy swell, dotted here and there by
a magnificent live oak, and terminating abruptly
several feet above the sea in a perpendicular
precipice
of earth, formed by the encroachment of the
waves, combined with the heavy rains characteristic
of that climate, acting upon the loose and impalpable
soil of those alluvial regions. Under a large and
venerable tree, which, growing near the precipice,
hung partly over it, casting a deep shadow not only
upon the summit of the cliff, but upon the beach
beneath, lay buried in deep sleep, like one who had
kept long vigils the preceding night, the athletic
form of the chief of the buccaneers, whose dress
and appearance we will employ the time occupied
by the vessels in gaining the island, to describe.
With a cheek browned by southern suns, his
manly features gave no indication of that age
which a silvery hair sprinkled here and there among
his raven locks, betrayed. An ample, dark, gray
roquelaure faced with black silken velvet, lay
out-spread
by the foot of the tree, serving him both for
a couch and protection from the dampness of the
morning, which the up-risen sun was rapidly
dissipating
before his warm and enlivening beams. One
arm grasping a richly inlaid belt pistol in its
conscious
fingers was bent under his head, constituting
the sleeper's only pillow, while the other was buried
in his bosom. The blue collar of his seaman's
shirt was turned back from his throat and neck,
exposing
them to the refreshing breeze of the sea, and
displaying a depth and strength of chest, as
uncommon
in this day of physical degeneracy, as it was
the birth-right of the men of a sterner age.
Encircling his waist, was a gorgeous belt of
wampun
the
gift of a Mexican Indian chief, as a token
of his gratitude to him for preserving from violation
his only child. In it glistened the handle of a dirk,
and the curled heads of a brace of serviceable
pistols
.
A black velvet jacket, a slouched sombrero, and
a pair of full, long pantaloons ornamented with
numerous
bell-buttons, pendant from the eye by little
chains, ringing with a clear tinkling sound at every
tread of the wearer, with low wrinkled boots,
peculiar
to that period, completed the dress, and with the
addition of a sheathed sabre mounted with costly
jewels, lying by his side and within reach of his
disengaged
hand, also the arms, of the handsome and
athletic sleeper.
At his feet, and comfortably stretched upon the
cloak of his master, apparently dozing, but with
eyes of watchfulness and intelligence that took
notice
of every surrounding circumstance, lay a noble
dog, of that dignified and sagacious species,
originally
derived from the island of Newfoundland.
Scarcely, however, and with strong struggles of self
denial, did the faithful animal, with philosophy
worthy
of a stoic, resist repeated temptations to quit his
post from time to time, presented him in the shape of
certain comestibles, by a third individual of the party.
Dat dog Lon, love stretch de lazy bone on
massa cloak, more dan eat. Here, you wooly
nigger
,
Lon, come get dis nice turkey wing for you
breakuss.
Lon occasionally raised his eyes, and looked
wistfully upon the tempting morcel, then casting
them upon his master, reprovingly and negatively
shook his head.
Upon a rude hearth, not far from the sleeper,
burned a bright wood fire, over which, suspended
upon a crane resting upon two upright crotchets,
hung a large iron pot, the black cover of which was
constantly dancing above the boiling water, which,
with certain culinary instruments and preparations
around, gave sign of an intention to break, by a
substantial
meal, the fast of the night.
Into this vessel, Cudjoe, as he progressed in
dissecting
a wild turkey, tossed, as he sawed them
from the body, the severed portions, with which
however, before consigning it to the boiling
receptacle
,
he would provokingly tempt his fellow
servant
,
the philosophical Lon, from his duty.
Cudjoe, this mischievous leader into temptation,
whom we have before passingly introduced to the
reader, was a young slave about four feet high, with
a glossy black skin, ivory white teeth, two of which,
flanking his capacious jaws, projected outwards, with
the dignity of the embryo tusks of a young elephant.
His lips were of ample dimensions, and of the
brightest vermillion, the lower one hanging down,
and resting familiarly upon his short, retreating chin.
His nose, which surmounted, or rather stood in the
rear of these formidable appendages to his mouth,
was of vast dimensions, terminating in a magnificent
expansion of the nostril, and threatening to encroach
upon the province of his ears, which hung down in
enormous lappels, as if welcoming the expected
proximity.
His eyes were small, restless, and almost
deficient
in that generous display of white,
characteristic
of his race. One of these organs, he kept at
all times hermetrically sealed, while the other
enjoyed
that obliquity of vision, which rendered it
difficult
for the beholder to decide certainly as to the
particular point their owner was directing his visual
orb.
His neck, short, thick, and bull-like, was set into
broad shoulders, from which depended long arms
hanging by his side like those of the ourang-outang.
and terminating in short stunted fingers, of which
useful ornaments two and a half were wanting.
His feet were broad and flat, of equal longitude
either
way from the base of his short legs, which
were placed exactly in their centre; so that he
seemed to enjoy the enviable facility of progressing
in opposite directions without the trouble of turning
his body.
His forehead, lined with innumerable fine
wrinkles
,
was very high and round, down to the centre of
which the reddish wool curled barrenly to a point,
displaying a physiognomical feature, which was the
mere mockery of that intellect it indicated. His voice
or rather his voices, for nature charitably making up
his deficiencies, had bestowed two upon him, in
ordinary conversation was sharp and wirey, and
pitched upon a shrill, discordant key; but when he
sung, as he often did, the soft airs of his tribe for the
amusement of his master, the melody of a syren
seemed floating around the enraptured listener.
His natural disposition was gentle and
affectionate
;
but when roused to revenge, he was more
terrible
than the uncaged hyena. Gratitude to his
master, who captured him from a slaver, and
subsequently
saved him from an imminent and revolting
death, had bound him to him with a faithfulness and
attachment nothing could diminish, and death only
terminate; while the shrewdness, activity and
animal
courage of the young and deformed African,
rendered him a useful and necessary appendage to
the person of his master.
The fourth and last figure in the group was a
supernatural and decrepid old man, with a noble,
yet attenuated profile, doubled with age and
infirmity
,
with a sunken and watery eye, haggard
features
,
a long, neglected, gray beard, and a few
straggling
silver hairs blowing about his aged temples.
He was clothed in coarse and squallid garments,
which he confined to his form with one hand, whilst
the other sustained a bundle of dry fuel that he had
just gathered on the skirts of the forest. From time
to time, the old man would add a stick to the fire,
and kneeling down blow feebly the expiring flames,
while at intervals, he muttered indistinctly with that
unconscious manner, characteristic of second
childhood
.
Vol. II.4
But the aged menial, was not only afflicted with
imbecile dotage, but the rays of intellect were faint
and flickering in his shattered brain. The light of
mind was extinguished in mental night. The
cistern
was broken at the fountain. Who may read
the dark page of that old man's life and trace out
the causes which led to such effects?
Not far from the scene of the aged man's
occupation
,
and within ear shot of the sleeper, four or five
dark-looking men in the garb of buccaneers, reclined
upon the sward, smoking and watching in silence
the approaching vessels.
To the right of the knoll occupied by these groups,
at the distance of half a mile, rose the strong hold
of the buccaneers; while in the rear, and hidden
from a prospect of the sea, interspersed among the
trees and surrounding the fort, were several rude
huts constructed for the habitations of those of the
band, not immediately engaged in the duty of
defending
the battery. Upon the walls of the
fortilace
,
and among the adjacent village of cots, figures
dressed in various wild and fantastic, yet sailor-like
garbs, were seen, either engaged under the trees
cooking their morning meal, burnishing their arms,
or hastening to and from the hold of their chief, as
though busy with preparations for some important
event.
By these individuals, the objects which had
attracted
the attention of Cudjoe, the old man, and the
group of smokers had not yet been discovered.
Who tink dem two vessel be, stannen for de
pass on de win? asked Cudjoe, pausing a moment
in the midst of his dissecting operations, as his
restless
one eye, always on the alert, caught sight of
the white sails of the two vessels, standing, with all
drawing sails set for the island.
Old Lafon fixed his bleared eye-balls in the
direction
Cudjoe indicated by extending in his long arms
a dissected leg of the turkey upon which he was
operating
,
and shook his palsied head.
See now, dey sail togedder like two gull on de
gulf; dey jis de same bigness.
No, no! the old man cannot see; two, did you
say? Then shall one destroy the other. Alas! for
two! it is an evil number, and he talked
incoherently
,
mumbling the words in his toothless jaws.
The two vessels now stood in close-hauled, with
starboard tacks on board. The one to leeward
however
,
seemed to gain rapidly upon that to windward,
who hoisted her colours, a broad English ensign,
while a parti-coloured signal fluttered from her
main-peak.
By St. Jone, but dat is one dam English
cruiser
!
exclaimed Cudjoe as the colours were spread
to the breeze, and sacre debble, if dat aint one
o' our own craf he chasin.
One vessel was now evidently in pursuit of the
other. The pursuer was a large-sized English
armed brig, while the chase was a brigantine,
light-armed
,
but a very fast sailer, and every moment
increasing the distance between herself and pursuer.
Still she displayed no colours, when the brig fired a
gun ahead, to compel her to show them.
At the same moment, the chase run up the
Carthagenian flag, and returned the gun by a whole
broad side.
The sleeper started from his deep sleep at the
sound of the single gun, and with his sabre in his
grasp, stood upon his feet, a tall, finely-formed and
manly figure. His dark hair curled around his
expansive
forehead; beneath his arched brows glowed
eyes of the deepest black, now sparkling like coals
of fire as he glanced seaward at the approaching
vessels. As the English colours of the armed brig
caught his eye, his lip, graced by handsome
mustachoes
blended with his dark whiskers, curled with
a cold expression of contempt; but as he gazed
more steadily upon the vessels, a proud smile
lighted
up his sun-browned features.
Here comes a timber of old England's wooden
walls, banging away at the Lady of the Gulf, as if
she had nothing better to do than to scale her guns
at my vessels.
Ha! that tells well, my good lieutenant! and
his eye lighted with pleasure as he saw the head of
the Englishman's bowsprit and jib-boom shot away
by the gallant broadside of the chase and fall into
the water.
The buccaneer was now too far to leeward, to
reach the pass without tacking; and before he
could execute this nautical manuvre, the English
brig ranged upon his larboard quarter.
Well, Monsieur Johnny, continued the pirate
quietly watching the movement of the two vessels,
if you fire your starboard broadside into my little
clipper, we may turn the brigantine over to Cudjoe
here for a riddling seive.
Ha! she has grounded, and,now the
Englishman
has saved his powder; and instead of firing
her broadside into the brigantine, as her
manuvreing
threatened, the English brig leaving the chase,
ran boldly in and came to an anchor close under
the island, and about half a mile from the cliff upon
which stood the group, who with various degrees of
interest had watched the nautical movements we
have briefly described.
By the holy cross! but sir Englishman shows
consummate impudence, firing his spare shot into
one of my vessels, and then dropping his anchor in
the face of my battery as if he had done me good
service. Holy devil! but his coolness shall be
warmed a little with red, iron bullets, if my little
battery
has not forgotten how to speak.
Here Cudjoe, you beautiful boy, go as though
the devil sent you, and tell Getzendanner I want to
see him.
An who but de debble do sen me? chuckled
Cudjoe, but very wisely to himself, as he went off
like a second Mercury, marvellously aiding his
progress
up the slight ascent to the fort with his long
arms, which he alternately applied to the ground
with great dexterity and effect.
Ha! he launches his pinnace! and it is prettily
manned withal. And there flutters a flag of truce!
exclaimed the pirate, as he saw these indications of
pacific intentions on the part of the brig.
Blessed visit of peace! sending out round shot
as its pioneers. Ho! my men! he shouted. And
his boat's crew springing from their recumbent
attitude
upon the grass, were upon their feet and at
his side.
To the boat! Let us reconnoitre this
mysterious
stranger, who thus saucily beards us to our
very faces, he commanded, seizing his weapons
and casting his cloak upon the ground. Hastily
buckling his sabre around him, and placing his
pistols
in his belt, he descended the cliff followed by
his oarsmen, and the next moment stood upon the
beach.
4*
CHAPTER II.
Towards the close of the war, there appeared an armed brig on
the coast, opposite the pass of Barritaria. She fired a gun at a vessel
entering, and then tacked and anchored off the island. A pinnace,
bearing British colours and a flag of truce was sent to the shore,
conveying
four British officers, who had come to treat with the chief, and
endeavour to gain him and his adherents, which comprised a force of
one thousand men, besides thirteen vessels, over to their interests.
Upwards of two hundred men lined the shores when they landed, and
it was a general cry among them, that the British officers should be
made prisoners as spies. It was with difficulty Lafitte dissuaded the
multitude from their attempt, and led the guests in safety to his camp.
Latour's War
.
Prisonersmutinysoliloquyan interview
.
The
seamen placed their shoulders to the bows of
the boat and shoved her off, while their leader, taking
from one of his men a coarse seaman's jacket and
tarpaulin
,
put them on, at once and effectually covering
his richer dress, and concealing any indications of
rank above those around him. Stepping on board,
he seated himself in the stern sheets and took the
helm.
Give way men! he cried in a low yet energetic
tone of command; and the light boat shot away
from the beach like an arrow.
In a few moments, he approached within hail of
the pinnace, which, with steady pull was making
for the shore.
Boat ahoy! hailed an officer in the full uniform
of a British naval officer, who was standing near the
stern of the boat leaning upon his sword, while
another officer of the navy, and a gentleman in the
military dress of a commander of infantry, were
seated under a canopy in the stern sheets.
Ahoy! and the manly voice of the disguised
rover rung full and clear over the water, as he
replied
.
Where is your captain? inquired the English
officer, as the boats came close to each other.
The outlaw, preferring from motives of policy to
conceal his real character, replied:
If you mean the Barritarian chief, you will find
him on shore.
Are you of his band?
We can communicate any message to him, he
answered evasively.
I am the bearer of a packet to Captain Lafitte;
replied the officer, I would know to whom I
entrust
it.
We are of Captain Lafitte's party, and will
execute
any commission with which we may be
entrusted
,
be its import peaceful or hostile, said
Lafitte
firmly.
What say you Williams, shall this business be
entrusted to this stranger?
It is perhaps, the only alternative; he replied
cautiously; he is, most likely, one of the outlaw's
band, and will no doubt convey the packet safely to
his chief.
Ho! Monsieur, will you convey this packet to
Captain Lafitte, and say to him that we will here
await his reply? demanded the English officer;
and he proffered to him as he spoke, a large packet
heavy with seals.
I will, gentlemen; but had you not better see
Captain Lafitte yourselves? If you will pull into the
shore with me, I will notify him of your desire of
an interview with him.
After a few moment's hesitation the officer
complied
,
and the two boats were soon seen approaching
the island, by the buccaneers on the beach, who,
alarmed by the firing, had assembled on the shore
in great numbers, armed and prepared for conflict,
where they watched the movements of the boats
with no little interest.
When they came within reach of the guns of the
battery on the shore, and within hail of the beach,
where nearly two hundred men had already
collected
,
the disguised buccaneer, desirous of
detaining
the officers until he learned the contents of the
package, stood up in his boat, threw aside the
seaman's
jacket in which he was enveloped and turning
to the British officers, said calmly, but in a
determined
tone:
Gentlemen, I am Lafitteyou are my
prisoners
!
The astonished officers, half drew their swords,
and grasped the handles of their pistols.
Draw no weapons gentlemen! you are, you see,
in my power. I shall detain you but a few hours.
Base traitor! Well is it said, you honour no
flag but your own blood-stained ensign, if thus you
recognise a fag of truce. The devil himself would
respect that emblem of peace and honourable
confidence
!
shouted the Briton fiercely.
Nay, sir officer,Do you bring messengers of
peace at the cannon's mouth?Do you bear a flag
of truce in one hand and a lighted match in the other?
Peace, sir,It is you, sir, who tarnish the flag
you accuse me of dishonouring?
The boats had now reached the shore, and Lafitte
springing out upon the beach, said:
Gentlemen, I will take your arms
Jacques, hold these men, he continued,
pointing
to the crew of the pinnace, under safe guard
until further orders. Stand back! backmen!
be called loudly to his followers. Why do you
crowd thus, with lowering brow and hand on
weapon
,
around my prisoners?
Spies! spies! Muerto a los Ingleses,Down
with the British!seize themhang them! cried
the multitude, and rushed forward with lifted
weapons as if determined to seize them in spite of
the stern discipline which usually controlled their
fierce natures.
Men, do you press me? he shouted as they still
closed around the Englishmen. Back, hounds!
or by the Holy God I will send one of you to
breakfast
in hell! and he drew a pistol from his belt.
The most forward of the men at that moment
laid his hand upon the arm of one of the officers,
who stood between the buccaneer chief and the bow
of the boat from which they had just stepped. The
report of a pistol rung in the air, and the daring
mutineer
fell a corpse at the feet of the Englishman.
The crowd fell suddenly back, as they witnessed
this summary act of piratical justice. Away with
this mutinous slave! he exclaimed; and his
followers
near him, raised the corpse in silence and moved
away to bury it in a hastily scooped grave in the
sand beneath the cliff.
There is nothing like blood to cool blood! he
said, quietly turning to his prisoners. Now,
Messieurs
,
let this severe but necessary act of
discipline
,
assure you of my desire to secure your
personal
safety.
Here, my brave fellows, you are but tools of
subtler men, said he, turning to the crew of the
pinnace, who sat moodily and in silence in their
boat, expecting momently to be sacrificed to the
violent passions of the lawless men, who, although
awed into temporary passiveness, might the first
opportunity, satiate their appetite for blood upon
their defenceless persons.
Here men, shove off this boat!
The British coxswain looked at his officer for
instructions.
Put off, Carroll; but watch any signal from
the shore, he said; and under the combined efforts
of several of his own crew the boat shot out from
the beach, the men stooped to their oars, and in a
short time, were along side of their brig.
In the meanwhile the Barritarian conducted
through the retiring horde, the English officers to his
fortress, while dark eyes gloated on them beneath
the lowering brows of menfamiliar with crime,
pursued, until it had become a passionwhose hands
mechanically rested upon the butt of a pistol, or the
handle of a dirk or Spanish knife.
The fortilace into which the chief ushered his
prisoners, crowned a slight eminence of the island
overlooking the sea to the south, and the lake or bay
of Barritaria to the north, whose distant shore was
marked by a low level line of cypress and other trees.
The quarters, or camp, as it was more frequently
termed, of the outlaw, consisted of a brick edifice
within the fort, constructed on a plan similar to those
old Spanish houses still to be seen in the more
ancient
portions of the chief maritime port of
Louisiana
.
The entrance to the fort consisted of a low,
massive gate-way, before which paced a sentinel in
the dress of a seaman, with a drawn sabre in his
hand and a brace of heavy pistols stuck in his belt.
On either side of this gate-way, was a row of
barricaded
windows, admitting light into several small
apartments, used as store, sleeping, and guard rooms.
Weston, close the gate and add three men to
every guard! on your life admit no one without my
orders! said Lafitte as he passed into the fort.
The sailor whom he thus addressed lifted his hat
and moved to obey the order, while his captain with
his three prisoners passed through the gate-way
into a rude court, around which were ranged
several
low buildings, serving as work-shops,
store-houses
,
and quarters for the men who staid on
shore. Several pieces of dismounted cannon were
lying about the court, while a long, mounted gun,
which turning on a pivot, commanded the whole
of the interior of the defences, made use of in
quelling domestic disturbances, stood in front of
the buildings, just mentioned as the quarters of
the chief. To this dwelling, after crossing the court,
he conducted his involuntary guests.
Thodore! he called, stopping at the entrance:
and the youth, with a pale, and as the Englishman
thought, a strikingly intelligent face, came forth
from a room communicating with the passage
running
through the building, with a pen in his hand as
if the voice of Lafitte had interrupted him while
employed in writing.
Thodore, conduct these gentlemen into the
opposite building and tell Weston to place a guard
at the door. Gentlemen, he added with
courtesy
,
turning to the officers, I regret the necessity
of placing you under temporary restraint, but the
fierce humor of my men require it. They
unfortunately
suspect you visit our island under feigned
pretences, while your real object is, to examine the
coast for the purpose of making a descent: and he
looked at them severally and fixedly as he spoke.
You will excuse me, he said abruptly after a
moment's pause, while I examine the package of
which you are the bearer!
Cudjoe, see that the gentlemen are comfortable
in their room and have refreshments placed before
them.
The officers politely bowed to their captor, who
returned their courtesy with dignity; and following
their youthful guide, disappeared.
In a few minutes Thodore re-appeared in the
court, closed behind him a heavy door, turning the
massive bolt in the lock, and returned to the
quarters
of the chief, where he found him examining the
contents of the package.
He was seated at a table in a small room, lighted
by two barred windows deeply set in the thick walls
overlooking the western pass, and affording an
extensive
prospect of the southern sea. The
opposite
window commanded the anchorage with its
little squadron, and the bay of Barritaria, with the
distant green line of the level horizon.
Five or six rude chairs, a large ship's table, and a
seaman's chest were the only articles of furniture.
Several charts, a few books, and bundles of filed,
and many loose papers, lay upon the table.
For an hour, he sat perusing the official papers
which had been placed in his hands, then laying
them upon the table, and leaning his head upon his
hand, he remained a long time buried in deep
thought. Suddenly starting up, he cried:
Thodore, conduct Captain Lockyer to me.
What turmoil is that without? he added with a
raised
voice, as loud words reached his ears. Send
Weston here!
Weston, he said rapidly, as the captain of the
guard appeared at the doorrun the long gun out
of the port hole in the gate, and bring it to bear
upon the blustering fools, and wait my orders to
fire. See that it is well charged with grape.
Aye, aye, sir! said the guard, who had been
recently promoted from the command of a pollacca
to the defence of the fort. And the creaking of the
gun-carriage as it was swung around to the
appointed
position, had scarcely ceased, when a heavy
footstep was heard in the hall, and the bearer of the
packet entered the quarters of the pirate.
Be seated, sir, said Lafitte, waving his hand
to a chair, which the officer occupied. I have
considered the propositions contained in these
documents
before me, and feel honoured in the
confidence
reposed in me by your government. But the
subject of which they treat is of too great moment
for hasty decision. I shall require a few days
delay
before I can return a final answer.
Captain Lafitte! replied the officer; without
commenting upon the circumstances which make
me your prisoner, and which I am happy to
acknowledge
it is not in your power wholly to control, I
will proceed, by communicating my private
instructions
,
to second the arguments made use of by
my superior officer, with which those papers
before
you have made you acquainted, for the
purpose
of inducing you to become an ally of England,
in this her present contest, with the North American
States. I am instructed to offer you a
commission
in his Britanic majesty's service with the full
pardon and admittance into the navy, with ranks
equivalent to what they now hold, of all under your
command, if you will throw the weight of your
power and influence into the scale in our favour.
These are tempting and honourable proposals
Monsieur, and as honourable to the gentlemen who
make them as flattering to the subject of them!
replied
the outlaw in a tone between irony and
sincerity
;
But do I understand you, that I and my
officers retain command in our own vessels,
provided
that we substitute St. George's cross for the
flag under which we now sail?
Such were not my instructions, Monsieur
Lafitte
.
It is expected that the armed vessels which
compose your Barritarian fleet, will be placed at the
disposal of the officers of his majesty in the
contemplated
descent upon the coast.
Vol. II.5
These are conditions with which I am not at
present, prepared to comply; answered the chief.
They are
But consider the advantages which will result
sir, both to yourself and the numbers you command;
interrupted the officer. You will be restored to
the pale of society, bearing an honourable rank,
(pardon me, Captain Lafitte) among honourable
men. The rank of Captain shall be yours, if you
co-operate with us, and moreover, the sum of six
thousand pounds sterling shall be paid into your
hands, whenever you signify your acceptance of the
terms proposed. I beg of you sir, do not permit
this opportunity of acquiring fortune and honour to
yourself, but glory and success to the arms of
England
,
who is ready to welcome you as one of her
bravest sons, escape you.
Sir, replied the Barritarian, your offers are
extensive
,
too much so for an outlawa banned and
hunted man. Ambition will not allure me to accept
them; for have I not power, fame and wealth as I am?
Is the reward of ambition greater than this? what
will it gain me more? Honor? desire of an
honourable
name? Alas!
that
, I have not. Thatthat
indeed
,
were a spur to drive me to your purpose. But
will men confer honour upon dishonour? Will a
pardon
,
a title, a station, make men think better of me?
Shall I not, in all eyes, still be Lafitte? the branded,
the despised, the feared and cursed of men? No
nono! Yet, he added, as the image of
Constanza
passed across his mind, I will think of it,
Captain Lockyer; I will reflect upon your
proposals
.
I wish to become a better and a happier man.
Fate, passions, influencenot principles, has made
me what I am!
I will consider this matter sir, he added, coolly,
casting his eye upon the paper which lay before
him, with a manner that implied his desire to
terminate
the interview.
The officer however still lingeredI should
think sir, he urged, that little or no reflection
would be necessary respecting proposals that
obviously
preclude any kind of hesitation. You are at
heart, if not by birth, a Frenchman, Captain Lafitte,
and therefore, in the existing peace between our
respective
nations, a friend to England. You are
outlawed by the government of the United States;
your name is held up to infamy, and a price is set
upon your head by the executive of Louisiana.
What have you sir, to bind you to America?
The tie which alone binds the slave to the galley.
The ties that bind you to England are many and
may be increased a thousand fold. Promotion is
before you among the gallant gentlemen of her
navy
Gentlemen
! interrupted Lafitte sarcastically,
aye, gentlemen! What Lethe can make the
outlaw the gentleman? Sir, I may become a
British
officerdaring, brave and gallant, may bebut,
shall I be recognized as a gentleman?
No, no! he added after a pause, and with bitter
emphasis, I must still be Lafittethe pirate!
Nay, Monsieur! nay, Monsieur! said the
Englishman touched by Lafitte's manner; allow
me to suggest, that with your knowledge of the
coast and its narrow passes, your services will be
of infinite value to the success of our arms against
southern Louisiana. An army is now waiting in
Canada to unite with the forces here, and it
remains
with you to promote the success of the step.
It is on your skill, sagacity and knowledge we rely
to bring about this object.
Truly Monsieur these are lofty schemes,
well and deeply planned. Such inducements as
you have offered to an honourable career, must not,
nor will they, be disregarded. I must, however,
deliberate before taking so important a step, as that
proposed by Col. Nichols, your superior. Good
morning sir.
Thodore! conduct captain Lockyer to the
guard room.
CHAPTER III.
Lafitte having taken the earliest opportunity, after the agitation
among the crews had subsided, to examine the pacquet brought by the
officers, listened calmly to the splendid promises and ensnaring
insinnations
held out to him by the naval captain. He replied, that in a
few days, he would give a final answer. His object, in this
procrastination
,
being to gain time, to inform the officers of the state
government
of these overtures.
Latour's Memoirs
.
Getzendanner, and the buccaneer.a signal.the
mutineers
.
The
outlaw paced his room with a firm tread,
after the officer left him, his brow contracted with
thought and indignation, whilst the white line of his
even teeth glittered from between his curled and
contracted lips, upon which dwelt a sarcastic smile,
expressive of the bitterest scorn.
Poor fools! they extend the right hand to
Lafitte
,
and say, `come and help us, good sir pirate'!
said he, dashing the papers from him, and
rising
from his chair as the door closed upon his
departing prisonerCunning diplomatists as they
are! they shall find me the cunninger. They seek
my aid, and have come to ask it, with red hands
bathed in the blood of my men. They carry aloft
the flag of truce, as though a lady's white 'kerchief
would cover their treachery. This Englishman
thinks I have little cause to love my countrymen!
Thinks he I have better cause to love
England
?
5*
Has she not hunted me down, worried and
torn me. Pressed, imprisoned, or hung without
ceremony
,
the bravest of my men; sunk my vessels,
and chased my cruisers from the sea, with
overgrown
frigates? Verily! I have much cause to
love her!
But, Massa! 'merica do worse nor dat; she
take, she kill, she burn de craf'; she do, damma,
much more ob de debil's mischief dan massa
Inglish
.
She say she block you up in de bay, and
play de debil wid de camp on de island, and send
for to do it, dat brave cap'un Pattysonand if he
come, he knock de ol' camp to pieces, or Cudjoe no
niggerche! che! che!
Lafitte paused a moment in his walk to and fro
in his little chamber, as his reflections were thus
interrupted. Cudjoe seldom restrained his thoughts
in the presence of his master, who allowed him such
license, not only because experience taught him
that he might as well stop his breath as his tongue,
but he had often profited by the shrewd
observations
to which his slave from time to time gave
utterance
,
winding up every speech with a low
chuckle, expressive of satisfaction.
You say well, Cudjoe! My countrymen have
given me little cause to love them neither. But,
then, continued he, relapsing into his former
thoughtful walk; but then it is my country, and
cursed be the hand that betrays either the country
of his adoption or of his birth! She is my country,
and I love her! No, proud Englishmen! he
added
firmly, you shall yet learn that there is not only
honour among outlaws, but love of countrypure
and disinterested patriotism; and England shall
learn, that the outlaw Lafitte is too honourable to
submit to propositions which she had not honour
enough to withhold. She shall learn, that, although
she condescends to take the hand of a priced man,
from motives of policy, that man feels that he rises
superior to her when he refuses to accept it. No!
there is more honour for Lafitte in serving his
country
as an outlaw, than in betraying her, with the
deck of a line of battle ship, which he could call
his own, under his feet. Where lies the greatest
infamy, in those who propose to an outlaw, or in the
outlaw who refuses to betray his country? Ho,
slave! he called sternly, as he concluded.
Cudjoe was at his side in a moment, with a
long arm stretched to the handle of the door, while
he stood in the attitude of one just about to run
Hasten, and tell Captain Getzendanner I desire
to speak with him.
This personage, with whom the reader is already
somewhat acquainted, was standing before a
three-cornered
fragment of a mirror that once probably had
reflected the features of some honest sea-captain,
affixed
into a lattice of a small hut, covered with
palmetto
leaves, situated opposite to that occupied by
his commanding officer. The hut was about ten feet
square, and so low that Captain Getzendanner, who
was not very tall, unless five feet two inches be
termed so, could not stand upright, without
bringing
the apex of his cranium in familiar contact with
the roof. Besides a hammock slung athwart the
room, the apartment contained a seaman's chart, and
a dark inlaid mahogany table, that once, no doubt,
graced the state-room of some fair lady, one or two
chairs, and a planed board, then reclining against
the side of the cabin, but which, twice a day, when
he was on shore, laid horizontally from the top of
one chair to the other, served effectually as a table.
Two or three cutlasses, a brace of pistols, small
swords, carbines, muskets, boarding caps, and the
various rude paraphernalia of a sailor's wardrobe,
were hung, or strewn carelessly, about the walls and
floor of the apartment.
The only opening admitting light to the interior,
was a square window, defended by a lattice of
reeds, which served at the same time to support the
lieutenant's mirror, before which he had been
performing
the unclassical operation of shaving
almost
a sinecure with him, on account of the
generous
depth of whiskers and mustachoes which he
allowed to grace his round physiognomy. The
lieutenant was of that age, when silver begins,
though sparingly, to mingle with the legitimate hue
of the hair, and when, from a proneness to table
pleasures, the person begins to assume a rotundity,
which, from some imaginary resemblance, has been
compared with that of a puncheon.
A Dutchman, and moreover a bachelor, he was a
man of phlegm. From a snub-nosed cabin-boy,
under a Hudson river skipper, he had passed
through all the phases of a sailor's life, until an
unfortunate
predeliction for certain golden sequins
contained in a stranger's purse, who promenaded
the quay at Havana, led him to seek a mode of
life, where the distinction between
meum
and
teum
was less scrupulously regarded than in the pale of
society.
Mein Got, but in in dis little tamn tree corner,
dere is no seeing half-quarter of a jentlemansh fas',
and as he spoke, he dodged every way his red round
face, gashed here and there with his razor, peering
through his fiery red whiskers and bushy hair, like
the full moon, (to venture such a comparison,)
seen through the bright leaves of an autumn tree.
Vat vool maks de fashion off shavin'.Blood
and blodkins! if I cut one tamn more hair off my
fas'! Abra'am was one wise mans, and he wore a
beard a saint might shwear py, and dunder and
blodkins! fader Abra'am vill pe nor petter man nor
mynheer Capt. Jacop Getzentanner,to pe shure!
Hi, you plack peast of de teyvil's tam,vat you poke
your ugly snout in here for, heh? suddenly
shouted
the lieutenant, as he saw, without the effort of
turning his body, the reflection of Cudjoe's features
in the glass, as he darkened the little doorway
opening into the interior of the camp.
Vat now, you elephantsh cub? Some infernal
order pefore preakfast, I vill shwear! I vish
Captain
Lafitte, who ish a most exshellent sailor, and
very much petter gentlemansh, vould get into the
comfortable habits of doing pusiness after preakfast
ish eaten. It were petter for de digestions. Hi,
you kunning apeI'll cut your ugly visand off if
you pe saucyto pe shure! and he brandished his
razor, threatningly.
Gi, Massa Cap'un Jacob, if you use dat
instrum'
,
you quicker saw him offChe! che! che!
and Cudjoe looked behind like a wary general, to
secure a retreat.
Hoh! hoh! hoh! you pe pretty near de truth,
said the burly captain, laughing good-humouredly;
here, you take de razor yourself to saw off dose
vite tusks. It vill help you peauty; and the
captain
chuckled at his own wit, as he esteemed it,
complacently in his own bosom; but the eye of the
slave gleamed with rage, and a demoniac smile
fearfully
displayed the hideous features of his mouth for
a moment, and then he echoed the laugh of the
officer; but deep and bitter was the hatred which
rankled in his dark bosom against him for
tampering
with his deformities. Lafitte, and he alone,
could allude to them jocosely, with impunity; but
it was seldom that he did so; whilst his followers,
imitating his language and manner towards the
slave, without penetration to discover the strong
current of resentment excited in the bosom of the
object of their rough witticisms, were sowing
unconsciously
seeds of revenge in the heart of the
deformed negro, of which they were, in his own
purposes, destined to reap the bitter fruits. He
never forgot nor forgave the joke elicited by his
natural
deformities. To time and opportunity, while
he passed by the present jest with a laugh, or
apparently
unnoticed, he deferred, whilst he gloated over
his terrible schemes, that revenge, which he had
sworn by Obeah, his most solemn adjuration,
should be one day his.
Vell, you peauty plack poy, vat do you vant
mit me? inquired the captain as he cleaned his
razor
upon the edge of the glass.
Massa say him want see you? dem
English
capins dat come play de spy, make de water
boil and all de fuss, replied Cudjoe, turning about
to go, although in the opinion of captain Jacob there
appeared no necessity for such a preparatory change
in his position.
The slave walked grumblingly to the quarters
of his master. Young elephantheh! saw de
tuskheh! and he ground his large teeth
together
,
while the protruding objects of the officers
jest, glanced longer and whiter from his huge red
lips.
The portly captain after twisting his mustachoes
into a fiercer curl, and placing on his carroty locks
a broad brimmed hat, looped up in front to a silver
button made of a frank piecebuckled on a huge
sword, placed his pistols in his belt, which he drew
tighter with the air of a man who expects to meet,
and is accustomed to, dangerpassed, not without
some difficulty through the narrow door, and rolled
along over the area to the quarters of his
commander
.
Entering the door of the passage leading to the
room, he heard the heavy and measured tread of
its occupant, pacing the floor, as his habit was, when
his thoughts were busy, and matters of deep and
exciting interest occupied his mind.
De lion is lashing his sides mit his tail, said
he, captain Jacop Getzentanner look to your
discretions
.
Come in, answered a low, stern voice as he
tapped hesitatingly at the door with the point of
his sheathed sabre. The visitor entered, and at a
nod from his master, Cudjoe handed him a chair.
Captain Getzendanner, I have sent for you.
This is a time of action. You love the British,
Getzendanner
?
and he looked fixedly into the face of
his officer, with his deep, searching eyes which let
not a shade of expression escape detection and
mental
analysis.
Tousand teyvels! Captain Lafitte, replied the
Dutchman warmly, striking his clenched fist upon
his knee. Do I love de murterer of my proder?
did dey not press him into der tam navy? and vas
he not kill in de pattlesh? I love de hangman
petter
,
vat ish one tay to tie mine veasand round apout
mit de hemp.
Well, I thought as much, replied Lafitte, and
knew you would rather swing to the yard arm, than
do Mister Englishman service. Here are papers,
but you do not read?
I vas read Teuche, ven I vas a leetle pit poy;
put de smooth Inglish lettersh pe mitout handles,
and I never could keep dem from slipping out of
mine memorysh, and now tevfil a one is left behind
put Fto pe shure, said he, half seriously, half
humourously.
And that you remember from its resemblance
to a gallows, ha! worthy Getzendanner? But a truce
to this trifling. Here in these papers, and he
struck emphatically the documents he held in his
hand, here are proposals from the Hon. W. H.
Percyso says the endorsement, and his lip curled
ironically as he continued, Captain of his
Brittanic
majesty's sloop of war Hermes, and Admiral
of the naval forces in these seas, and from Lieut.
Col. Edward Nicholls commander of his majesty's
military forces on the coasts of Florida, to me
simple Captain Lafitte. He then briefly stated
the nature and extent of the proposition to his
astonished
lieutenant.
Now, Getzendanner, I well know, for love nor
fear, would you obey neither me nor Satan, but from
hatred to the English, I can depend upon your
cooperation
;
therefore I will trust you; but betray
me and you know the penalty. Here, in this paper,
you have my written instructions, which if you
cannot
read, Thodore, who is always in my confidence,
will explain to you.
Thodore, at this moment, who was leaning out
of the window which overlooked the sea, suddenly
interrupted him.
There is a signal flying on board the Lady of
the Gulf, for your presence on board, sir.
Ha! it is so indeed. What can Belluche
want? why not send a boat? Have ready my barge,
Thodore. Getzendanner, I must aboard; during
my absence observe the strictest vigilance in the
camp, and on your life, see that those Englishmen
escape not; and that the excited crews of the
privateer
do not seize and sacrifice them to their
suspicions
.
On my return, I will talk with those
mutinous
fiends, and you must aid me in giving a right
direction to their roused feelings. Ho! there, you
sea-dogs, are you ready? he shouted from the
window.
Aye, aye, sir, came from the beach, where at
the end of a small pier lay a large boat, in which,
resting on their oars, sat eight seamen in red shirts
and white trowsers, each with a red woolen cap
upon his head. They were all dark, fine looking
men, with muscular arms, whose sinews, exposed
by the drawn up sleeve, showed in relief out from
the surface like whip-cords. The glitter of their dark
eyes, and the reckless expression of their faces,
indicated
that marked character, peculiar to men trained
in the school of blood and rapine. They were seated
two by two, on the four thwarts of the boat with their
faces to the stern, where with his hand resting
carelessly
upon the head of the tiller, sat Thodore, who
had preceded Lafitte, dressed in an embroidered
jacket
of velvet, and snow-white trowsers, with a richly
wrought belt, confining a brace of costly pistols and
a silver-hafted dirk. An eye, of the rich hue of the
chestnut, sparkled beneath a brow whose fairness a
maiden might envy, and a profusion of silken,
auburn
hair curled luxuriantly from under his blue
velvet Spanish cap, terminated by a tassel, which,
drooping over his ear, played with his delicately
browned cheek in the passing breeze. An
expression
of resolution, calm and deep determination,
the more severe, from its being foreign to features
so delicate, compressed his lips, as he gazed upon
the turbulent crews of the vessels lining the beach,
talking loudly and fiercely of British spies, and
occasionally
whispering to each other, that their
leader
was about to sell them to the English as the
price of his own pardon. At that moment, there
was a movement among the multitude, which gave
back on either hand as he advanced, and Lafitte
came through the crowd to his boat.
What means this turmoil, my men? he said,
in a conciliatory tone as he stepped upon the
gunwale
;
have you not confidence in me? These
men are not spies. They seek restitution for those
two London brigs taken by you before my return
from my late cruise in the West Indies; and shall
they not have it, if they state their terms in ready
gold? he said chiming in with their humour.
Vol. II.6
Aye, give them their vessels if they give us
their gold, cried several voices.
Very easy said, my masters, growled an old
weather-beaten smuggler near Lafitte, but who is
to handle the chink when its got? and he cast his
eyes moodily and suspiciously at his commander.
Down with old Fritz; said two or three who
heard him; our captain is all honour; we never
have had cause to grumble at shares.
Rest easy, my men, continued Lafitte in the
same tone; you shall have all things explained
and understood when I return from the schooner.
If there is a man who mistrusts Lafitte or doubts
his word, let him step forward.
No one moved, and the next moment every hat
was in the air.
Give way, he cried to his young coxswain,
and shoved off from the land amid the cries of,
Long live Lafitteviva Lafitte! which rose long
and loud from the fickle and tumultuous assembly
upon the shore.
CHAPTER IV.
Discipline among a community of outlaws can only be preserved
by frequent and summary acts of justice.
Lafitte having occasion to leave the island for a short time, the crew
seized the British officers, and placed them under guard. On his
return
,
he released them, represented to his adherents the infamy that
would attach to them if they treated as prisoners, persons who had come
with a flag of truce. Apologizing for the disagreeable treatment they
had received, and which he could not prevent, he saw them safe on board
their pinnace.
Latour's Louisiana
.
An attack from the mutineersinterview with the
British officerssecret expedition
.
The
business of Lafitte on board the Lady of the
Gulf relating to the private disposition of some
specie
,
which, unknown to his crew, the captain had
smuggled into his state-room, having no immediate
connexion with our story, we shall leave him to
transact without our supervision, and return to the
prisoners confined in the guard-room of the fortalice.
Well, Williams, we are in a fine pickle, cooped
up in this seven-by-nine bit of a box, at the tender
mercies of Lafitte and his merciful crew, said the
naval officer, getting up from the rude bench on
which he had been sometime seated in silence, and
looking forth from the grated window.
Damme, he continued, if I ever saw such a
swarm of gallows-looking cut-throats as were
assembled
on the shore to honour our debarkation!
They need neither change of place nor body, to be
fiends incarnate.
You say true, Lockyer, replied the military
officer
addressed; such black-browed villains would
shame the choicest corps of Beelzebub's infantry.
I have no doubt he would set up a rendezvous on
this blessed island of Grand Terre, Barrita, or
whatever
else it is called, if he did not apprehend his
new recruits would corrupt his old soldiers.
But then, replied the naval officer, their
chief seems to be a man of other metal. I could
hardly believe I was looking upon the celebrated
Lafitte, when I gazed upon his elegant, even noble,
person and fine features, in which, in spite of their
resolute expression, there is an air of frankness,
which assures me that he never would be guilty of
a mean action, however familiar bold deeds of blood
and battle may be to his hand. I have seldom seen
a finer countenance nor a nobler presence than that
of this same buccaneer. What a devil he must be
among the women? he added in a gay tone,
passing
his hand complacently over his own fine face.
I will wager my epaulettes against a middle's
warrant
,
if he has not broken more hearts than heads.
And as he ceased speaking he stroked his
whiskers
,
and glanced with much apparent self-approval
upon his bright breastplate which reflected his
handsome
features as in a mirror.
What think you, he continued, turning to the
other naval officer by his side, can we trust
Lafitte
in this matter? He seems to care for our
welfare
,
nor would he have sent that fierce Spaniard
to breakfast with his infernal highness this morning,
if he had determined to sacrifice us. He might
have suffered our massacre, without being charged
with foul play. We are in his power safe enough!
What fatal temerity could have induced us to let
him inveigle us within reach of his guns? For such
a blind piece of folly, if it does not end better than
I foresee, I will throw up my commission and run a
lugger between Havana and Matanzas, with a
young savage before the mast, and a bull-headed
Congo negro, for officers and crew. Curse me,
he added, with much apparent chagrin, but
Captain
Lockyer, you have run your craft hard aground;
if you get clear this time, you may thank any thing
but your own wits.
Hark! there's a gunanothera volley!
exclaimed
the military officer.
Good God! can these infernal fiends be
attacking
the Sophia? exclaimed Captain Lockyer; ho,
there, guard! what, ho! what is that firing and
commotion
without? he cried, springing to the
barricaded
window which only overlooked the court.
The guard, who was a heavily armed and tall
Portuguese, with an air half-military, half-naval,
preserved in keeping by a tall chasseur's cap, a
sailor's
jacket, and loose trowsers, paused a moment,
while he took a huge quid from a roll of tobacco he
held in his fist, and then turned to the window and
replied, while a malign expression lighted up his
full black eyes
Holy St. Antoine, caballeros, but you need not
be so warm! it is only a bit of a trial among the
men, to see who is the stronger.
How mean you, guard?
I mean, sigores, that the party that proves
the strongest below on the beach there, will either
let you remain peaceably where you are till El
Sigor Captain Lafitte returns, or take you forth to
dangle by the necks from the live oak before the
gate.
What! how you jest, exclaimed, in great
perturbation
,
the officer of his majesty's royal colonial
marines. Villain, you jest! and the fingers of
his gloved hand, involuntarily sought the precincts
of his windpipe, with tender solicitude.
Jest! do you call that jest, seor? as a loud
6*
shout filled the air, mingled with cries of seize
them! spies! swing them! down with the gates!
above which was heard the voice of Capt.
Getzendanner
,
in vain exerted to quell the turmoil.
The officers, like resolute men determined to
sell their lives dearly as possible, drew each a
concealed
dirk from his bosom, and stood with folded
arms, facing the window which commanded the
main entrance to the court from without, and
towards
which the noise was rapidly approaching.
The guard himself, mounted a flight of steps
leading to the flat roof of the guard-house, not
only commanding a view of the ground outside
of the defences, but of the whole island, the
southern
sea to the horizon, the passes, and the bay, with
its fleet riding quietly at anchor.
By St. Josef! he exclaimed, as he gained the
summit, and cast his eye beneath upon the
tumultuous
scene.
The whole green esplanade, or terrace, which
sloped from the fort to the beach, was dark with a
dense crowd of men, all under the intensest
excitement
,
which they manifested by shouts, execrations,
and brandishing various weapons in the air. The
crowd, consisting of persons of all nations, tongues,
and hues, mostly in the garb of seamen, seemed to
the eye of the guard divided into two unequal
divisions
,
one of which was assembled with arms in
their hands around the gate, and near a large oak,
growing by the fort, under the command of
Getzendanner
,
who with loud oaths, a sabre in one
hand and a cocked pistol in the other, was
standing
before another party, pressing towards the gate,
some of whom were armed with pistols, harpoons,
and heavy spars. The last, slung between eight or
ten men, by ropes, in rude imitation of the ancient
battering ram, threatened destruction to the barred
gate, for which it was evidently designed.
The two hostile bands, with ready weapons, were
eyeing each other with looks of hatred.
Den tousand teyfils, and py all de shaints, you
sall not pass into de camp, Miles Cosgroveto pe
shure! continued the lieutenant, his face livid with
rage, and an eye full of determination, as a huge
seaman, with an Irish physiognomy advanced,
with a handspike, a little in advance of the
mutineers
,
you once shaved mein life, Miles, and I
don't forget it; put, py Got himself, I vill make a
port hole in your tam long carcass, if you move
anoder
step forward.
Misther lieutenant, replied the Irishman
calmly
,
lifting his hand to his hat, we mane to hoort
not wone hair of your head, but we are resolved,
and he raised his voice so that all, even the
prisoners
in the guard-room heard his words,we are
resolved to seize them British officersthey are
spies! and they have either desaived Captain
Lafitte
,
or he himself is a traithor! So stand aside,
Captain dear, an' let us pass. You have but a
handful of men to oppose us! and he cast his eyes
contemptuously over the small party of better
disciplined
buccaneers who rallied around their officer, to
aid him in upholding that discipline, which they
knew, could alone hold their dangerous community
together. The number that met his eye was
indeed
small, for most of those who had at first
opposed
the measure, when they saw the popularity
of the cause, espoused by the other party, like
sager
politicians on more distinguished theatres,
wisely
went over to the stronger side.
The Irishman then turned his eye back upon his
own followers, numbering six to one of his
opponents
.
Be discreet captain, and let us pass
peaceably
into the fort, he said, with some show of
sullen
earnestness; See you these men sir? he
added with increased ferocity, pointing to his rude
and undisciplined force, they will pass through
that gate, if they pass over your dead bodies.
Captain Getzendanner finding resistance vain
against such a fierce and overwhelming torrent,
replied
:
On one condition shall you pass de gate: dat
you give me your vord, Miles Cosgroveand I
know de value you place on datdat you vill only
mount one guard from your mutinous crew over
dem prisoners, till Lafitte comes on shore; and
den refer de decisions of dis matter to him. Dis
ish mein vishto pe shure!
I give you the pledge, misther lieutenant, that
you ask, said the Irishman, who was mate of one
of the pirate's cruisers.
Den you sall pe admitted, he replied, and a
cunning, treacherous expression glowed in his eye
as he spoke, requiring more than the Irishman's
penetration
to detect. Ho! dere Weshton, unbar de
gate and obey your first ordersh?
With as rapid a step as was consistent with his
corporeal dignity, the Lieutenant with his men, who
might number about seventy, moved round the
angle
of the building towards a stockade or exterior
fortlet, in the rear of the main defences, while the
besiegers rushed in a mass to the entrance. Too
impatient to wait the unlocking of bolts and bars,
those who bore the suspended spar, rushed at half
speed against the gate, which partly unbarred, gave
way before the tremendous power of the beam,
swung with tremendous momentum against it.
The forcing of the gate was followed by a shout,
and a rapid and tumultuous rush into the narrow
passage. All at once, a fearful cry burst from
twenty throats
Hold there! back! back! for God's sake hold!
cried the Irish leader of the assault in a voice of
terror, and in another moment a match would have
been applied to the long gun by Weston, in
obedience
to the command of Lafitte, repeated, as he left
the passage to the gate open, by the wily lieutenant,
though not understood by the mutineers at the time.
The appalled men uttered a shriek of dismay, and
those who had the most presence of mind, fell flat
on their faces, while the rest, in wild confusion and
terror, crowded back upon each other uttering cries
and imprecations of despair and fury.
At this fearful crisis, the bars of the grated
window gave way as they were wrenched out, one
after another by an iron hand. Lockyer sprung from
the aperture grasping one of them, and overthrew
his guard who attempted to intercept him; and, just
as the torch was about to ignite the powder, to
send a shower of iron hail into that living mass of
human beings before its open mouth, the murderous
hand was arrested by his irresistible grasp, and the
flaming torch hurled far over the heads of the
multitude
,
and quenched in the sea.
By the twelve apostles, sir Englishman, you
have saved your life by that bould act, exclaimed
the astonished Irishman as soon as he could
recover
from his momentary surprise, as amid the cheers
of his party, Lockyer drew back a step, and
surveyed
with a firm manner and folded arms the motly
crew before him. By St. Pathrick, men, but we
may thank that stranger that we did not make our
dinner on grape shot and slugs.
A shout of viva el Ingles!viven los
Ingleses
!
replied.
From the momentary check the mutineers
received
at the sight of the long gun, standing
open-mouthed
in their path, and on account of the
sudden
change of sentiment produced by it among
those in advance, who had witnessed the bold and
humane act of the gallant Englishman, it was easy
to direct the current of their feelings.
Give back now my honies. You see this
Englishman
is no spy or he'd have let that bloody
spalpeen Weston blow us into purgatory. Return
sir to the guard room, he added, addressing the
officer, who was now as much the idol of their
respect
,
as he was before the object of their hatred,
and you shall be protected until Captain Lafitte
comes on shore.
The crowd acquiesced in the proposition of their
herculean leader, with a shout, and turned their
rage against Weston, who with his guard had
retreated
into the quarters of their commander,
constructed
both for strength and defence, and firmly
secured the entrance.
The English officer was once more shut up in
the guard-room with his fellow prisoners, while
Cosgrove after posting a guard of men by the door
and window, attempted to restore order among his
undisciplined associates, who, now finding a worthy
object upon which to vent the rage which the
gallant
act of the Englishman had turned from himself
and his fellow prisoner, had brought the gun, so
recently
directed against their own bosoms, to bear
upon the door of the building containing the guard,
and with cries of revenge, were only waiting for a
torch, for which one of the number had been sent,
to drive the whole charge of grape through the door
and force a passage to their victims.
Suddenly there was a movement among the
privateers
at the gate, and Lafitte!the captain!
passed hurriedly from mouth to mouth.
Holy devil! what means all this? cried the
chief, pressing through the crowd, who shrunk
back before his lightning eye and upraised sabre.
Take that, sir, and the hand which was about to
apply the burning brand to the priming of the
cannon
,
fell, still grasping the blazing wood, severed
from the arm, by a single blow from the sabre of
the outlaw.
The next moment he stood upon the gun, with a
drawn pistol in each hand;his eye flashing, and
his tall athletic figure expanded with rage, while a
broad circle was made around him, as the men
involuntarily
drew back from the summary justice of
his ready hand.
How is it! he continued, vehemently, that I
cannot leave the camp half an hour but there is
mutiny among ye knaves! By the holy St. Peter,
you shall remember this morning's work! Who
are the ringleaders of this fray? Who, I say? and
his voice rung in their ears. Come forward!
and his eyes passed quickly over the silent and
moody multitude, each man, as he dropped his own,
felt that they were fixed individually upon himself.
WhatCosgrove! my trusty Miles Cosgrove!
exclaimed the pirate, as the tall Irishman stepped
forth from among his fellows,and yet I might
have thought it, he added; it were a miracle to
find one of you a stranger to treachery. What
could have led you, he continued, raising his voice,
thus boldly to despise the authority of your
Captain
,
and throw off the discipline of our
community
?
Speak, sir! what was your object in this mad
assault upon the garrison of the fortressa small
one indeed, for we thought friends and not traitors,
were around us? What have you to answer, sir?
Captain Lafitte! I have this defence, said
Cosgrove, coming forward and speaking with a firm
countenance and a clear eye, which shrunk not
beneath
the stern gaze of his superior. And in a few
words he detailed the circumstances as they had
happened.
Cosgrove, I believe you. You are impulsive
and headstrong, but I think, in the main, faithful,
said, as he concluded, Lafitte, who had
calmly
listened to the recapitulative defence of the
ringleader, which from the mutterings and
pleasurable
exclamations that proceeded from various
quarters of the fort, differently affected his
hearers
.
Well, my men, he said, raising his voice,
will you all return to your duty and your vessels,
if no further notice is taken of this matter?
Aye, aye! all, all! came unanimously from
the multitude.
Will you freely leave me to deal with these
prisoners?
Freely, captain, freely, said a hundred voices.
I thank you, one and all. I hope a scene like
this witnessed to-day, will never be repeated.
Return each man to his duty. To each officer
under
my command, I would suggest the expediency
of preparing for the threatened attack from the
squadron, said to be fitting out against us at
New-Orleans
;
and laying aside private animosities and
prejudices, party feelings, or unjust suspicions, let
us adopt for our own the wary motto of the States.
His address was received with acclamations by
his men, who, in a few moments, each under his
respective officer, departed for the fleet, leaving
behind
only the regular guard of the garrison.
Gentlemen, said Lafitte, stepping from his
elevated
station upon the gun, and approaching the
window of the guard-room, from which his guests had
been silent and deeply interested spectators of the
scene passing before them,Gentlemen, I
congratulate
you on your safety amidst this wild
commotion
of human passions. Such tempests are
fiercer than the storms and waves of the ocean to
contend with. You may thank your own daring,
and not my authority, that this storm is allayed. It
would have cost me the lives of many brave men
to have quelled it. Gentlemen, you are no longer
under restraint. I hailed, as I came under the
stern of your brig, and your pinnace is now
approaching
the shore.
Here he whispered to Thodore, who hastened
into his room.
Allow me, Messieurs, to express my sincere
regret at the unpleasant situation in which you have
been placed. You have seen that I can scarcely
control the wild spirits around me, except by what
may be thought cruel and unnecessary severity.
But should I abate for a moment, a feather's weight
of my discipline or authority, I should lose my
command or my head.
Thodore now approached, with the swords of
the officers, which were courteously tendered them
by Lafitte, with an apology for detaining them; and
after doing ample justice to the sparkling stores of
the Barratarian, presented on a richly chased salver,
by his slave, accompanied by Lafitte, they left the
garrison; and after crossing the green terrace,
stretching before it quite to the beach, they were
in a few moments at their boat.
Messieurs, said the outlaw, with dignity and
address, as the British officer, before stepping into
his boat, desired to be told what conclusion he had
formed in relation to the proposals of Admiral
Percy,Messieurs, in reference to this important
subject, some delay is indispensable. The
confusion
which prevailed in my camp this morning, has
prevented me from considering with that attention
I should wish to, the offers made me by your
government
.
If you will grant me a fortnight's delay,
such a length of time is necessary to enable me
to put my affairs in order, and attend to other things
which peremptorily demand my present attention,
at the termination of this period, I will be
entirely
at your disposal. You may communicate with
Vol. II.7
me then by sending a boat to the eastern pass, an
hour before sunset, where I shall be found. You
have inspired me, Captain Lockyer, with more
confidence
,
he said, sincerely, than the admiral,
your superior officer, himself could have done.
With you alone I wish to deal, and from you also
I will reclaim in due time, the reward of the
services
which I may render you.
The decided tone and manner of Lafitte gave
Capt. Lockyer no hope of being able to draw from
him a present decisive reply; he therefore merely
said:
I must, I find, though reluctantly enough,
comply
with your request, Captain Lafitte. On the
evening of the fourteenth day from the present, we
will ask again, your determination, which, I trust,
will be that, which will give you an opportunity of
securing a high and honourable name among men,
and that, which will add Louisiana to his majesty's
crown. Good morning, sir.
Good morning, Messieurs, replied Lafitte; and
the pinnace moved swiftly away from the beach,
and the outlaw stood alonethe sea-breeze playing
coolly upon his browthe broad gulf with a low
murmur unrolling its waves at his feetthe rich
forest rising in majesty behind him, and the deep
blue skies above himyet, all unseen, unheard,
unfelt by him. After gazing thoughtfully a few
moments after the receding boat, he folded his arms
upon his breast, and walked slowly back to the
camp.
The sun had just set on the evening of the day
in which the events we have recorded, transpired,
when Lafitte, his tall and commanding figure
enveloped in a gray cloak, issued from the gate
of the fortress, after giving several brief orders
to Captain Getzendanner, who was stationed with
his portly mien, and goodly corporeal dimensions,
just within the gate as he passed. Cudjoe's low,
deformed figure also wrapped in a cloak followed
him with an awkward rolling gait, as he walked
rapidly towards a point at the extremity of the
anchorage
on the north side of the island, closely
engaged
in conversation with Thodore, who moved
by his side with a light step. After a rapid walk
of about forty minutes the three stopped under a
broad tree, casting a deep shadow over a narrow
inlet, penetrating a little way into the island, in
which a small, gracefully shaped boat could be
indistinctly
seen through the obscurity of the night.
Just as they entered the dark shadow of the tree,
they were challenged by a seaman, who, with a
drawn cutlass in his hand was pacing fore and aft
under the tree, with that habitual tread learned by
that class of men, in their lonely watch upon their
vessels' decks.
Our country! replied the deep voice of Lafitte.
What ho! Corneille, is all still in the fleet? he
added.
Aye, aye, sir; there is nothing moving within a
mile of us.
Are you all ready?
All, sir.
Thodore, see that the oars are muffled. I choose
not that the fleet should mark our movements.
They will be in chase of us for another God-send
of English spies, and I prefer passing unnoticed.
Cudjoe, place yourself in the bows, he said
playfully
,
and show your tusks generously; if they
should spy us, they will take us for an in-shore
fisherman, with his bow-lights hung out, and so let
us pass.
In a few moments the little boat shoved
noiselessly
out from the creek in which it had been
hitherto
concealed, and after a few light but skilful
strokes by the four oarsmen by whom it was
manned
,
shot rapidly out into the open bay, or, as it has
been more recently denominated, Lake, of
Barritaria
.
For an hour they steered by the lonely polar star,
which, in that southern latitude, hung low in the
northern skies, and leaving the anchored squadron
far in shore to the left, they raised their dark brown
sailso painted, to be less easily distinguished
through the night haze  and shipping their oars,
glided swiftly towards the narrow mouth of a deep
bayou, which, after many intricate windings
terminated
in the Mississippi river, nearly opposite to the
city of New-Orleans.
As they approached, long after the hour of
midnight
,
the secret and scarcely discernable outlet,
nearly lost in the dark shadow of the shore, they
lowered their sail; and, yielding once more to the
impulse of the oars, the little boat shot into the
mouth of the creek, and suddenly disappeared in
the deep gloom which hung over it.
7*
BOOK IV.
SIEGE.
Greece gathers up again her glorious band,
They strike the noblest, who shall strike the first.
The Emigrant
.
I pray you let the proofs
Be in the past acts, you were pleased to praise
This very night, and in my farther bearing,
Beside.
Byron
.
My chiefest glory
Shall be to make me worthier of your love.
Ibid
.
Oh! what an agony of soul was his!
Baffled just in the moment of success.
The Conqueror
.
BOOK IV.
CHAPTER I.
At a crisis so important, and from a persuasion that the country
in its menaced situation, could not be preserved by the exercise of any
ordinary powers, the commanding general proclaimed martial law,
suspending constitutional forms for the preservation of constitutional
rights.
History of the war
.
New-Orleans before the siegeguard boatsa scene on
the river
.
A FEW weeks before that memorable battle, the
last and most decisive fought during the recent war
between the United States and Great Britain, the
citizens of New Orleans were thrown into
consternation
by the rumour of extensive naval and military
preparations making by the British, who were
assembled
in great force along the northern coast of
the Mexican Gulf; and this alarm was still
increased
,
by the report, that they meditated a descent
upon the capital of Louisiana.
This point, next to the city of Washington, had
been always deemed in the eye of England, the
most important conquest she could make upon the
territory of her enemy.
And to this point all her forces were now
concentrated
for the purpose of striking a blow, which
should at once terminate the war, and make the
Americans of the west, to use her proud language,
prisoners in the heart of their own country.
As the rumours became more frequent, and were
finally corroborated by official despatches, directed
to the legislative assembly which hastily convened
to deliberate upon measures for the safety of the
country, the panic increased, until distress,
confusion
and forebodings filled the minds of all.
Menaced
by so formidable a foe, without any regular
soldiering or means of defence in which to place
confidence, they lost all decision and energy.
Business
was suspended, and the streets were filled
with groups, anxiously conversing upon the fearful
rumours, rife on every tongue, or with individuals
hurrying to and fro in exaggerated alarm; while the
roads leading to the interior of the state, were alive
with individuals and families laden with their more
portable wealth, seeking that safety beyond the
probable invasions of the enemy, which their fears,
and, among such a motley assemblage as constituted
the citizens, want of combination, prevented them
from securing by their swords.
Those, whose love for property, or disbelief of the
reports so generally accredited, or patriotism,
induced
to remain, were united together by no common
bond; and destitute of that confidence in each other
which the crisis called for. Composed principally
of Spaniards, Frenchmen and Englishmen, each
national division viewed the coming events through
a medium of its own peculiar colouring. Mutual
jealousies arose and general disaffection usurped the
place of good faith. The legislature itself was
disserved
and weakened by these party jealousies, and
their deliberations were only scenes of warm and
conflicting debate, from which none of the
measures
resulted, demanded by the exigencies of the
time.
Some of the senators whose patriotism led them
to propose such steps as would place the city in a
state for receiving the enemy, were overruled by
others, whose prejudices inclined them either to the
side of the British, or to neutrality, in the character
of French citizens, or as subjects of Spain, with
which countries the English were then at peace.
At this period of indecision and civil anarchy,
and when every good citizen and reflecting man
was looking about for some one who would lead in
this emergency, the American chief of the southern
forces arrived at New-Orleans. His presence
produced
a sudden and healthy change in the aspect
of affairs, and before he had been in the city one
hour, his name was upon every lip, either with
hope, or pride, or hostility, and the eyes of all
lovers of their country turned upon him, and
marked
him as their leader in the great struggle before
them.
His presence and language roused them to a
defence
of their rights, and kindled patriotism and
hatred
for the enemy in their breasts. He excited them
to vigilance, and called them to put forth all their
energies for the approaching trial. He was
seconded
by the governor of Louisiana, a few
distinguished
senators, and numerous citizens. The
confidence
which filled his own bosom, was
communicated
to the desponding hearts of those around him,
and intrepidity, decision, and energy succeeded the
inaction and dismay which had before reigned in
the bosoms and minds of men. A new spirit
invigorated
every breast, and men, strong in the
righteousness
of their cause, rallied around the standard
of their country, prepared for the approaching
contest
.
He recommended to the legislature to change
their temporizing policy for unwavering and
dignified
deliberations, burying and forgetting all minor
considerations, in their labour for the public good.
Those aliens who felt no attachment to the existing
government, and were ready to sell or surrender it
to the British, Spanish, or French, as either
natural
faction predominated, were allowed, or
compelled
,
to quit the town.
Every resource that could contribute to the
safety
of the city, was in requisition, and operations on
an extensive scale for its defence, were projected
with military promptness and skill. General
confidence
became at once every where restored, and
with the exception of some disaffected citizens, who
were strictly watched, there was but one heart and
hand enlisted in the mutual defence. Regiments
were formed of the citizens, and, throwing off the
habits of a life, each man became a soldier. Even
women and children partook of the general
enthusiasm
;
and when the enemy were at the gates, the
day before the battle, the citizens appeared more
like rejoicing for a victory than preparing to
withstand
a siege.
For the greater security of the country, martial
law was at length proclaimed throughout
New-Orleans
and its environs, and the whole city became
at once under the rigid discipline of a fortified
camp. Patroles of veterans paraded the streets,
and guard boats were stationed at various points on
the river, before the city.
All persons, says a historian of the period,
entering the city, were required immediately to
report themselves to the adjutant-general, and on
failing to do so, were to be arrested and detained in
prison, for examination. None were allowed to
depart
,
or pass beyond the chain of sentinels, but by
permission from the commanding general, or one of
the staff, nor was any vessel or craft permitted to
sail on the river, but by the same authority, or by a
passport signed by the commander of the naval
forces. The lamps were to be extinguished at the
hour of nine at night, after which time all persons
found in the streets, or from their respective homes,
without such passport, were to be arrested as spies,
and thrown into prison to await an examination the
ensuing morning.
It is at this period of the war, and under these
peculiar
features of it, at the expense of a slight
anachronism
,
that our scenes once more open.
The morning after leaving the island of
Barritaria
,
or Grand Terre, the party, consisting of the
buccaneer chief, his young companion Thodore,
and faithful slave Cudjoe, having rowed all the
preceding
night through the sluggish and sinuous
bayous
,
reached a hamlet of fishermen's huts, nearly
hid in a cypress wood, and amidst tall grass, which
enclosed it on every side. Here they delayed,
until
once more, under the cover of the darkness, they
should be enabled to enter the vigilantly-guarded
city unperceived.
Night, hurrying away the scarcely visible twilight,
had passed over city, river, and forest, obscuring
every object in the gloomy shade cast by her sable
wing. Silence reigned over all, that one short hour
before was active and animate, save the
occasional
challenge of a sentinel, the ringing of fire-arms
accidentally struck together, and now and then
the dip of an oarto maintain their position against
the currentheard from the guard-boats, which,
at regular intervals, formed lines across the
Mississippi
,
against various points of the city. Here and
there, a light gleamed in the mass of dwellings
along the margin of the river, or from the stern
window of some armed vessel at anchor in the
stream.
At the mouth of a narrow canal, opening nearly
opposite to the suburb Marigny, about a mile
below
the main body of the city, and
communicating
in the rear of the estate it intersected, with the
bayou which the outlaw and his party ascended
from the island, about half an hour after night had
wholly assumed her empire, lay a boat concealed
in the deep shade of a large oak overhanging the
entrance, its tendril-like branches nearly touching
the water. In it sat four boatmen resting upon
their oars, in the attitude of men prepared to use
them at the slightest word of command.
Against the tree, with his arms habitually folden
upon his chest, thoughtfully leaned the pirate,
divested
of his cloak, and dressed in the ordinary garb
of his men, from whom he was distinguished only
by his superior height, erect figure, and the
deference
shown to him by his companions.
Upon a gnarled root of the tree, which the action
of the water had laid bare, sat his companion
engaged
in watching the changing lights moving along
the opposite shore, and listening to the challenges of
the guard boatshis pulse occasionally bounding
with the wild spirit of adventure, as the danger
attending their expedition occurred to his mind.
Cudjoe was hanging by his arms and feet, from
one of the drooping branches, as motionless as the
limb which bore him. The air was still. Not a
leaf moved, and the deep silence that reigned at the
moment, was made more striking, by the
reedy-toned
ripple of the flowing water curling among
the tips of the slender branches, as, borne down by
the weight of the slave, they dipped in the rolling
flood.
Cudjoe, down sir! said Lafitte, suddenly
addressing
the slave.
The African dropped from the limb and stood by
his master.
You swim, Cudjoe!
Yes, Massa, Cudjoe swim like fis'.
Vol. II.8
Do you see that first boat there, just under
that brightest star in the range of those double
lights?
Yes, Massa.
It is one of the watch boats. There are but
two men in itgo up the leve till you are about
one hundred rods above the boatthen strike off
into the river and let the current drift you against
her bows. If you are cautious you will approach
unperceived. Then get over the bows into the
boat and master the men the best way you can
so you effect it without noise. But, slave, take no life.
When you have captured the boat, scull it here!
Yes, Massa, he replied, displaying his tusks
with delight.
Go, then.
The slave, with a stealthy step left the shadow
of the tree, and glided along the leve until he was
above the boat, when, from a projecting limb, he
dropped himself noiselessly into the river; his head
in the obscure starlight as he swum, resembling the
end of a buoy, or a shapeless block floating upon
the water.
CHAPTER II.
Guard boats were stationed across the river; the lamps were to be
extinguished at nine o'clock at night, after which all persons found in
the streets without a passport, were to be arrested as spies.
Although a large reward was offered by the governor for the chief
of the Barritarians, he frequently visited the city in disguise.
Sketches of the last war
.
THE VOLUNTEERSCOLLOQUY INTERRUPTEDPRISONERS
THE CITY.
The
two men were sitting in the boat, engaged in
social discourse, one with his face to the stern,
the other fronting the bows, upon whose features
the rays of the light shone brightly.
But, Mr. Aughrim, in your opinion, what think
these Englishers would do with't if they should,
(which is a mighty bad chance for 'em) take the old
yallow fever city? said one of the oarsmen of the
boat, gently rubbing with his palm the head of a
carbine, whilst with the other hand he occasionally
dipped his oar into the water, with just force enough
to counteract the current.
Why you see, Tim, dear, replied his
companion
,
the ould counthry has her eye open, sure! and
is not this the kay of Ameriky; it's a kingdom
they'll make of it at wanstbad loock to the likes
o' thim. Faix, its for faar o' that same Dennis
Aughrim
is this blissed night a 'listed sojer.
I reckon they'll feel a small touch of the
alligator's
tooth, and a kick from the old horse
Kentuck
,
afore they turn narry acre o' land in the States
into a kingdom, come.
Troth, honeybad loock to the likes o' my
mimory; said the Irish volunteer rubbing that
intellectual
organ, sure I've heard that same big
bog-trotter of a hoorse, mintionedthe omadhoun!
An' has he divil of an alligator's tooth in his
beautiful
mouth, Tim, dearor is it ony a `figur o'
spache' as ould father Muldoodthrew, pace to his
mimory, used to say.
Look! what is that? said his companion
hastily
,
pointing out a dark object floating on the water,
towards which they pulled for a moment, and then
again rested on their oars.
Nothin' my darlint, said Dennis, but one of
thim same jewells that coom sailin' all the way from
furrin parts, about the north pole. We'll kape our
four eyes aboot us, sure, but divil a sthraw could
dhrift by, widout Dennis Aughrim's seeing it wid
his peepers shut.
Perhaps, said his companion speaking slowly,
giving utterance to the thoughts the inanimate object
called up, perhaps that old log has drifted by my
door, and the old woman and little ones have looked
at it, and thought how it was floating away down to
Orleans, where daddy Tim is; and till it faded in
the distance from his eyes, he gazed after the
floating
tree, which, even in his rude breast conjured up
emotions, for a moment, carrying his thoughts far
back to the rude cabin and the little group he had
left behind him, to go forth and fight the battles of
his country.
Is it far, the childer and the ould 'ooman live,
Masther Tim? inquired Dennis, chiming in with
the feelings of his comrade.
It is in old KentuckHark? he said, as one
guard boat challenged another which was rowing
across her bows.
An' thin is there the likes o' sich a hoorse in
your counthry? inquired the Irishman after a
moment's
silence, faix, it's exthraordinary.
And you never saw old Kentuck? said his
companion, recovering at once, the low humour
characteristic of his countrymen, Well, he's a
caution
!
He's about four hundred miles long from
head to tail, and when he stands up, one foot is on
the Mississippi and another on the Ohio, and his
two fore legs rest on Tennessy and old Virginny.
Thrue for you, indeed! Masther Tim; but sure
it's joking you are, Tim, dear, said Dennis in
credulous
surprise.
Never a joke in the matter, paddyhe's a
screamer
I tell
you
. Why, his veins are bigger than any
river in all Ireland, and he has swallowed whole
flat boats and steamers; and stranger, let me tell
you
, the boys aboard, never minded but what they
were sailing on a riveronly they said they thought
the water looked a little reddish. Why it takes a
brush as large as all Frankfort, and that's a matter
of some miles long, to rub him down, and every
brustle is a pine tree. When he drinks you can
wade across the Mississippi for a day after, just
about there. He snorts louder than July thunder,
and when he winks, it lightensmake him mad, and
he'll blow like one of these here new fashioned
steam boats.
Oh! Holy mother! The saints betune us and
this omadhoun! But it must take the mate and the
praitees to feed him. Och hone!
But this is not all, Dennis; continued his
companion
with humour, amused at the credulity of his
fellow soldier; his tail is like a big snake and as
long as the Irish channel.
The Lord and the blessed St. Pathrick betwixt
us and harm.
8*
His back is covered with a shell of a snapping
turtle, that you could put your island under.
Oh murther! but may be it's no expinse the
Prisident will be for a saddle. Lord! Lord!
Not a bit, paddy; nor a bridle either, for that
matter, continued the Kentuckian with
impertuble
gravity, while his companion, with incredulous
and simple wonder, listened aghast; his head is
shaped like an alligator's, with a double row of teeth
and a large white tusk sticking out each side of his
mouth.
Oh! the Lord look down upon us! there
he is! suddenly shrieked the Irishman, and
fell senseless on the bottom of the boat. Before
the Kentuckian could turn to see the cause of the
alarm, the slave, whose hideous features seen
over the bows, combined with his excited
imagination
,
had terrified the simple Irishman, already
inflamed by the recital of his comrade, sprung
forward
;
and he felt the iron clutch of Cudjoe's fingers
around his throat, and his arms pressed immoveably
to his side. Until his captive grew black in the face,
the slave kept his hold; and when he found him
incapable
of resistance, he seized the oars and pulled
into the mouth of the canal, opposite which the
boat had now drifted.
Done like Cudjoe, said his master, who had
watched with interest, the success of his plan, as
the boat touched the bank.
Ha, slave! did I not tell you to shed no blood?
he added angrily, as his eye rested upon the
prostrate
forms of the boatmen.
Cudjoe no spill one drop, replied the slave;
one sojer tinky me alligator, curse him; he make
one yell and den go to de debil, dead directly. Dis
oder big sojerhe only little bit choke.
Take them out, he said to his crew, and lay
them on the bank.
In a few moments, the Kentuckian revived, and
looked around him in moody silence.
You are a prisoner, said Lafitte.
And to the devil, I suppose, stranger, he said,
looking at Cudjoe's ungainly figure. The next
moment
a thought of his lonely family swelled his
bosom, and a desire to escape suddenly inspired
him. Leaping from the ground, while his captors
thought him incapable of rising, he threw himself
headlong into the river. In a few seconds, they
heard the water agitated far below them by his
athletic arms. He gained the shore on the lower
side of the canal, beyond pursuit, and his receding
footsteps were heard far down the leve.
Better he were free, said Lafitte; that man
would lose his life before he would betray the
watch-word. But this looks like baser metal, he
added, placing his foot upon the body of the
Irishman
,
who, after being deluged with a few caps full
of the cold river water, revived.
Oh! murther, murther! he exclaimed, as a
generous
discharge nearly drowned himOh! the
hoorsethe hoorse! Och, murther me! It is kilt
you are Dennis Aughrim! Och, hone
Up, sir, up, and stop that howling, said Lafitte,
taking him by the collar, and lifting him as a less
muscular man would a child, and placing him upon
his feet
What is the pass-word of the night?
The woord is't yer honor? said Dennis, his
consciousness partially restoringand devil a bit
did I know, how ever I coome here. Oh, the
hoorse, and the alligathur! he suddenly exclaimed,
looking about him, as if he expected again to see
the object of his fearsand did yer honor pick
me from the wather, where he dhragged me to
devoor
me. Oh! holy St. Pathrick! but it was a
divil
of a craather.
Back, Cudjoe, said Lafitte, as the slave was
gradually creeping round to intercept his vision.
Give me the pass word of the night, soldier.
By dad, an' wid a heart an' a will would I
oblige yer honor; the mither in heaven send
blessin'
on blessin' on yer honor's head; for savin' me
from droouin'; but Tim, Tim is it wid de bit
paper
.
No trifling man, or you will be worse off than
in an alligator's jaws, replied his captor sternly.
Oh, thin, dear, yer honor! but I must spake it
low, and standing on his toes, he whispered in the
ear of Lafitte, the pass word of the night.
'Tis as I thought, he exclaimed. Now get
into this boat and guide us up to the city; serve me
faithfully, and you shall soon be free; betray or
deceive
me, and you die.
Oh, blissed mither! that Dennis Aughrim should
be prisoner to the Inglishers! and, poor craythur!
that he should lit them into the city, to make it a
kingdom. Och, Dennis! but you'll have to go
back to ould Ireland! Amiriky is no more to be
the free counthry o' the world. Och, murther me!
that Dinnis's own mither's son should come to
this! he soliloquized, as he reluctantly stepped
into the boat for the purpose of betraying his trust.
Leaving orders for his men to remain in their
concealment until his return, and be on the alert
against surprise, the buccaneer chief stepped into
the guard-boat with Thodore and his slave.
Taking an oar himself, and giving the other to
his guide and prisoner, he pushed boldly out from
the bank, and confidently passed the line of boats,
every challenge from them being answered by the
familiar voice of the Irishman, as they passed
within
two or three oars' length of the line of
guard-boats
;
all but the chief and the guide lying in the
bottom of the barge.
In about half an hour after leaving the shore, he
shot into the inlet of canal Mariguay, and nearly
under the guns of fort St. Charles. At this point
were collected many other boats and fishing craft;
and having passed the chain of guard-boats with
security, he pulled along side of the leve, and
into
the midst of the boats, without attracting
observation
.
Leaving the Irishman in the barge under the
charge of Cudjoe, of whom he stood in mortal fear
the chief, accompanied by his companion,
mounted
the leve, and with an indifferent pace passed
under
the walls of the fort. As he walked forward,
the esplanade in front of the city, was crowded
with citizens and soldiers, along which mounted
officers were riding at speed, and detachments of
soldiers moving swiftly and without music, down
the road which wound along the banks of the river.
At every corner he passed by guards posted there,
and nearly every man he met was armed, and as
the lamps shone upon their faces, he discovered that
expectation of some important event dwelt thereon,
giving a military sternness to their visages.
The parade was nearly deserted except by
citizens
and soldiers, too old to bear arms in the field.
Without being questioned or challenged by any one,
for the hour of nine, when vigilance more thoroughly
reigned throughout the guarded city, had not yet
arrived.
Turning from the leve and leaving the parade on
his left, he passed up Rue St. Anne to
Charles-street
,
without lifting his eyes to the cathedral, its
dark towers rising abruptly and gloomily against
the sky, overtopping the government house and
other massive public buildings around it.
A soldier in the uniform of Lateau's coloured
regiment
was pacing in front of the government-house
with his musket to his shoulder. Against the wall
of the church, leaned a group of citizens and soldiers,
all of whom, though apparently off duty, wore arms,
and had the air of men who momently expected to
be called into action. A neighbouring guard-house
was full of soldiers smoking segars, burnishing their
arms and discussing the great subject of the
expected
attack upon their city. Occasionally, a
private
or an officer in uniform hurried past on the
trottoir, neither turning to the right or left, nor
replying
to the questions occasionally put to them by
the inquisitive passers-by.
Soldier, is the governor in the city? inquired
Lafitte, stopping as he met the guard.
You must be a stranger here, monsieur, to put
such a question, said he, eyeing him suspiciously;
next to her noble general, is he not the guardian
of our city?
You say well, monsieurhe is then in the
government-house
?
inquired the buccaneer.
Would you speak with the governor, seor;
said one of the soldiers stepping up.
I have important papers for him, answered
Lafitte, looking at the man fixedly.
You will then find him at the quarters of the
general in Faubourg Marignyhe rode by with his
staff not half an hour since, replied the man.
Thank you, monsieur, said Lafitte.
As he spoke, the bell of the cathedral tolled nine,
and the report of a heavy piece of artillery placed
in front upon the parade, awoke the echoes of the
city, warning every householder to extinguish his
lights, and confining the inhabitants to their own
dwellings. The foot of the loiterer hastened as the
first note struck his ear, and a thousand lights at
once disappeared from the windows of the
dwellings
;
and before the sound of the last stroke of the
bell died away, the city became silent and dark.
After that hour, until sunrise, with the exception of
here and there one bearing about him a passport
from the American chief, every one abroad was on
the severe duty of a soldier.
You have the pass, monsieur? inquired the
soldier, whom he first addressed, extending his hand
as the clock broke the stillness of the night.
Lafitte gave the word which had passed him
through the chain of boats.
It will not do, monsieur, replied the guard,
have you not a passport?
The soldier who had directed him where to find
the governor whispered in his earPensacola.
Lafitte starting, repeated the word to the guard;
adding, I gave you before by mistake, the word
for the river.
It is well, monsieur, said the soldier, giving
back, pass with the youth.
Lafitte and his companion turned and retraced
their steps to the suburb, occupied by the
commander-in-chief
.
As they were crossing Rue St. Phillipe, some
one called the chief's name in a distinct whisper.
He turned and distinguished the figure of the
soldier
who had given him the pass-word.
Ha! is it you, Pedro? I knew you then! but
how is this? Have you turned soldier?
For a time, seor captainI must not starve.
Nor will you if you can find other man's meat,
said Lafitte, laughingly. I thought you had taken
your prize money and gone to Havana.
No, seor; a pair of large black eyes and one
small bag of five-frank pieces tempted me out of
that.
That is, you are married!
It is a sad truth, seor. I am now captain of
a carbaret on Rue Royal, and my dame is first
officer
.
And master Thodore, how fare you, seor,
he said, abruptly changing the subject and
addressing
the youth. It is many a month since I have
seen your bright eye. Well, you are coming up to
the tall man, continued the quondam pirate, curling
his mustachio and drawing up to the full attitude of
his five feet one inch, until his eyes reached to the
chin of the young buccaneer. You will yet walk
a deck bravely.
How did you recognize me so soon? inquired
Lafitte.
When you folded your arms, and threw your
head up, in the way you have, while you spoke to
the guard, I said to myself `that's Captain Lafitte,
or I'm no Benedict.
Well, your penetration has done me good
service
,
Pedro.
Yes, seor; I wish you may always profit as
well by having your disguise penetrated. Your
tall figure, and way of fixing your head, will betray
you more than once to-night, if you are on secret
business, as I conjecture. A little stoop, and a
lower
gait, like a padre, if such be the case, would be
wisdom in you, as you walk the streets. You
know the reward offered for your head, by the
Governor
.
I know it, Pedro; and you have no doubt seen
my proclamation for the governor's, wherein I have
done him much honour, valuing his head five times
at what he fixes mine, said he, laughingly.
And you are seeking him, exclaimed Pedro.
This is strange; but it is like you, Captain
Lafitte
,
he added, impressively. There were six
out of the seven standing with me, when you came
up, who would have taken your life for a sous, if they
could. Be careful seor! but if you are in
danger
,
you will find many brave hearts and ready
hands even in this city, to aid you. If you would
like a taste of Bordeaux or old claret of the true
brand, I should be honoured to have you seek it in
my humble carbaret. The wine, the carbaretall I
have, is at your service, seor.
All?
good Benedictine, said his former
Captain
,
playfully, and with a stress upon the first word.
But I'll come, if thirst drive me; so, adieu, and
thanks for your timely service to-night.
Adios, seor; the saints prosper you! said
Pedro, taking leave of his chief, and returning to
his comrades; while Lafitte, with a firm and steady
pace, proceeded to the quarters of the commanding
general.
Vol. II.9
CHAPTER II.
That a sentiment, having for its object the surrender of the city,
should be entertained by this body, was searcely credible; yet a few
days brought the certainty of it more fully to view, and showed that
they were already devising plans to insure the safety of themselves
and property.
In reference to these plans, a special committee of the legislature
called to know of the commanding general what course he should
pursue
in relation to the city, should he be driven from his
entrenchments
.
Memoirs of the War
.
HEAD-QUARTERSCAPITULATION OF THE SENATETHE GOVERNOR
AND HIS VISITOR.
In
the Faubourg Marigny, and not far from the
canal of the same name, at the period of the war,
stood a large dwelling, constructed after that
combination
of the Spanish, or Moresque and French
orders, peculiar to the edifices of this suburb of the
Louisianian capital.
It was two stories in height; massive, with thick
walls, stuccoed, originally white, but now browned
by the dust and smoke of many years. Heavy
pilasters
adorned the front, extending from the
pavement
to the cornice; the roof was covered with
red tiles, and nearly flat, surrounded by a brick
battlement
.
The street in which this edifice was
situated
,
fronted the river, and was principally
composed
of similar structures, many of which
approached
close to the trottoir, while others were
separated
from the street by a paved parterre, filled
with evergreens and numerous flowers, leaving a
walk a few yards in length, to the dwelling. Two
or three, including the one we are describing,
were situated still farther from the street, in the
midst of a garden, with umbageous groves of
orange, lemon, fig, and olive trees.
To the house in question, led an avenue,
bordered
by these trees, terminating upon the street, in a
heavy gate-way. The gate was of solid oak, and
placed between square pillars of brick, each
surmounted
by an eagle, his wings extended, in the
act of rising from the column. The house,
situated
about twenty yards from the gate, and fronting
the leve and noble river beyond, upon whose
bosom
rode many armed vessels, was square and
very
large, surrounded by ancient trees, which even
at noon day defended it from the southern sun.
The spacious entrance of the mansion, with its
lofty folding leaves, or more properly gates, thrown
open, would freely admit the passage of a carriage.
It gave admittance from the front into a lofty hall,
paved, and without furniture, with doors leading
into large rooms on either side, and terminating in a
court in the rear, also paved, in the centre of which
spouted a fountain. The court was surrounded
with a colonnade or a sort of cloister, and was
filled
with plots of flowers and huge vases of plants,
arranged with much taste by the proprietor in
many
picturesque and fantastic forms.
About the hour of nine, on the evening with which
our story is connected, this dwelling presented a
scene of warlike animation. Sentinels were posted
in front; officers arm in arm, were promenading in
grave or lively discourse before the doorhorses
richly caparisoned for war were held by slaves in
military livery on the street in front of the mansion,
where also a guard was posted in honor of the
present
distinguished occupant. Citizens were
occasionally
passing in and out with busy faces, and
hasty steps.
Horsemen, with brows laden with care or weighty
tidings, rode frequently up, and dismounting, threw
the bridles of their foaming horses to those in
waiting
,
and rapidly traversed the avenue to the house,
while others, hurriedly coming out, mounted and
spurred away at full speed.
A door leading into one of the large rooms from
the paved hall of the mansion, through which
persons
were constantly passing, displayed within, rich
drapery, curtains, deep window recesses, alcoves
for ottomans and various articles of furniture
indicating
the opulence of the citizen proprietor of the
dwelling. Swords, richly-mounted pistols, plumes,
belts, military gloves and caps were lying as they
were hastily thrown down, about the room, upon
ottomans, tables and chairs.
Near the centre of the apartment drawn a little
towards the fire place in which blazed a cheerful
fire, necessary even in this southern clime to
dissipate
the damp and chill of the night, stood a large
square table, surmounted by a shade lamp and
covered
with papers, charts, open letters, plans of
fortifications
,
mathematical instruments, a beaver
military
hat without a plume, and an elegant small
sword with its belt attached, which a tall,
gentlemanly
man, in the full dress of a military chief,
seated at the table, examining very intensely a
large map of Louisiana, had just unbuckled and
placed there.
The rays of the lamp falling obliquely upon his
high forehead, over which the hair slightly sprinkled
with gray, was arranged after the military fashion
of the period, cast into deep shadow his eyes and
the lower portion of his face.
Raising his head from the chart for an instant to
address an officer standing on the opposite side of
the table, his features in the bright glare of the lamp
which shone full upon them, then became plainly
visible.
The contour of his face, now pale and thin,
apparently from recent illness, was nearly oval.
His age might be about fifty. His forehead was
high and bold, with arched, and slightly projecting
brows, bent, where they met, into a slight habitual
frown, indicating a nervousness and irritability of
temperament, qualified however by the benevolent
expression about his mouth.
His eyes were dark blue, sparkling when their
possessor was animated, with a piercing lustre, and
when highly excited, they became almost fiercely
penetrating. His countenance was marked with
resolution, firmness and intelligence. His smile
was bland, his manners easy, and his address
pleasing
if not winning, as he spoke to the officer
opposite
to him. When erect, his height might be
above six feet, commanding and military. His
frame was rather slight, yet apparently muscular.
Although his physical conformation seemed to
disqualify
him for the fatigues and arduous duties of
the camp, yet, the bronzed cheek, the deep
angular
lines in his face, and the field-worn, and military
appearance of the officer, showed, that with the
hard details of a soldier's life he had long been
familiar
.
A gentleman in the dress of an American naval
captain, much younger than the soldier, with a brown
cheek, a frank air and manly features, leaned over
his shoulder with his eyes fixed upon the chart, and
occasionally making a remark, or replying to some
question put in a quick, searching tone by the
military
chieftain.
In the opposite or back part of the room, walked
two gentlemen, both of much dignity of person and
9*
manner; one of whom, by his dress, was an
officer
in high command; the other was only
distinguished
from a citizen by the military insignia of a
small sword, buff gloves, which he held in his hand,
and a military hat carried under his left arm. They
were engaged in low but animated conversation, one
of them often gesticulating with the energy of a
Frenchman, which his aquiline features, lofty
retreating
forehead, foreign air and accent, betrayed him to
be. The citizen was graver, yet equally interested
in the subject of conversation. The tones of his
voice were firm, and there was a calm and quiet
dignity in his language and manner, more
impressive
to an observer, than the gesticulative energy of
his companion.
In a recess of one of the windows, a group of
young officers stood engaged in low-toned, but
animated
conversation; while two or three of a graver
age, promenaded the back part of the apartment
conversing closely in suppressed voices upon
subjects
,
which, from their manner, were of the deepest
import.
Suddenly, a heavy, ringing tread was heard in the
hall, and an officer of dragoons hastily entered, and
without noticing the addresses,
Ha! colonel! good evening.
What news, colonel?
Hot haste, ha! you Mississippians do nothing
by halves! from several of the young officers who
crowded round him, he approached the table where
the general officer was seated and communicated
some information to him, which, from its
instantaneous
effect, must have been of the most surprising
nature.
Starting from his chair, with his brow contracted,
his eye flashing, and his cheek reddened with
emotion
,
he exclaimed in a stern voice which rung
through the apartment,
Capitulate! capitulate! the legislature
capitulate
!
By the Gd of Heaven we will see to that!
Where learned you this daming treachery of our
disaffected senate, colonel? he inquired,
addressing
the officer, while his eye burned with rage.
But now, Sir; as I passed the Capitol, I
heard it whispered among the crowd assembled
before the doors. Dismounting, I ascended to the
outer gallery and found the house closedyet
A secret conspiracy! said the general, pacing
the room in excitement go on!
As I was about to descend, a member, M.
Bufort
,
came out and told me they were at the moment
agitating the subject of capitulation to the enemy,
and making at once a proffer to surrender the city
into their hands
The false, cowardly traitors! exclaimed the
commanding general incensed, and in a loud angry
voiceBy heaven, they shall be blown up with
their crazy old capitol to the skies. Governor, he
said with readily assumed courtesy, turning to the
gentleman in the blue dress of a citizen, my
immediate
pressing duties will not allow me to go
in person and wait on these traitors. To your
excellency
I entrust the office. Take a sufficient
force with youclosely watch their motions, and
the moment a project of offering a capitulation to
the enemy shall be fully disclosedplace a guard
at the door and confine them to their chamber. If
they will not take the field, they had better be
blown up to the third heavens, than remain there to
plot treason against the state.
The governor accompanied by two or three of
the young officers, immediately left the apartment
to execute the command.
My object in taking this step commodore,
said the general, quietly resuming his examination
of the chart as the governor left the room,
addressing
the naval officer, is, that they may be able to
proceed to their business without injury to the state;
now, whatever schemes they entertain will remain
within themselves without the power of circulating
to the prejudice of any other interest than their
own. Like the serpent in the fableif they will
bite, they must fix their fangs in their own coils.
The gentlemen who remained in the room, were
gathered in a group near the door, conversing upon
the conduct of the senateand the general, having
laid aside the chart, was engaged in affixing his
signature to some papers lying before him, when a
special committee from the legislative body was
announced
.
Admit them! said the chief somewhat
sternly
.
Three gentlemen in the plain habiliments of
citizens
entered with some embarrassment; originated
perhaps, by the nature of their business.
Well, gentlemen! said the general officer
quickly, his brow clouding as he rose to receive
them.
One of the legislative committee advanced a step
before the other gentlemen of the deputation and
said with some degree of hesitation,
We are sent, sir, officially from the legislative
assembly of this state, being ourselves members of
that body, to ask of youas commander in chief of
the army, and to whom is entrusted the defence of
our citywhat course you have decided to pursue,
should necessity drive you from your position.
If, replied the general, his eye kindling and
his lip writhing with contempt, looking fixedly
upon each individual of the deputation, as if he
sought to make him feel his lookif I thought the
hair of my head could divine what I should do, I
would cut it off. Go back with this answer! Say to
your honourable body, that if disaster does overtake
me and the fate of war drives, me from my line to
the city, they may expect to have a very warm
session! You have my answer, he added,
resuming
his occupation at the table, as he observed the
committee made no movement to take leave.
Let me suggest o your hononrable body,
however
,
he resumed ironically, raising his eyes as the
deputation were leaving the roomthat it would
better comport with the spirit of these stirring times,
while the roar of artillery is pealing in their ears,
if they should abandon their civil duties for the
sterner and more useful labours of the field.
And what, inquired the naval officer in a low
voice, as the deputation left the department, and
what do you design to do general, provided you are
forced to retreat?
Fall back on the cityfire itand fight the
enemy amidst the surrounding flame! There are
with me gentlemen of wealth, owners of property,
who in such an event, will be amongst the
foremost
to apply the torch to their own dwellings.
The senate fears thisand it is to save their
personal
property from the flames, that the members
are willing to surrender the city to the enemy, he
added indignantly. And what they leave undone,
he continued with animation, rising from his chair
and vehemently gesticulating with his hands, I
shall complete. Nothing for the maintenance of
the enemy, shall be left in the rear. If necessary, I
will destroy New Orleans to her foundations,
occupy
a position above on the river, cut off all
supplies
,
and in this way compel the enemy to depart
from the country.
As he spoke, a messenger entered and handed
him a sealed paper. Hastily breaking it open, he
glanced over it with a quick eye.
To horse, young gentlemen, he said in a sharp
tone, addressing the group of officers, rising and
buckling on his sword; and taking his cloak which
lay on a chair beside him, he wrapped it closely
about his tall form.
Well, commodore, he said addressing the
naval
officer as he took up his cocked hat and gloves,
you will co-operate, as we have determined, with
the land forces. Urgent business now calls me
away; I will communicate with you on my return.
General, he said, addressing the
French-looking
military officer, whom we have already
introduced
to the notice of the reader, I shall be
honoured
with your attendance for an hour. The night
dew will not hurt veterans like you and I, although
it may derange, perhaps, he said pleasantly, the
mustachoes of the younger members of our staff.
At this moment the governor returned, and after
briefly stating to him the situation of affairs in
relation
to the legislature, the general said,
I will return before eleven, your excellency. If
you will do the honors of my household until then,
we will take our leisure to look over this business
the traitorous senators have thrust upon our hands
as if they were not already filled.
Taking the arm of the Louisianian general, he
then left the room; and in a few seconds the sound
of his horses feet, moving rapidly down the street
from the gate, fell upon the ears of the governor,
who was now left alone in the apartment.
Approaching the table, as the last sound of the
receding horsemen faded from his ear, he cast his
eyes over the map recently occupying the
attention
of the general; and after tracing
thoughtfully
with a pencil, a line from the mouth of the
bayou Mezant on lake Borgne to the Mississippi,
speaking audibly, he said,
Here is the avenue Packenham seizes upon.
It will conduct him close to the city. Well, let
him comehe will be caught in the nets his own
policy spreads. But these papers from the
secretary
of war! I must look to them. This lynx-eyed
general must be ably seconded. What noble
Romans
are our senators! he added, his thoughts
reverting
to the commands of the general he had just
seen executed. They would fain capitulate before
the enemy is in sight.
He then, taking up a bundle of papers, seated
himself by the table, the light falling upon his clear,
intellectual forehead, and unfolding them,
commenced
reading with great attention, occasionally adding
or striking out passages, and making brief notes in
the margin. At length, having been several times
interrupted by individuals desirous of seeing the
chief, he closed the door, and gave orders to the
sentinel to admit no one, unless on business with
himself, and again became absorbed in the
occupation
from which his attention had been so frequently
called off.
While thus engaged, and about half an hour after
the departure of the general and his staff, the
challenge
of the sentinel stationed before the front door,
was followed by a low reply, and the heavy tread of
a man in the hall.
The door opened, and the governor lifting his
eyes, beheld enter, a tall man in the dress of a
seaman
,
who deliberately turned the key in the door
and approached him.
The act, the manner and the appearance of the
bold intruder, surprised him, and starting from his
chair, he demanded who he was, and the nature of
his business.
The stranger stood for a moment surveying him
in silence, his full dark eye fixed penetratingly upon
his features.
Sir, repeated the governor, after recovering
from his surprise, to what circumstance am I
indebted
for the honour of this visit?
The stranger, without replying, drew from his
breast a folded paper, and approaching, whilst the
governor placed his hand upon his sword, laid it,
without speaking, upon the table.
He hastily opened and run his eye over it, and
then glancing from the paper to the stranger,
alternately
several times, before he spoke, he at last said
while his brow changed:
What means this, sir? It is but the printed
proclamation for the head of that daring outlaw,
Lafitte
.
Know you ought of him?
The intruder advanced a step, and calmly folding
his arms upon his breast and fixing his piercing eye
upon him, said quietly and firmly
He stands before you!
Ha! exclaimed the governor, starting back;
and seizing a pistol which lay near him, had just
elevated his voice to alarm the guard, as he levelled
the weapon, when Lafitte springing forward,
grasped
it.
Hold, sir! I mean you no harm! It is for
your good I am here. If I desire revenge, I would
not seek it beneath this roof, and thus place myself
in your power. Put up that weapon, your
excellency
,
and listen to me, he added respectfully.
nay, if you have business with me
communicate
it, and let there be this distance between us.
As you desire, sir, replied the Barritarian.
Be seated, your excellency. I have received
communications
,
continued the outlaw, as the governor
somewhat assured, took a chair and motioned him
to another, from the British commander, that I
would confide to you. I feel they are of
importance
to our common country, which, although
outlawed
,
I love.
You are a strange man, captain Lafitteto
enter
a city where thousands know you, with a
reward
hanging over your head; and then voluntarily
place yourself in the power of the executor of the
laws you have violated; and on the pretence too, that
you can serve the state, which you have passed your
life in injuring! How am I to understand you, sir?
Shall I admire your intrepidity, or pity your
duplicity
?
Different language becomes our interview,
monsieur
governor. At no small risk and trouble have
I undertaken this expedition. Fearlessly have I
placed myself in your excellency's power, trusting
that your sense of justice, would appreciate my
confidence
.
I do appreciate it, sir, replied the governor,
after a moment's deliberative silence; and
whatever
,
so that you do not forget yourself, may be the
issue of this interview, which I warn you must be
brief, for the general and his staff will soon return,
I pledge you my word as a gentleman and governor
of this state, that you shall go as free and as secret
as you came. I respect your confidence, and will
listen to what you have to communicate in reference
to the public welfare.
Lafitte then briefly related his interview with the
British officer, stated and enlarged upon the
overtures
so tempting to a band of proscribed men, who,
weary of their precarious existence, might be
desirous
of embracing so favourable an opportunity of
recovering an honourable attitude among men, by
ranging themselves under the banners of a nation
so powerful as the English. After stating his
reception
of the officers, and his expedient to obtain
delay to communicate with his excellency, he
continued
,
Although a reward is suspended over my head
although I have been hunted down like a wild
beast by my fellow citizensalthough proscribed
by the country of my adoptionI will never let
pass an opportunity of serving her cause to the
Vol. II.10
shedding of my blood. I am willing to make some
atonement for the violence done to your laws
through my instrumentality. I desire to show you
how much I love my countryhow dear she is to
me! Of this my presence here, and these papers
which I bear, are convincing proofs. A British
officer
of high rank, whose name you will find
appended
to the papers I lay before you, has made me
propositions to which few men would turn a deaf
ear. Two of them are directed to me. One is a
proclamation to the citizens of this state, and the
fourth, admiral Percy's instructions to that officer
in relation to his overtures to myself.
CHAPTER IV.
Whilst preparations were making by Commodore Patterson for
an expedition against Barritaria, Governor Claiborne, received
communications
from that point, which were deemed of importance to the
safety of the state. He therefore invited on the occasion the opinions
of the officers of the navy, army, and militia, to whom he
communicated
the letters of the British officers, which he had received from the
Barritarian.
Latour
.
Lafitte and his band rejected the overtures of the English with
indignation
.
These men saw no dishonour in enriching themselves by
plunder, but they had a horror of treason.
Marboi's Louisiana
.
INTERVIEW BETWEEN LAFITTE AND THE GOVERNORAN
ADVENTURE
IN THE STREETS.
After
having placed the papers in the governor's
hands, Lafitte turned away and walked to the
window
.
Indeed, exclaimed the governor, glancing over
the papers, preparatory to a more thorough
examination
,
as he read audibly the several signatures.
Then taking the letter of the British officer
addressed
to Lafitte; he read it aloud, commenting upon
every few lines.
I call upon you with your brave followers to
enter into the service of Great Britain in which you
shall have the rank of captain.
Indeed, said the governor, looking up at Lafitte
with interest and surveying as his eye lingered over
it for a moment, his commanding figure. Lands,
he continued, will be given to you, all in proportion
to your respective ranks in his majesty's colonies in
America. (Ha, this is indeed counting the birds
rather prematurely) he soliloquized. Your
property
shall be guaranteedyour persons protected.
I herewith enclose you a copy of my
proclamation
to the Louisianians, which will, I trust, point
out to you the honourable intentions of my
government
.
Humph! honourable! It is nevertheless a fine
round period.
You may be a useful assistant to me in
forwarding
them: therefore, if you determine, lose no time.
We have a powerful reinforcement on its way here.
And I hope to cut out some other work for the
Americans than oppressing the inhabitants of
Louisiana
.
Humph! it is to be hoped so.Well, this is a
most praiseworthy document, said he, laying it
aside, and again glancing at the pirate, who stood
silently at the window, apparently gazing out upon
the stars; but his eye watched every expression of
the governor's features.
Now, what says this scion of nobility,
commander
of his majesty's fleet, continued his
excellency
,
opening a second paper. This is to Captain
Lockyer, and seems to be a letter of instructions:
SirYou are hereby required and directed,
after
having received on board an officer belonging to
the first battalion of royal colonial marines, to
proceed
in his majesty's sloop under your command,
without a moment's loss of time, for Barritaria.
On your arrival at that place, you will communicate
with its chief, and urge him to throw himself upon
the protection of Great Britain; and should you
find the Barritarians inclined to pursue such a step,
you will hold out to them that their property shall
be secured to them and that they shall be
considered
British subjects; and at the conclusion of the
war, lands within his majesty's colonies in
America
(yet
to be won, worthy admiral, said the
governor, in parenthesis,)will be allotted to
them. Should you succeed completely in the
object
for which you are sent, you will concert
measures
for the annoyance of the enemy as you judge
best, having an eye to the junction of their small
armed vessels with me, for a descent upon the
coast.
So much for the son of Lord Beverly, said the
governor, in a tone of irony. These papers are
growing in importance. What is this?
Proclamation, by Lieutenant-Colonel Edward
Nicholls, commanding his Britannic majesty's forces
in the Floridas.
This sounds well.
NATIVES OF LOUISIANA!
On you the first call is made to assist in
liberating
from a faithless, imbecile government.
(Humph!)your paternal soil!Spaniards,
Frenchmen, Italians, and British!whether settled,
or residing for a time in Louisiana, on you, also, I
call to aid me in this just cause. The American
usurpation in this country must be abolished, and
the lawful owners of the soil put in possession.
I am at the head of a large body of Indians!
(Humph! British valour! British chivalry!)
well armed, disciplined and commanded by
British
officers. Be not alarmed, inhabitants of the
country, at our approach(Jupiter tonens!)
rest assured that these red men only burn
with an ardent desire of satisfaction for the wrongs
they have suffered from the Americans, to join
you in liberating these southern provinces from
their yoke, and drive them into those limits
formerly
prescribed by my sovereign.
Bah! this has a tinge of the Eton fledgling!
10*
The Indians have pledged themselves(
blessed
pledge! assuredly)in the most solemn
manner
not to injure in the slightest degree, the
persons
or properties of any but enemies to their
Spanish
or English fathers. A flag over any door,
whether
Spanish, French, or British, will be a certain
protection, nor dare any Indian put his foot on the
threshold thereof, under penalty of death from his
own countrymen. Not even an enemy will an
Indian
put to death, except resisting in arms.
Well, verily, the rhodomantine Captain must
have tamed his painted allies by some mode
unknown
to us. He thinks to conquer by
proclamation
.
The gallant Lawrence should have taught him
better. So he concludesaccept of my offers;
every thing I have promised in this paper, I
guarantee
you on the sacred honour of a British
officer
.
Given under my hand, at head-quarters.
These papers, Captain Lafitte, united with
your verbal communications, are indeed important,
said the governor, rising and approaching the
outlaw
,
with dignity and respect in his manner.
I do not wish to offend your feelings, sir; but
in the relation in which we stand to each other, I
must have authority for acting upon the knowledge
of their contents I possess. What other authority
than your own word, have I that they are genuine?
My person, your excellency! he replied, with
firmness and unchanged features; I am your
prisoner
till you can ascertain from a more credible
source, the genuineness of these letters, and the
truth of my statements.
Captain Lafitte, said the Governor, struck
with his manner, I cannot do otherwise than place
confidence in you. I believe you sincere. The
letters themselves bear upon their face, also, the
stamp of genuineness. I will call a council in the
morning of some of the principal officers of the
navy
,
army, and militia, and, informing them how I
obtained them, submit these letters to their
opinions
.
Captain Lafitte, he continued, in a more
friendly
tone, I know not the motives which induced
you all at once to adopt this honourable course. I
am willing to attribute it to the besta desire to
regain
your standing in society, to atone for your past
violence to the offended laws of your country, and,
to the patriotism of a good citizen. As the last I am
willing to consider you. There is my hand, sir, in
token of amity between us! The proscription
against you shall be revoked, and I shall feel proud
to rank you hereafter among the defenders of our
common country.
Lafitte, moved by the language of the governor,
replied, with emotion:
Again, your excellency, I feel my bosom glow
with virtuous emotions. You do justice to my
motives
,
and I am grateful to you. This reception I
had not anticipated when I determined to make you
the repository of a secret, on which, perhaps, the
tranquillity of the country depended; but I knew
that it was in the bosom of a just man, of a true
American, endowed with all other qualities which
give dignity to society, that I was placing this
confidence
,
and depositing the interests of my country.
The point I occupy, is doubtless considered
important
by the enemy. I have hitherto kept on the
defensive, on my own responsibility. Now, sir, I
offer my services to defend it for the state. If the
enemy attach that importance to the possession of
the place, they give me room to suspect they do,
they may employ means above my strength. In that
case, if you accept of my services, your intelligence
and the degree of your confidence in me, will
suggest
to you the propriety of strengthening the position
by your own troops. If your excellency should
decline
my services, at least I beg you will assist me
with your judicious council in this weighty affair.
I know not how to express the pleasure I
experience
in recognising this extraordinary change in
you, captain Lafitte, replied the governor; his
noble
features beaming with benevolence and
gratification
.
So far as my influence extends I accept
your services; but there must be a preliminary and
indispensable step! A pardon for all offences is
first necessary, and this can be granted only by the
president. Your disinterested and honourable
conduct
shall be made known to the council in the
morning, and if I can aid you in setting out in your
new and high minded career, my services and
counsels
are cheerfully at your command.
You can do so, your excellency! replied the
outlaw.
In what?
In procuring my pardon from the President, and
also that of my followers.
Cheerfully! I will at once, by the next post,
recommend
you to the favour of the executive.
I thank you, sir! said Lafitte, and turned away
with a full heart to conceal his emotion.
The reception he had met with by the governor,
whom he esteemedhis ready wish to forget his
offencesthe prospect of returning to the world, and
of regaining his attitude in society, came over him all
at once with powerful effect. Then, prominent, and
superior to all, the image of Constanza floated before
his mind, and his bosom swelled with renewed
being
.
The wishesthe hopesthe prayers, of many
days of penitence and remorse, were now about to
be realized! A career in the American army was
open before himfame, honour, and perhaps love, to
reward him; for, notwithstanding all the barriers
surrounding the young Castillian, he still cherished
a half-formed hope, that she might one day reward
him with her heart. He could not think that a
being
,
who had exerted such an influence over an
important
period of his life, who had thus turned the
current of his destinies, and by her gentle virtues
led him to love virtue for her sakeshould come
and depart again, as angels visit earth, and never
more lighten or influence his pilgrimage through the
world.
The governor remarked his emotion, and with
ready delicacy divining the cause, turned once more
his attention to the papers which he still held in
his hand.
Before I leave your excellency, said Lafitte,
after a few moments silencethe silence of a heart
too full for utteranceI desire to learn something
definite as to the course to be pursued with
reference
to these disclosures.
I have offered to defend for you that part of
Louisiana I now hold. But not as an outlaw, would
I be its defender! In that confidence, with which
you have inspired me, I offer to restore to the state
many citizens, now under my command, who, in the
eyes of your excellency, have perhaps forfeited that
sacred title. I offer you them, however, such as
you could wish to find them, ready to exert their
utmost efforts in defence of their country. As I
have remarked before, the point I occupy is of
great importance in the present crisis. I tender not
only my own services to defend it, but those of all
I command, and the only reward I ask, is, that a
stop be put to the proscription against me and my
adherents, by an act of oblivion for all that has been
done hitherto. I am, your excellency, and his
voice betrayed emotion as he continued, the stray
sheep, wishing to return to the sheep-fold!
*
*
See Latour's Memoirs of Louisiana: Appendix, page xiv.
If you
were thoroughly acquainted with the nature of my
offences, I should appear much less guilty, and still
worthy to discharge the duties of a good citizen and
an honest patriot. I might expatiate on the proofs
of patriotism I have shown this evening, but I let
the fact speak for itself. I beg you to submit to
your council and to the executive what I have
advanced
.
The answer of your council I will await
until to-morrow noon, when I will send for it, by
one who will not be molested. Should it be
unfavourable
to my sincere prayers, I shall turn my
back upon the dazzling offers of the British
government
,
and for ever leave a soil, which, dearly as I
love, I am thought unworthy to defend! Thus will
I avoid the imputation of having co-operated with
the enemy, towards an invasion on this point I
holdwhich cannot fail to take placeand rest
secure
in the acquittal of my own conscience.
My dear sir, said the governor with
undisguised
admiration of his sentiments; your
praiseworthy
wishes shall be laid before the gentlemen
whose opinions and councils I shall invite early
to-morrow
,
to aid me in this important affair. Your
messenger shall receive an answer by noon. I will
also confer upon the subject, with the commanding
general on his return. Perhaps your pardon, he
added hesitatingly, may rest upon a condition. I
have thought of proposing to the council, that your
own, and the services of your adherents be accepted
to join the standard of the United States; and, if your
conduct, meet the approbation of the general
commanding
,
I will assure you of his co-operation with
me, in a request to the President, to extend to all
engaged, a free and full pardon.
With these conditions, I most willingly
comply
!
said Lafitte. I must now leave you sir,
but, he added, laying his hand upon his heart,
with sentiments of permanent gratitude!
Have you the pass-word of the night, Captain
Lafitte? inquired the governor, turning to the table.
I have, your excellency.
Farewell then, sir! I am your friend. When
we meet again, I trust it will be in the ranks of the
American army; said the governor smiling, and
extending his hand to the chief.
Lafitte seized, and grasping it warmly, pressed it
to his lips, and precipitately left the room.
Passing through the hall, he was re-joined by
Thodore, with whom he left the mansion, and after
replying to the challenge of the sentinel at the gate,
the two passed at a rapid pace down the street.
The moon was just rising, and they had been
walking but a few minutes, when a clattering of
horses' hoofs and the ringing of arms were heard at
the extremity of one of the long streets, intersecting
that, they were traversing, and in a few moments,
with nodding plumes, ringing swords, and
jingling
spurs, the general in chief with his staff, and
followed by two or three mounted citizens, turned
the angle of the street, and dashed past them down
the road to his head quarters.
The outlaw and his companion had nearly gained
their boat, and were walking in the shadow of
fort St. Charles, along the canal, where it was
secured, having met no one but the horsemen, and
occasionally, a guard who challenged and allowed
them to pass, since they had left the house, when
their attention was attracted by a figure gliding
along the side of the canal Marigny, and evidently
seeking to escape observation.
They drew back within the shadow of a building
on the banks, when the figure passed them, almost
crawling upon the ground. Avoiding the street,
immediately
afterward, he dropped without noise into
the water, swum to the side where they stood, and
cautiously ascending the leve or bank, paused a
moment and peered over the top.
Apparently satisfied that he was unobserved, he
then crept along to the side of the fort and lingering
a moment, disappeared around the angle, leaving a
paper affixed to the wall.
Here is mischief brewing. said LafitteDid
you observe that fellow closely Thodore?
Yes, I thought at first it was Cudjoe.
Nonohe is too tall for himwe will see
what he has been at.
Followed by Thodore, he left the canal and
advanced
,
until he stood under the walls of the fort.
It is too dark to read in this pale moon; we
will take the paper to the light, he said passing
round the fort, to a lamp burning in the gate-way,
and over the head of a sentinel posted there.
Ho, who goes there?he challenged as they
approached. Answering the challenge, Lafitte
added;
Here, guard, is a paper, but now stuck upon the
wall of your fort by a skulking slave, who just
disappeared
among yonder china treesI fear it
hodes mischief in these perilous times! and as he
spoke, he held up the placard to the light. On it
was printed in large letters both in French and
Spanish,
Louisianians! remain quiet in your houses; your slaves
shall be preserved to you, and your property respected.
We make war only against Americans
.
Well, this is most politic`said Lafitte,' our
enemy fights with printed proclamations, signed too
by admiral Cochrane and major general Keane!
Preserve slaves! These Englishmen have shone me
what reliance is to be placed on their promise to
preserve slaves to their masters. Did they not by
their insurrection, expect to conquer Louisiana?
The soldier who heard him read the placard, was
about to call for two or three comrades within the
guard room, to pursue and arrest the black, when
Lafitte interrupted him.
Hold, my good man! I know his figure, and the
way he has taken. I will pursue him! and adding
to Thodore now we will show our attachment to
the cause we have embraced, followed the slave.
In a few moments, after passing two other
placards
,
which Thodore tore down, they saw him
his form hardly distinguishable among the trunks
of the treesapparently engaged in affixing
another
of the proclamations to a limb. They cautiously
approached, when the negro discovering them,
and supposing himself unseen, drew himself up
into the tree to escape detection as they passed
by. But this action was detected; and Lafitte
walking rapidly forward, before he could conceal
himself, caught him by one of his feet.
The negro drew a long knife and would have
plunged it into the arm of his captor, over whose
head it gleamed as he raised it for the blow, had
he not caught his hand, and hurled him with violence
to the ground.
Oh mossee beg a mercy mossee, pauvre ngre
nigger gibbee all up, he cried rolling upon the
ground in pain. Lafitte grasped him by the arm
and drew from his breast a large bundle of placards.
Who gave these to you slave?
Mossee de English ossifer.
Where is he?
Down by mossee Laronde's plantation; he tellee
me stick um up in de city; dey stick um up all 'long
on de fence down de Leve mossee. Now mossee,
good, sweet, kind mossee, lettee poor ngre go, he
hab tell mossee all de libbing trufh.
You must go with me, replied his captor,
heedless of the chattering and the prayers of the
slave; and leading him by the arm, he returned and
delivered him to the guard at the fort.
Vol. II.11
Take him to the governor in the morning, he
said to him as he called some of his comrades to
receive him.
Thank you Monsieur, said the guard, as
Lafitte
turned away. You are a good patriot. I
would all the citizens were like you. Will you
take wine?
No, Monsieur.
Who, shall I tell the governor, has taken this
prisoner?
He wrote the word
Lafitte
, with a pencil
upon one of the bills, and folding it up, handed it to
him; and before the guard could decipher it, he had
disappeared below the leve. Springing into his boat,
he waked the Irishman, who had fallen asleep, and
sought once more, through the chain of guard-boats,
the barge he had left secreted at the mouth of the
artificial inlet to the bayou. Then releasing his
Irish prisoner, with a warning to be less afraid of
alligators, and to keep better watch when on post,
he entered his own boat; and before the break of
day, was again concealed among the huts of the
fishermen, which he had left early on the preceding
evening.
CHAPTER V.
The genuineness of the letters was questioned by the council
convened
by the governor; and they advised him to hold no
communication
with the Barritarians. Major General Viller alone dissented
from the general decision. This officer, as well as the governor, who,
presiding in council, could not give his opinion, was well satisfied as to
the authenticity of the letters and the sincerity of the Barritarian
outlaw
.
The expedition against the island was hastened, and soon sailed
under the command of Commondore Patterson.
Latour
.
DECISION OF THE COUNCILITS RECEPTION BY LAFITTEHIS
DESTINATIONA STORM.
The
decision of the council, convened by the
Governor
of Louisiana, in the executive department of
the government house the following morning, for
the purpose of laying before it the letters of the
British officers, and consulting with them respecting
the offers of the outlaw, is recorded in the history
of that period.
After communicating the information contained
in the letters, and stating the manner in which they
had fallen into his hands, and his reasons for
believing
them genuine, the governor submitted for their
consideration, two questions.
Is it your opinion, gentlemen, that these letters
are genuine? andis it proper, as governor of this
state, that I should hold intercourse, or enter into
any official correspondence with the Barritarian
outlaw
and his associates?
After a warm discussion, an answer was returned
in the negative, and with but one exception,
unanimously
.
Major General Viller stood alone in the
affirmative
.
This gentleman, as well as Governor Claiborne,
who, president of the council, was disqualified from
giving his opinion, was not only convinced of the
authenticity of the papers brought by Lafitte, but
believed
he and his adherents might be so employed
at the present crisis, as greatly to contribute to the
safety of the state, and the annoyance of the enemy.
With this impolitic decision, which time showed
to be unjust and premature, the council broke up.
So far indeed, were they from placing confidence
in Lafitte, that they suggested to a naval officer
forming one of the council, whom we have
before
introduced to the reader, who had been for
several
days fitting out a flotilla destined for the island
of Barritariaa descent upon which, having been
some months in contemplationthe propriety of
hastening his preparations for the expedition.
Proceeding from the council chamber to his
vessel
,
the commodore found he could immediately get
under weigh. The same evening, therefore, taking
with him a detachment of infantry, he gave the
signal
for sailing, and moved down the river towards
the destined point of attack.
About noon, the Barritarian chief, ignorant of the
proceedings in which he was so deeply interested,
sent Thodore to the city, for the purpose of
receiving
the reply of the governor.
Well, Thodore, what news? inquired he,
standing in the door of one of the rude fishermen's
huts, as the boat, which had conveyed the youth,
appeared
in sight from the concealment of the narrow
banks of the creek, lined with tall grass and
cypresses
which, stretching across from either side nearly
met over the water;Saw you the governor?
I did, monsieur, and a gentleman of noble
presence
he is, replied Thodore with animation; he
spoke of you in such terms, that I could not but
like him.
But what said he? interrogated the chief
anxiously
,
springing into the barge by the side of the
youth, Heard you the decision of the council?
Here is a note for you, which he gave me.
He seized it and read hurriedly
M. Lafitte must regret equally with myself, the
decision of the council. It is against your sincerity
and the genuineness of the letters. General Viller
alone, was of my opinion, of which you are already
informed. Be patient, dear sirtake no rash steps.
I have unlimited confidence in you. I will consult
with the commanding general at the earliest
convenience
remain
firm, and your wishes may yet
be achieved. You could not have shown your
sincerity
better, than in apprehending the slave last
night. This seal of good faith shall be remembered,
and will materially advance your suit.
Is this the way my proffers are received? said
Lafitte fiercely, with a deep execration, crushing the
note in his clenched hand, while his face grew livid
with passion and disappointment; Is it thus I am
treatedmy feelings trifled withmy word
doubted
myself
scorneddespised! If they will not
have my aid, their invaders shall, he shouted. To
your oars, mento your oars! he said, turning to
his boat's crew. We must see Barritaria to-night
I have work for all of you.
And for me too, ugh? said inquiringly, a tall,
gray-headed
and dark-visaged Indian, arrayed in loose
fisherman's
trowsers, his head and neck passed through
the aperture of a gaily-dyed Spanish ponto, coming
11*
forth from the hut, and standing as he spoke,
supported
by a boat-hook, on the verge of the bank.
Yes, Chitalusa, but not with me. You are
better here. I will soon find you other fish to
catch. Mark me Chitalusa, said the pirate,
hoarsely
,
in the ear of the Indianbefore New-Year's
eve, you will find a red snake, with scales of steel,
and more dangerous than the green serpent of your
tribe, with ten thousand human feet beneath his
belly, winding up this bayou, past your hut.
Ugh! me un'stan', said the Indian, his eyes
sparkling with pleasure, but whether malignant, or
a mere expression of delight, it was difficult to
determine
.
Then wait here, under cover, till you see it, and
I will then find work for you, chief, said Lafitte,
springing into the boat and seating himself in
silence
.
As the men plied their oars, and moved swiftly
down the bayou, the Indian, who was the last of
his name and racewith whom would expire the
proud appellation, centuries before recognised among
other tribes, as the synonyme for intelligence,
civilization
,
and courage
The Natchez
! The
injured
,
persecuted, slaughtered, and unavenged
Natchez
the
Grecians of the aboriginal nations of North
America! The eloquent language of a native poet,
with truth and feeling, might have flowed from the
lips of the old exileexile, on the very lands over
which his fathers reigned kingsnow doomed to
seek a precarious existence, among the Spanish
fishermen of the lakes, wilder, ruder even than
himself
:
They waste us: aye like April snows,
In the warm noon we melt away;
And fast they follow as we go,
Towards the setting day
Till they shall fill the land, and we
Be driven into the western sea.
As the boat receded, he muttered, Ugh! de
snake! Chitalusa know! me know to much.
Him tink Indian bad as him. Me let he see me no
bad. Me let no red snakeInglish snake, ugh!
come here! Me no will.
At once a new thought flashed upon his mind,
and entering his hut, he armed himself with a rifle,
took his paddle from its beckets over the door,
launched his canoe, and jumping into it, paddled
rapidly in the direction opposite to that taken by
Lafitte, and towards the artificial outlet of the
bayou
,
into the Mississippi.
For several hours, the oarsmen rowed with that
heavy, regular movement of the sweeps, which is
almost
mechanical to the thorough bred seamen.
No sound but the regular dipping of the four oars
and the low rattling as they played in the
row-locks
,
the occasional splash of an alligator, as he
sought concealment beneath the surface of the
water
,
or the heavy flapping of the wings, and shrill
cry, of some disturbed heron or other water bird,
broke the silence of the wild region through which
they moved. The barge all at once emerged from
the narrow and gloomy pass which it had been
threading during the afternoon, into a broader sheet
of water, and at the same moment, the setting sun
shone bright upon the summit of The Temple,
which stood on an angle at the intersection of three
bayous, two of which led by various routes into the
bay of Barritaria; the third, was that which they
had just descended.
Lafitte sat in the stern of the boat, with his
arms folded and his head dropped despondingly
upon
his breast, an attitude he insensibly fell into
after the first burst of passion, elicited by the result
of his application, had passed away.
His better resolves held again their influence
over him; his anger and resentment, by degrees
subsided, and he had come to the determination to
exile himself, disband his followers, and depart
for ever from that country he was thought too base
to serve.
I have won the confidence, and I believe the
respect, of one honourable man. This, at least,
will I endeavour to retain, he said, abruptly
addressing
Thodore. He has said he will counsel with
the general in chief. I place my cause, then, in
the hands of a brave man. Suppose I see him
myself
?
Ha! that will doI will! England, he
cried, with energy, thou hast not made me a
renegade
yet! nor, he added mentally, will you,
Constanza, find me recreant to my pledged faith.
I will not let the prejudiced decisions of a few men,
thus turn me from the straight-forward path I have
chosen. Impulsive they call me.Well, impulse
shall be bridled, and I will henceforward lead her
not she, me.
Ship your oars, men! he added aloud, as they
came to a little inlet, at the foot of a mound, just
large enough to contain the boat.
The dripping oars rose simultaneously into the
air, and were then laid lengthways upon the thwarts.
Cudjoe sprang out, as the bows touched the bank,
and secured the boat to a tree. Lafitte,
warning
his men not to go far away, accompanied by
Thodore, stepped on shore, and ascended one of
those mounds of shells thrown up by the Indians,
long before the earliest era of American history,
filled with human bones, and evidently designed,
either as religious, or funereal monuments. From
the prevalence of the former opinion, this
congregation
of mounds where our party stopped, has
been denominated The Temple. On the highest
of them, according to the tradition of the country,
the idolatrous worshippers preserved burning, a
perpetual fire. Some attempts at one period, had
been made to fortify it, traces of which still
existed
.
If I was superstitious, said Thodore, as,
emerging from the trees near the margin of the
bayou
,
they came in full view of the largest mound,
I should believe that the sunwhich it is said the
Indians worshippedin reproof of our unbelief of his
divinity, and detestation to the truth of their religion,
has kindled a flame upon the summit of the Temple.
Lafitte looked up, and saw that an appearance
like fire rested upon its topthe reflection of a
lingering
,
light red sunbeam shot from the lurid sun,
then angrily disappearing in the west.
There is poetry, if not truth, in your language,
Thodore! replied the chief, his spirit soothed by
the mild influence of the hour. How beautiful
the theory of their religion! Worshippers of that
element, which is the purifier of all things! Next
to the invisible Godwhom they knew notin
their child-like ignorance, and with the touching
poetry, which seems to have been the soul of the
simple Indian's nature, they sought out that, alone,
of all His works, which most gloriously manifested
Himself to his created intelligences. They bowed
their faces to the earth, at his rising and setting,
and worshipped the bright sun, as their Creator,
Preserver, and God! Author of light and heat, of
time and seasonsvisible, yet unapproachable!
What more appropriate object could they have
chosen
as the corner stone upon which to raise a
superstructure
of natural religion? For it is our
nature
,
Thodore, to be religious! All men, and all
races of men, have always been worshippers, either
of truth or falsehood! Does not this choice alone
prove, that, if heathens, they approached nearer to
true religion, in their worship, than all other nations
ignorant of divine revelation? Does it not show
the dignity and refinement of the Indian's mind
the poetry of his heartthe purity of his
imagination
?
On their altars burned a perpetual fire!
What a beautiful representation of their divinity!
How infinitely is this pure emblem above the stocks
and stones of the civilized idolaters of old Greece
and Rome! How etherial and elevated the
conceptions
of such a people! Yet we call them
barbarians
savagesbrutes!
If they are brutes, we
have made them so. The vices of the Europeans,
like a moral leprosy, have diseased their minds, and
blackened their hearts! If they are degraded, we
have debased them! If they are polluted, we have
laid our hand upon them!Ha! he said quickly,
yonder sun-beam glows on that bush like fire. It
is a flame, indeed! Your idea, my Thodore, was
very beautiful! But were it not better and more
in unison with our fortunes, my boy! to regard it
as a beacon, lighting us to fame; a bright omen of
good!Go up the mound, and see if you can
discover
any thing moving in either bayou. I shall
give the men an hour's rest, and then start again.
He stopped on a small mound they had just
ascended
,
and leaning against a cypress tree, crowning
its summit, he soon became wrapped in reflections
upon the presented crisis of his life and the
probable
issue of his plans.
Presently, his eye was arrested by a white object,
dimly seen in the twilight, rolling along on the
ground near his feet. It was round, and at every
turn displayed the eyeless sockets and hideous grin
of a skull. He gazed upon it with surprise, but did
not move; and a fascination seemed to chain him to
the spot, and fasten his eyes upon the loathsome
object.
It came nearer and nearer, and now struck with
a hollow sound against his foot. He was about to
spring from the fearful contact, when the head and
claws of a crab were protruded from the cavities, as
if to ascertain and remove the obstacle to its
advancement
.
With a smile of derision at this humiliation of
his species, as he discovered the cause of this
strange locomotion, he raised the skull with its
inmate, and gazed on it for a moment, with a lip, in
which bitterness was mingled with contempt.
And this is MAN! the image of God! the
tenement
of immortal mind! Poor crab, thou knowest
not what kingly throne thou hast usurped! Well,
why not a crab as well as brain! The skull can walk
the earth full as well, and to as good a purpose!
And is this our end! he added, to become
thus
at last!a habitation for reptiles! And shall
I
too
come to this? Shall this head, which now throbs
with life, and he raised his hand to his temples,
which can thinkplanoriginateat last be no
more than this?so helpless as to be borne about
by such a creeping thing! Where is that conscious
something, which once supplied this crab's place?
Who has displaced it? Death! Death? and what
is death?Methinks it were better to be like this
glaring ball, than to be as I am! Here, he
continued
placing his hand upon it, here is no sense
of passing events; of joy or suffering; of treachery
or friendship; of despair or ambition; of praise or
insult. SeeI can place my foot upon it, and it
rises not against me to avenge the insult! Happy,
happy nothingness! But is it nothingness? Although
the mind lives not in this glaring shell, which,
without
tongue, discourses most eloquently to the living
may it not exist somewhere? Here I see it not!
It is perceptible to no sense! Yet reasonhope
fear, tell me it is not extinct. Heaven never made
man for such an end as
this!
There must be
deeper purpose than we can fathoma cause
remoter
than we can reach, why we were made!
Eternity! eternity!thou art no bug-bear to frighten
children with. I feelwould to God I felt it not!
that thou art a stern and fearful reality.
Well, my boy, saw you aught? he inquired
hastily, resuming his usual tone and manner as the
youth appeared.
No, Monsieurthe night thickens so fast, that
it is impossible to see far down the bayousI think
we shall have a storm.
There is no doubt of it, if the heavens speak
truly, said Lafitte, gazing upon masses of black
clouds drifting low above their heads, increasing in
density and blackness every moment, and gathering
to a head with that rapidity, characteristic of storms
in that climate.
Thodore, tell the men to spread the tarpaulin
over the boat for a shelter from the rain.
The youth communicated the order, and was
returning
,
when a flash of lightning, accompanied by
a peal of thunder, loud and abrupt, like the near
explosion of artillery, gleamed like flame through the
woods, and rove to the roots the cypress against
which the chief leaned, with the skull still extended
in his hand, upon whichresuming his reflections as
the youth left him to execute his order, he still
musedand laid him prostrate and as senseless as
the shell he held, upon the ground. With an
exclamation
of surprise and terror, Thodore sprung
forward, and kneeling by his side, called loudly upon
the crew to aid in resuscitating him. They bore
him to the boat, and the youth, at the moment
recollecting
the hut of a fisherman, situated about a
mile below the Temple, ordered the men to resume
their oars and pull to that place.
CHAPTER VI.
The government of the State, informed of the proceedings of the
British at Barritaria, and doubtful of the good faith of the outlaws,
fitted out a flotilla, with great despatch. The pirates prepared for
resistance
;
but finally abandoned their vessels, and dispersed. Their
store-houses, fortress, vessels, and a considerable booty, fell into the
power of the Americans. Lafitte, who escaped, proposed to
surrender
himself to Governor Claiborne, and his confidence appeared to
require that indulgence should be shown to him and his party.
Marboi's History of Louisiana
.
FISHERMANILLNESSCANNONADINGAPPROACH THE ISLAND
[THE OUTLAW'S REPLY TO THE ENGLISH OFFICER.
With
the head of his friend and benefactor
upon
his lap, and in great agitation of mind, the youth
guided the boat through the bayou, his course
lighted
by the lightning, which now became incessant.
Ho, the boat! shouted a voice from the bank,
as a flash of lightning showed them the fisherman's
cot, in a bend of the bayou.
Grand Terre! replied Thodore.
Grand Terre it is, answered the man; who
now came from behind the tree, with an English
musket in his hand, an old canvass cap on his head,
covered with signs of the cross, done in red and
black painta blue woollen shirt, and a pair of duck
trowsers, cut off at the knee, leaving the portion of
his legs below it bare. His head was gray and
bushy, and an opulence of grisly beard and
whiskers
encircled his tawny face, which was marked
with arched brows and lambent dark eyesa sharp
Vol. II.12
aquiline nose, small mouth, and thin lips,
displaying
when parted, a row of even and very white
teeth, which seemed to bid defiance to the ravages
of time!
Where is the Captain? he inquired.
Senseless, from a stroke of lightning! replied
the youth; we must claim your hospitality,
Manuelillo
.
Pobre capitan! with all my heart. Bring him
into the cot, hombres, he said to the men.
Pobre
capitanes mateono? Seor Thodore?
No! there is life, but he is insensible.
In a short time, the chief was laid upon the rude
bed of dried grass and rushes, constituting the
couch of the fisherman, who, in addition to his
piscal
profession, was also a privateersman or
smuggler
,
as interest prompted, or taste allured.
Slowly yielding to their exertions and skill, the
stagnant life once more received action, and he
returned
to consciousness. In the morning, a fever
succeeded, which increased in violence during the
day. That night he became delirious, and wildly
raved like a maniaccalling on Constanza,
D'Oyley, Henri, Gertrude,names often on
his burning lips, during his illness. For five days,
his fever and delirium continued, without
abatement
.
His disorder, then assumed a more
favourable
character, and he began rapidly to
convalesce
.
On the seventh day, just before noon, he was
seated at the door of the hut, under the shade of a
tree, which grew in front, giving orders to his
boatmen
,
who were preparing the barge for departure
that evening, when a heavy cannonading reached
his ears, borne upon the south wind over the level
country, from the quarter of Barritaria, which was
about twenty miles distant.
Do you hear that, sir? said Thodore, from
within the hutwho, during his illness, had
watched
over him with untiring assiduity and tenderness.
What means it, Manuel? demanded the chief,
starting.
I don't know, seor; there must be some
fighting
between your vessels and the cruisers.
I suspect as much. Quick, with that boat,
men! he added, with animation. We must away
from this.
With a strength unlooked for, he stepped into the
boat, after grasping warmly the hand of the old
fisherman, and thanking him for his attention and
kindness, and was soon swiftly moving on his way
to the island.
As he approached, the firing increased, and
became
more distinct. Night set in before they
reached the mouth of the bayou, from which, as
they emerged into the bay, they could see far over
the water, a flame apparently rising from a burning
vessel. The cannonading had ceased several hours,
and it was now too dark to see across the bay, or
distinguish the outline of the island.
There has been warm work, Thodore, said
Lafitte. I am afraid we have been attacked by
a superior force.
It may be Massa Cap'um Pattyson, said
Cudjoe
;
he tinky catch Cudjoe, and make sailor ob
him, when in de boat, when you gone to see de
gobernor
.
What is that? said Lafitte, quickly. Press
you?
I now recollect, answered Thodore, as I
went for the governor's reply, it was rumoured in
the streets, that Commodore Patterson was
completing
his crew by every exertion, and that he
was to sail the same evening, on some expedition.
It may have been Barritaria.
You are right Thodore, he has attacked our
camp. Set the sail and spring to your oars, men;
we must know at once if our fears are true.
Having set their sail, their speed increased, and
shooting rapidly away from the mouth of the
bayou
,
they steered across the bay. They were
within a league of the island, when a barge full of
men, was discovered a short distance ahead.
Ship your oars; see to your arms, men! said
Lafitte, shifting the helm so as to weather the boat.
We are now more likely to meet foes than friends
in these waters.
As he spoke, the strange boat hailed, while the
click of several pistols was heard from her by the
pirate and his party, who answered that hostile
preparation
with similar sounds of defiance.
Ho! the boat ahoy! hailed a voice in Spanish.
It is Sebastiano, said Thodore hastily, as he
recognized the voice of the person hailing.
Camaradas! replied Lafitte.
Ah captain, is that you, exclaimed a rough
voice with a strong French accent. We thought
you had gone to pay off old scores in the other
world.
I have been on business, Belluche, connected
with our safety, and have been detained by illness.
But the news, the news! Lieutenant Belluche, he
added with impatience as the boats came in
contact
.
Bad enough, my good captain, said Sebastiano,
interposing in reply, bad enough for one day's
work, in proof of which, seor, I refer you to this
handful of men, who are all that remain of the
pretty Juli, who by the same token, is burned to
the water's edge. May the grande diable have the
burning of those who compelled me with my own
hand to set her on fire. But it was necessity,
captain
.
I can prove to you it was necessity.
Be brief, Sebastiano! What has happened?
Who are the aggressors, Belluche? What means
the firing I have heard to-day? Be brief and tell
me!
This morning, said the whilom captain of the
Lady of the Gulf, between eight and nine, we
saw a fleet of small vessels and gun-boats standing
in for the island. Our squadron lay at anchor
within the pass, and on seeing the fleet I ordered
the Carthagenian flag to be hoisted on all the
vessels
.
As the strangers approached, I got under
weigh with the whole fleet, including prizes, which
made ten in number, and formed in order of battle,
in case the intentions of the fleet should be hostile.
As the evidences of their hostile character
thickened
,
I sent boats in various directions to the main
land to give the alarm, and ordered my men to light
fires along the coast, as signals to our friends ashore
that we were about to be attacked. The enemy
stood in, and formed into a line of battle near the
entrance of the harbour. Their force consisted of
six gun-vessels, a tender, mounting one six pounder
and full of men, and a launch, mounting one twelve
pound carronade, and a large schooner, called the
Carolina.
On discovering these demonstrations of battle on
their part, and not being in the best condition to
withstand them, I hoisted a white flag at the fore
on board the Lady of the Gulf, an American flag at
the mainmast, and the Carthagenian flag, at the
topping
lift. The enemy replied, with a white flag at
his main. I now took my boat, and went from
vessel
to vessel to ascertain the disposition of the crews
for fighting, and none but Captain Getzendanner,
and Sebastiano and their men were for awaiting the
attack. I in vain tried to convince them of the
expediency
of fighting to save our vessels.
I then determined that the Lady of the Gulf
should not fall into the enemy's hands, and telling
12*
Captain Getzendanner what I intended to do, I
returned
on board, and fixing a train in the hole, and
setting the rigging on fire, I took to the boats with
my crew. Getzendanner and Sebastiano did the
same, while the other cowardly paltroons deserted
their vessels and took to their oars, and pulled for
the main land. The enemy no sooner saw the
flame rising from the schooner, than he hauled down
the flag of truce, and made the signal for battle;
hoisting with it a broad white flag bearing the words,
`PARDON TO DESERTERS,' knowing that we had not
a few from the army and navy, among our
villainous
,
cowardly, runaway gang.
The enemy run in and took possession of the
vessels, while a detachment landed upon the island,
and destroyed our buildings and fortifications. All
this I witnessed from the main land, where we had
retired. The enemy's fleet is now outside,
including
our own, numbering in all seventeen sail.
They will probably get under weigh in the morning
for the Balize.
We, concluded Sebastiano, who had waited
with much impatience for an opportunity to speak,
have just returned from the island, where I have
been since they left, to have occular demonstration
of the true state of things, and an old woman might
as well hold good her pantry against a party of
half-starved recruits, as we could have held the old
island; and this admits of the clearest
demonstration
,
captain.
Lafitte listened to this recital in silence; nor did
he speak for some moments after the commander
of the Lady of the Gulf had completed his account
of the attack upon the piratical hold, by the
American
flotilla. This expedition was under the
command
of that naval officer, whom we first introduced
to the reader, looking over a map with the
commanding
general at his head quarters, a young and
gallant man, whose ambition to signalize his
command
and benefit his country by the destruction of
the buccaneering horde, who had so long infested
the south-western shores of Louisiana, had rendered
him, with the majority of the council called by the
governor, incredulous to the extraordinary proffers
of the pirate.
If blame in reference to this decision could be
attached to either party, Lafitte felt that it was
justly fastened upon himself.
It is right, he said, after reflecting for a
few moments upon the communication of his
officer
.
It is but justnot themnot himdo I
censure, but myselfmy past career of crime and
contempt of those healthy laws which govern
society. I blame them not. It would be stranger if
they should have believed me. After a few
moments
pause he added earnestly, this shall not
change me; they shall yet know and believe, that
I acted from motives they must honour. They
shall learn that they have injured me by their
decisions
.
Injured! But let it passmy country shall
have my arm and single cutlass, if no more! and
your's too, my boy? he said to Thodore.
Wherever you are, my benefactor, you will
find me by your side, exclaimed the youth warmly.
I knew it Thodore, I knew it, replied Lafitte,
returning the enthusiastic grasp of his hand.
Where, away now Belluche?
To the city, captain! We hear of fighting about
to go on there; we may perhaps find something to
do.
Sebastiano, Belluche, my worthy comrades and
friends, and you my brave men all! the Americans
have destroyed our fleet; but they have done only
justice. If I know all of you who are in that boat,
like myself, you are Americans by birth or adoption.
Fight not against your country, draw every cutlass in
her defence; forgive her injuries, and fight for her.
The tyrant of England seeks to enslave her; meet
him foot to foot, blade to blade. Endeavour to atone
for your wrongs to your country by devotion to her
cause. Fighting is your tradebut fight now on
the right side. What say you my men? Sebastiano,
stand you for or against your country, in this
struggle
?
Viva Louisianaviva la patriaviva Lafitte!
shouted the men.
That is as it should be my brave fellows, if you
are faithful in the cause you espouse you may yet
get government to wink at the past, and if any of you
choose to follow honest livelihoods, the way will
then be open before you. To the city, I will soon
follow, gather all our scattered force and persuade
them to adopt the same course. You will hear of
me on the third evening from this at the cabaret of
Pedro Torrio, on Rue Royale. I must now visit
the island. Where is Getzendanner?
He has taken the western bayou to the city, I
suspect, replied Belluche,
Tell him our plans if you meet with him, and
hold out to him pardon. He will acquiesce, I think,
he said laughing, for there is a fair frow in New
York, he would fain supply his lost rib with; but
she wont take him without a license from the
President
.
I depend on you both, he added more
seriously
to collect our followers and unite them to
the American party.
With a shout from the crews of each, the boats
separated, and in an hour afterward, Lafitte reached
the island and secured his boat in the narrow cove or
inlet from which he had unmoored it, under very
different
circumstances, ten days before, on
embarking
to lay before the governor the letters of the
British officers.
The next morning the chief who had remained
all night in the boat, was awakened by a gun, which
on rising, and gaining a slight elevation on the
island, he discovered to be the signal for the
enemy's
fleet, with his prizes, to get under weigh.
With calm and unchanging features, he watched
their departure, and as the last sail disappeared on
the horizon, he said turning to Thodore,
I have only to wait to give the Englishman his
answer, he said with a bitter smile, and then
return
to New Orleans, and there welcome my
captured
fleet.
There is a sail south of us, exclaimed
Theodore
.
I see it, replied the chief, it may be the
English brig coming in for my reply, although I did
not expect her before evening. The vessel which
attracted their observation, in the course of an hour
showed the square rig and armament of a brig of
war. Approaching within half a mile of the island,
she put off a boat, which pulled directly for the
island
.
What answer shall you give them now,
monsieur'
?
inquired Thodore doubtfully, watching the
face of the outlaw, and anxious to know if he would
accept the proposals of the British, now that he
had received such treatment from the American
government.
Lafitte made no reply but hastened to meet the
boat, which grounded, as Thodore spoke, upon the
beach.
You are welcome to my fortress, gentlemen!
you have no doubt come for my answer, he said
addressing the midshipman who commanded the
boat. So your captain did not like to trust
himself
on shore again. Well, he added in a
melancholy
voice, he might have come now in all safety
he would have little to fear. What says captain
Lockyer?
He desired me to give you this sealed paper,
and await your answer respecting his proposed
alliance
with you, replied the youth, giving him a
pacquet addressed to him.
You have not long to wait, replied Lafitte,
receiving
the pacquet; and taking a pencil from the
officer, he wrote upon the back,
No terms with tyrants
!
And giving it back to him he sternly said, There
is my answer! Then turning and taking the arm
of Thodore, he walked away to his boat, which lay
on the opposite side of the island.
CHAPTER VII.
After the invasion of the state became inevitable, the expediency
of inviting the Barritarians to our standard was generally admitted.
The governor conferred with the major general, and with his
approbation
,
issued general orders inviting them to join the army. These
orders
tended to bring to our standard many brave men and excellent
artillerists, whose services contributed greatly to the safety of
Louisiana
,
and received the highest approbation of the commanding general.
Subsequently, the President, by proclamation, granted them a full and
entire pardon.
Latour's Memoirs of the war
.
THE BARRITARIANSBATTLE OF THE SIEGELAFITTE AND THE
STRANGER.
The
subsequent events, immediately preceding
the decisive battle of the eighth of January, having
no material connexion with our tale, we shall briefly
pass by. Lafitte returned to the city, and again
offered
his services to his country, with those of as
many of his former adherents as he could assemble.
After the disastrous capture of the American
gun-boats
by the British, the invasion of the state was
deemed inevitable, and in the perilous condition of
the country, it was thought good policy by those
entrusted with the public safety, to avail themselves
of the services of men accustomed to war, and
whose perfect knowledge of the coasts and the
various
bayous leading from the sea to the capital,
might render their aid of great importance to the
enemy, who it was now generally known, had in
vain and with great offers, entreated them to repair
to their standard. Although the expediency of
uniting
them to the American standard, was general y
admitted, it was indispensably necessary that they
should receive pardon for all real or supposed
offences against the laws. This could only be
granted by the President of the United States.
Governor Claiborne, whose faith in the outlaw
remained
unshaken, and who regretted the attack on
Barritaria, so far as it rendered, by breaking them
up, the forces of the outlaws less available to the
country, conferred on the subject with the major
general in command.
The result of this conference was very different
from that of the council convened by the governor,
and with the approbation of the commanding
general
,
he issued the following general order.
The Governor of Louisiana, informed that
many
individuals implicated in the offences heretofore
committed against the United States at Barritaria,
express a willingness at the present crisis to enrol
themselves and march against the enemy
He does hereby invite them to join the standard
of the United States, and is authorized to say, should
their conduct in the field meet the approbation of the
major general, that, that officer will unite with the
governor in a request to the President of the United
States, to extend to each and every individual, so
marching and acting, a free and full pardon.
These general orders were placed in the hands
of Lafitte, who circulated them among his dispersed
followers, most of whom readily embraced the
conditions
of pardon they held out. In a few days
many
brave men and skilful artillerists, whose services
contributed greatly to the safety of the invaded
state, flocked to the standard of the United States,
and by their conduct, received the highest
approbation
of the commanding general.
In anticipation of our narrative, we will here
mention
,
that previous to their adjournment, the
legislature
of the state, recommended the Barritarians as
proper objects for the clemency of the President,
who issued a proclamation upon the subject,
bearing
date the sixth of February, eighteen hundred
and fifteen, and transmitted it, officially, to the
governor
of Louisiana, by the secretary of state,
granting
to them a full and entire pardon.
We will now return from this digression to
Lafitte
,
the individual whose personal acts are the
subject
of our tale.
The morning of the eighth of January was
ushered
in with the discharge of rockets, the sound of
cannon, and the cheers of the British soldiers
advancing
to the attack. The Americans, behind the
breast-work, awaited, with calm intrepidity, their
approach. The enemy advanced in close column
of sixty men in front, shouldering their muskets and
carrying fascines and ladders. A storm of rockets
preceded them, and an incessant fire opened from
the battery, which commanded the advanced
column
.
The musketry and rifles from the
Kentuckians
and Tenneseans, joined the fire of the artillery,
and in a few moments was heard along the line a
ceaseless, rolling fire, whose tremendous noise
resembled
the continued reverberation of thunder.
One of these guns, a twenty-four pounder, placed
upon the breastwork, in the third embrasure from
the river, drewfrom the fatal skill and activity with
which it was managed, even in the heat of battle
the admiration of both Americans and British; and
became one of the points most dreaded by the
advancing
foe.
Here was stationed Lafitte, and three of his
lieutenants
,
Belluche, Sebastiano, and Getzendanner,
already introduced to the reader, and a large band
of his men, who, during the continuance of the
battle
,
Vol. II.13
fought with unparalleled bravery. The British
already, had been twice driven back in the utmost
confusion, with the loss of their commander in chief,
and two general officers.
In the first attack of the enemy, a column
pushed
forward, between the leve and river; and so
precipitate was their charge that the outposts were
forced to retire, closely pressed by the enemy.
Before
the batteries could meet the charge, clearing
the ditch, they gained the redoubt through the
embrasures
,
leaping over the parapet, and
overwhelming
,
by their superior force, the small party
stationed
there.
Lafitte, who was commanding, in conjunction
with his officers, at one of the guns, no sooner saw
the bold movement of the enemy, than, calling a
few of his best men by name, with Thodore by
his side, he sprung forward to the point of
danger
,
and clearing the breastwork of the
entrenchment
,
leaped, cutlass in hand, into the midst of the
enemy, followed by a score of his men, who in
many
a hard-fought battle upon his own deck, had
been well tried.
Astonished at the intrepidity which could lead
men to leave their entrenchments and meet them
hand to hand, and pressed by the suddenness of the
charge, which was made with the recklessness,
skill, and rapidity of practised boarders bounding
upon the deck of an enemy's vessel, they began to
give way, while, one after another, two British
officers
fell before the cutlass of the pirate, as they
were bravely encouraging their men by their
inspiring
shouts, and fearless example. All the
energies
of the British were now concentrated to scale
the breast-work, which one daring officer had
already
mounted. While Lafitte and his followers,
seconding a gallant band of volunteer riflemen,
formed a phalanx which they in vain assayed to
penetrate.
As the British column advanced to this attack, a
small boat, propelled by two seamen, and
containing
a handsome man, in the dress of a British
naval
officer, after ascending the river, unnoticed in
the confusion and uproar of battle, touched the bank
nearly opposite to the centre of the advancing
column
.
The officer sprung out amidst a shower of
balls, which fell harmlessly around him; then
drawing
his sword, and loosening his pistols in his belt,
he hastened forward to the head of the column,
and side by side with a gallant Scotchman, leaped
into the redoubt.
Twice he mounted the breast-work, and was
hurled back to rise and again mount; his blue eye
emitting fire, and his sword flashing like a meteor
as he hewed his way through the opposing breasts
of the Americans.
At this moment, Lafitte bounded into the redoubt,
and turned the tide of battle. The stranger, whose
reckless daring and perseverance had, even in the
midst of battle, attracted the attention of those on
whose side he fought, was also pressed back with
the retreating column. Yet, with an obstinacy
which drew upon him the fire of the riflemen, and
the cutlasses of the pirates, he stood his ground
and fought with cool and determined courage.
Every blow of his weapon laid a buccaneer dead at
his feet.
The British, leaving their numerous dead, had
retreated
;
yet he stood alone, pressed on every side,
and heedless of danger. His object seemed to be
to press forward to the spot where stood the pirate
chief, who was separated from him by half a dozen
of his men. In vain they called upon him to
surrender
.
His brow was rigid, with desperate
resolution
;
his eye burning with a fierce expression,
while his arm seemed endowed with the strength of
a Hercules.
Take him prisoner, but harm him not! said
Lafitte, struck with the daring of the man.
Give back, cried the stranger, speaking for the
first time. Give way to my revenge! Pirate,
Lafitte! ravisher! murderer! I dare you to single
combat!coward! and his voice rung clear, amid
the din of war.
Ha, is it so! stand back, men. Hold,
Sebastiano
!
leave him to me, if I am the game he seeks
so rashly!
The men who had involuntarily given back at
the sound of the stranger's voice, now left a path
between him and their chief, and, before Lafitte,
surprised at his conductbut in his checquered life,
not unused to adventure and danger in every shape
could bring his weapon to the guard, he received
that of the stranger through his sword arm.
Not that vile stream; but your heart's
blood, shouted the officer. Revenge! revenge!
I seek!and with a headlong impetuosity that
swallowed up every emotion but the present
passion
,
he played with fatal skill, his weapon about
the breast of his antagonist, who required all his
coolness
and swordsmanship to save his life, for which
it became evident to his men he now only fought.
By a dexterous manuvre, the stranger caught the
guard of the pirate's cutlass on his own sword, and
at the risk of his life, held it entangled for an
instant
,
till he drew and cocked a pistol, which he
levelled at his heart.
At that moment, Chitalusa, who, on leaving the
hut, sought in vain to obtain an interview with the
governor, to inform him of Lafitte's intentions, and
had now joined the army, sprung forward to seize
the weapon, crying, Chitalusa, tinkee you bad,
brother Lafitte! Chitalusa save your life now for
dat.
His heroic atonement, for what he deemed his
unworthy suspicions, seeing that Lafitte was
fighting
on the side of the Americans, was fatal. The
officer fired, and the ball passed through the tawny
breast of the simple minded Indian.
Me tinkee de red snake de Inglish. Me tinkee
bad, he murmured; and died, the victim of the
outlaw's
change of purpose, on receiving the
governor's
note, and of the figurative language in which
he had expressed it to the Indian.
The outlaw felt as if his own hand had slain him,
for his own ambiguous words had caused his death.
The combat now grew fiercer, and the pirates
began
to murmur, and fear for the life of their leader,
handling their weapons, and looking upon the
stranger
with eyes of malignity; anxious, notwithstanding
his prohibition, to save the life of their captain by
sacrificing that of his antagonist.
Thodore, had stood by the side of Lafitte, with
his sword drawn, often involuntarily crossing the
blade of the stranger, simultaneously with him, as
some more skilful pass threatened his life. His
eye, which all the time was fixed with an inquiring
gaze, upon his features, suddenly lighted up with
peculiar intelligence.
Hold seor! there is some error! he said
rapidly
to Lafitte, and whispered in his ear.
The point of Lafitte's sword dropped, as he
exclaimed
,
Thank God! I hurt him not!
The stranger, without knowing the cause which
produced it, and in his eagerness, heedless of the
defenceless state in which Lafitte had exposed his
person by the action, plunged his sword into his
side, and would have run him quite through the
13*
body, had not Thodore dexterously caught the
weapon upon the guard of his own.
Lafitte, murmuringthis for Constanza's sake!
fell backward into the arms of Thodore and his
men.
His adherents, absorbed by the danger of their
chief, gave all their attention for the moment to
him. When, the next instant, they turned to
revenge
him, they saw the mysterious stranger, who
had retired the moment he saw his objectthe death
of Lafitteapparently accomplished, mingling with
the retreating column of the British.
Lafitte was borne within the entrenchment by
his men, who found it useless to pursue his late
antagonist
.
But as they reascended the breastwork,
Thodore looked back with a searching eye, while
foreboding apprehensions filled his anxious mind,
and saw the late mysterious antagonist of his chief,
distinguished by his naval attire, step into the boat
which had conveyed him to the scene of action,
and amidst the hurricane of iron hail storming
around him, harmlessly, as if he bore a charmed
life, and with great speed, move rapidly down the
river.
With the true spirit of Christianity, the doors of
the churches and convents of the invaded city were
thrown open to the wounded soldiers, not only of
the defending army, but of the invading foe. To the
convent des Ursulines, one of these temporary
hospitals
in the heart of the city, Lafitte was borne by
the attentive Thodore and some of his followers.
Who have you there, my children? inquired
an aged priest with silvery hair flowing over the
collar of his black robe, as the faithful buccaneers
bore the litter on which lay their leader, into the
paved hall of the convent, and placed it against the
wall. He is a man of noble presence. I trust
not one in high command.
It is of no importance father, said another
of the priests coming forward, in whom Thodore
recognized the padre Arnaud whom he had seen at
Barritaria, the odour of whose sanctity had not
availed to save Sebastiano's schooner, whose
passenger
he once had been, from being finally blown
into the air. It is enough that he is wounded and
that his situation demands our charity.
You say well, my son; call the physician, and
we will have his wounds forthwith examined.
Heaven
grant he is not in danger! he said, looking
upward
devotionally: It were sad to die without
confession and absolutionbut Heaven is merciful.
The father Arnaud, immediately on his entrance,
recognized Lafitte, who had once sent for him from
Havana, to confess and give general absolution to
such of his men, who were Roman Catholics. The
father thought if he was recognized as the outlaw
whose name had struck terror throughout the
Mexican
seas, he might not, among the simple-minded
sisterhood and fraternity, receive the attention due
to every human being, in such a situation. He
therefore, with true benevoleuce of heart, sought to
conceal the real character of the invalid, and
hastened
to bring to him medical aid.
His wound was probed, and dressed by the
surgeon
,
who declared his case by no means dangerous,
and said that the loss of blood, had rendered it only
apparently so; adding, that sleep, quiet and attention,
would in a few days restore him to health.
Recommending
him to the care of Thodore and one or
two aged nuns, who were bending over him with
commiseration expressed in their calm faces, he
left him with professional abruptness, to attend to
a wounded soldier, just brought in from the field.
CHAPTER VIII.
The evils of this world, drive more to the cloister, than the happi
ness held out to them in the next, invites.
To say that men never love truly but once, is well enough in poetry;
but every day's realities convince us of its untruth. If you have
observed
much, you have found that men seldom marry the first object
of their youthful affections.
Chesterfield
.
A SURPRISEAN INTERVIEW BETWEEN A NUN AND THE CHIEF.
On
the third evening, the wound of the chief
closed, and he was rapidly convalescing; having
received permission from the surgeon to leave the
convent the succeeding day.
The eve of that day, the halls and corridors of the
convent were deserted. Silence reigned
undisturbed
,
save by the light step of a nun in her vigils
around the couch of an invalid, the deep breathing
of some sufferer, and the sighing of the winds
among the foliage of the evergreens, waving their
branches without. At the extremity of the hall, stood
the couch of the chief, above which a narrow
window
opened upon the court yard adjoining the
edifice
.
The cool night wind blew in, refreshingly,
upon his temples, and the rich melody of a distant
mocking-bird, which loves to wake the echoes of
night, fell soothingly, as he listened to its varied
notes, upon his attentive ear.
Thodore had just deserted his couch, and
stepped
forth to enjoy the cool air of the night. Under
these soothing influences, the wounded chief
insensibly
slept; but his slumbers were soon disturbed by
a scarcely heard foot-fall at the extremity of the
passage. He opened his eyes, and by the dim
light of a lamp suspended in the centre of the
ceiling
of the corridor, he discovered near him, the tall
and graceful form of one of the nuns, who had often
bent above him in his feverish moments, and whose
presence exerted a strange power over his thoughts,
and even the very throbbings of his heart, which
became irregular and wild when she was near.
He felt there was a mystery around her, in some
way connected with himself; but how, or why, after
long hours given to thought and imagination, he
could not conjecture. Her voice he had never yet
heard, but her slight fingers placed upon his pulse
or throbbing temples, would strangely thrill the blood
in his veins. But all his speculations respecting
her were futileand at last, wearied with pursuing
the vague associations, her presence, air and
manner
called up, he would close his eyes,
articulating
Strange!
strange! very strange! and fall
into disturbed sleep, in which visions of his boyhood
and its scenes of love and strife, passed with
wonderful
distinctness before him; yet still, in all his
dreams, the form of the nun was mysteriously
mingled
with other characters, which memory, with her
dreamy wand called up from the abyss of the past.
Giving no evidence of being conscious of her
presence
,
with his eyes closed, he waited with
palpitating
heart, the approach of his midnight visitant. She
came within a few feet of him and stopped; while
shading her brow with her hand, from the light of
the lamp above her, she gazed fixedly at the
apparent
sleeper, as though to be assured that he
slept.
Her figure, as she bent forward in an attitude of
natural grace, displayed faultless proportions. She
was a little above the middle height of women, and
her brow, as she drew aside her black veil, which,
with a long robe of the same funereal hue encircled
her person, was calm and palepaler, perhaps,
from the strong contrast of her transparent skin,
with the black mantilla she wore about her head.
Her marble-like features rivalled in Grecian
accuracy
of outline, the most perfect models that ever
passed from the chisel of Praxitiles: the colour of
her eye was of a deep bluenot the cold blue of
northern skies, but the warm azure of sunny Italy.
There was in them, a shade of melancholy, cast
also over her whole face. Piety and devotion were
written upon her seraphic countenance, from which
care and sorrow, not illness, had faded the roses
and richness of youth.
Yet she was not a youthful maiden! Perhaps
seven and twenty summers and winters, had passed,
with their changes and vicissitudes, over her head.
Her general manner and air was that of humble
resignation
to some great and deep-settled sorrow.
No one could gaze upon her without interest; no
one without respect. Among her sister nuns she
was regarded as but a little lower than a saint in
Heaven; by the devotees of her church, her
blessing
and prayers were sought next to that of their
tutelar divinities. Among the sisterhood, she was
was called the holy St. Marie. Her real name,
for which she had assumed this religious one, had
been concealed from all but the superior, during the
twelve or thirteen years she had been an inmate of
the convent.
Apparently satisfied that her patient slept, she
approached him, and uttering a short ejaculation,
while she raised her fine eyes heavenward, she
laid a finger lightly upon his temple.
He is better! thank thee Heaven, and sweet
Mary, mother! His sleep is calm, and he is much
much better! and as she spoke low, her voice,
although saddened in its tones, was silvery.
Its effect upon the chief, was extraordinary; and
although he raised not his eyes, nor moved, his heart
beat wildly, and the veins upon his temple leaped
to her touch. Yet, with a strong effort, anxious to
know more of his mysterious visiter, and
wondering
at the strange effect of her voice upon him, he
remained apparently asleep. Still retaining her
hand upon his temple, she continued:His sleep
is yet unquiet. Our blessed Saviour grant him life
for repentance! she said fervently.
She knows me! thought he. Strange
that she should take such interest in me, then.
Those silvery accents! where have I heard them
before? Why do they move me so? I must solve
this mystery.
I thank thee, sweet Mother of Heaven, for this
favour! she continued; I may yet be the
instrument
in thy hands for good to this wanderer!
Forgive
me, Holy MaryI thought I had bid adieu to
all worldly emotionand yet I should have
betrayed
my feelings to all around me in the hall, when I
recognized his features, so like his father's, had I
not hastened to my cell to give vent to my feelings
in tears. Sinful! sinful, I have been! Resentment
and pity have been s'ruggling the past hour within
this bosom, that should be dead to all earthly
excitement
.
Pity me, Heaven! I will err no more!
But, oh! what a history of buried recollections has
the sight of him revived! I thought I had shut out
the world for ever; but no, no! with him
before
me, I live again in it! Its scenes are present with
me; and when I gaze on this working browthese
features, which many years have changed, but
whose familiar expression still liveshow can I be
all at once the calm, impassioned nun! I sin whilst I
speak! I know I am sinning! but pity my weakness,
Mary! Thou hast been human, and a
woman!
and
thou canst sympathizebut oh! censure not!
Indulge
me in this moment of human failing, and I
will then give back my whole heart and soul to
thee!
And as she spoke, she lifted her angelic
countenance
upward, clasped the cross she wore, and
pressed it to her lips. At this moment, Lafitte
opened his eyes, and, while every word she uttered,
glowed in his bosom like a pleasant memory of
half-forgotten
thingsof mingled bliss and woefor the
first time he had a glimpse at her features
Great God! Gertrude! he exclaimed,
springing
from the couch and clasping her uplifted hands
in his ownGertrude! speakIs it you?my
cousin?
It is, Achille! Gertrudeand none other! she
said, while the rich blood mounted to her pale
cheeks, at the sudden movement and ardent manner
of her cousin.
Can I believe? he said, gazing fondly, while he
still held her hands. Yet, still it must beand
why herein this garb? were you not the bride
of?
Of Heaven alone, cousin! she said,
interrupting
his impetuous interrogations.
Where then isbut how came you here?I
knowalas I know it allall! he added bitterly,
striking
his forehead with his clenched hand, and falling
back upon the pillow, as she covered her pale face
with her hands in tearful silence: I know all! This
hand has made you thus! and burying his face in
the curtain of his couch, his chest heaved, and he
sobbed audibly and with great agitation.
Gertrude was deeply affected by his emotion.
The discovery of her cousin among the wounded,
had broken up a life of repose, which she had
chosen
after the crime and flight of her cousin. Even
when giving preference to his brother, who had won
her by those gentle means, which, rather than
passionate
appealswhen the female heart is the prize
assures victory, there existed in her bosom, a
partiality
for, or rather friendly feeling towards Achille,
his own impetuosity of character rendered him
incapable
of profiting by. He desired to be loved at
once, and for himself, scorning to seek, by
assiduous
attention, smiles and favours which could not
become his own at the mere expression of his wish
to possess them.
In love, as well as in other pursuits which
engage
men, it is labour which must ever conquer.
To the contempt by the one, and the adoption by
the other, of this maxim, in relation to a young heart
as yet neutral in its partialities, is to be, perhaps,
attributed the success of Henri, and the failure of
his brother.
Calm your emotion, cousin; I forgive you all
that through heaven you have caused me to suffer!
she said, taking his unresisting hand.
Lafitte spoke not, and for a few moments, he
seemed to be suffering under the acutest mental
torments.
You haveindeed you have my forgiveness!
she repeated with earnestness; but it is not to me
you must look for forgiveness, Achille. It is not
me you have injured or sinned against!
My brother! my poorpoor brother! he
groaned
.
Not Henri alone. Heaven, she said with
fervour
,
awaits your contrition and repentance,
Achille!
Heaven! he repeated, as though he knew not
that he spoke aloud. I know it. I do repent and
sue its mercy! But my brother! my innocent
murdered
brother? he interrogated, rising and grasping
her arm.
Nay, Achille, you are not so guilty in act as
you imagine! Henri survived the wound.
Vol. II.14
Survives! Henri lives! Lives! did you say
speak, tell me quickly! oh heavenly tidings!
Angel
of mercy! Speak, tell me, oh tell me my
brother
lives! he reiterated, with almost insane
animation
;
while a strange fire filled his eyes, as, sitting
upright, with both hands grasping her sholders, he
fixed them upon her face.
Say that he lives! that he
lives
! LIVES!
He does, Achille; calm yourself, he lives, and
you may yet meet him.
Oh! Godlivesmeet again! he faintly
articulated
,
Oh! I could die, with those sweet
words dwelling upon my ear!
He recovered and went to France, she said,
after a few moments mutual silence, the day after
my arrival in this city to seclude myself, the
ill-fated
cause of all your quarrel, for ever from the
world.
Heaven is goodtoo kind! You say he
died not! Oh, speak it again!once more let me
hear the sweet assurance.
He died not by your hand!
It is enough,
enough!
he said, and sunk back
like a child, overpowered by the strong excitement,
weakened as he still was, he had passed through.
In a few moments he resumed his self-possession,
and addressed Gertrude more calmly.
Where went he, cousin?
To France. Since then, shut out from the
world, I have sought to forget it, and have not
heard from him.
Why married you him not?
As an atonementthe only atonement I could
make, for the mischief of which I was the
unintentional
causeI renounced all worldly hopes and
became the bride of the church.
And I have made you thus! he said sadly;
but I thank you, thank you for your tidings. This
is too much happiness! I will seek my brother
out, and at his feet atone for the wrongs I did him.
Poor, gentle boy! I loved him, Gertrude, and
would not have slain him.No, no! he added,
quickly, and laughed wildlyha! ha! ha!You
tell me he did not die
he lives!
God of heaven! I
thank thee! I am not my brother's murderer!
With his spirit subdued, and his heart full of
gratitude
,
he hid his face in the folds of his cousin's
mantilla, and wept aloud.
She would not interrupt him, by addressing him;
but silently kneeled beside his couch, and with all
the devotions of a woman's piety, put up a prayer
to heaven, for the spiritual welfare of the softened
being before her. With holy fervor, like a seraph
supplicating, she sought pardon for his errors, and
prayed that the spirit of penitence would embrace
that moment to act upon his heart and renew him
with a right spirit. Every word of the lovely and
devout petitioner fell soothingly, like the pleading
of an angel, upon his heart, and before she
concluded
her holy petition, his heart was melted, and
with the quiet humility of a child, he joined his voice
with hers, in responding Amen!
The nun rose from her kneeling posture, and
taking
the hand of her cousin, said with as calm a
voice and manner as she could assume
Cousin, I must leave you now. I have too long
held stolen intercourse with you; but Heaven I
hope will forgive me if I have erred. We must
now part. You leave our convent to-morrow, and
from this time we meet no moretillwe meet I
hope in heaven! and her soft blue eyes beamed with
celestial intelligence, as she raised them to her
future
home.
God forbid we should part thus! Gertrude!
cousin! bid not adieu! leave me not. Oh, God!
how lonelv and utterly lost I shall be without you!
Nay, cousin. I cannot stay; I must go! she
added firmlyI must go now! May God, who
is ever ready to meet the returning penitent,
forgive
your past life, and guide you in the new path
you have chosen, and for which you have already
shed your blood!
You know me and my life, then? he inquired
eagerly.
I know you now, as my cousin Achille, a
reclaimed
,
penitent son of the church. You have
borne a name I wish not to utter!
Lafitte?
The same, she replied, mournfully.
Why, then, cared you for me?
That I might do you good.
No one in the convent has recognized or
identified
me as Lafitte; how did you?
The youth
Thodore?
That is his name, I believe. He has told me
all.
And yet, you can come and see, and talk with
me! Ah! kind, good Gertrude! how much I have
injured you! and yet you can forget it and
forgive
it all. Sweet woman! thou art indeed earth's
angel!
Now, farewell, Achille. Christianity teaches
us both to forget and forgive, she said, with
humility
.
It is our religion, not me, you should
admire
.
We will meet in heaven.
Oh! go not yetstay but for a moment! he
said, rising, and following her. May I not see you
again?
Not on Earth, Achille. I am betrothed to
Heaven! she said, with dignity united with
humility
,
in her voice and manner.
Lafitte held her hand for a moment in silence,
while his features were agitated by many
conflicting
emotions.
Suddenly, he spoke and said, with energy
Gertrude! listen to me! this interview has
decided
my fate. I have wronged you; I would
cheerfully lay down my life to atone for it; but
with the will of heaven, I will work out a more
befitting atonement. My brotherthank God, that
he livesI have injured deeply, deeply! I will
seek him out, if he is yet a living man, and obtain
his forgiveness for my crime. Then, having made
restitution to those I have wronged, as far as lies in
my power, I will devote the remainder of my life
to penance and prayer. Oh! I have sinned
grievously
sinned!
Yet there is pardon for the guiltiest, cousin!
she replied, with timid firmness.
I know itit is in that I trust, he answered with
animation.
May the Blessed Virgin, grant you life to
accomplish
your holy purposes, she said, while her
face glowed with devotion. Achillecousin! I
must now bid you farewell.
But, the old man, my father? inquired he, with
sudden eagerness, as memory, though slowly,
faithful
to her task, brought up the past scenes of his
early life
Lives he?
The heavy gate in front of the convent, at that
moment opened, with a startling sound, and she
replied
hastilyI know not, Achille. Your father
my beloved uncle, and Henri, after accompanying
me to this city, departed the next day for France.
From neither have I heard since. He did speak of
leaving Henri in France, and visiting his estate
near Martinique. He may now reside there. O!
what a tide of feelingof sorrow! she said, while
14*
her voice trembled with emotion, sorrow long
sealed up in my heart, have you called forth! Oh!
I must be more than human, not to feelFarewell!
God and heaven bless you!
Once more pressing his hand, while tears told
that nature would hold her empire even within
the strong walls and gloomy cloisters of a convent,
she hastily glided to the farthest extremity of the
hall, and swiftly ascending the broad winding
staircase
dimly lighted by a lamp, suspended in the hall
beneath, she disappeared from his eager gaze.
His first impulse was to pursue her, though his
purpose, he himself could not have defined. This
determination he however abandoned, as he heard
the tramp of men bearing a litter up the avenue;
when they entered the hall, he had resumed his
original recumbent position on the couch, where
wakeful, and his brain teeming with busy thoughts,
in deep melancholly, he passed the remaining hours
of the night.
In those hours of reflection, he lived over again,
his whole life. With how much sorrow for crime
how much remorse, was that retrospection filled!
He sunk to sleep as the morning broke, after
having
resolved, and fortified his resolutions by an
appeal
to Heaven, that he would restore, so far as lay
in his power, the wealth he had taken from others;
although to collect it, he knew he must sail to his
different places of rendezvous. This accomplished,
he determined that he would seek out his brother,
obtain forgiveness for the injuries he had done him,
and then, in the seclusion of a monastery, bury
himself
from the world, and devote the remainder of
his life to acts of beneficence and piety.
BOOK V.
DENOUEMENT.
He left a corsair's name to other times.
How speed the outlaws? stand they well prepared,
Their plundered wealth, and robber's rock to guard?
Dreamed they of this, our preparation,?
And Lara sleeps not where his fathers slept.
Byron
.
BOOK V.
CHAPTER I.
Formerly, the influence of Obeah priestesses was very great over
the negroes. Hundreds have died from the mere terror of being under
the ban of Obeah. This is evidently a practise of oriental origin. Its
influence over the negroes some twenty or thirty years ago, was almost
incredible. The fetish, is the African divinity, invoked by the negroes
in the practice of Obeah.
Madden's West Indies
.
BRIDAL PREPARATIONAN OBEAH SORCERESSSCENE AT THE HUT.
The
events connected with our romance,
naturally
divide themselves into several distinct parts,
which we have denominated books. Pursuing this
division, we now open our fifth and last book, which,
like the last act of a drama, contains the key to
unlock
all the mysteries of the preceding the sagacious
reader has not already anticipated, dissipating the
darkness, and shedding the sunshine of an unveiled
denoument over the whole.
The evening of the day on which Count D'Oyley
and the fair Castillian, with whom he had escaped
from the rendezvous of the buccaneer after a warm
pursuit on the part of Lafitte, were taken up by his
own frigate, Le Sultan, in the channel of St. Marc's
a stately ship arrayed in the apparel of war,
sailed, with majestic motion, into the bay of
Gonzaves
.
The flag of France waved over her quarter deck,
and a long tier of guns bristled from each side.
Her course was directly for the narrow pass
between
the two parallel ridges of rocks, which formed
a communication from the sea, with the pirate's
grotto. An hour after she hove in sight at the
southward, she had breasted the pass, and anchored
in deep water, within a few fathoms of the
outermost
rock terminating the passage.
On gaining the deck of his frigate, the count,
after
attending to the comfort of the wearied
Constanza
,
had hastily replied to the questions of his
astonished
officer; and informing them of his separation
from the tender, which had not been heard of, he
briefly recounted his adventures, and then issued
orders for proceeding directly to the cavern, and
demolishing the rendezvous of the pirates, by
spiking
their guns and otherwise rendering it untenable
as a fortified place. It was the frigate, Le Sultan,
we have seen drop her anchor the same evening,
abreast of the cavern.
The setting sun flung his red beams across the
level waters of the bay, and the winds were dying
away with the fading of the sun-light, as Constanza
the crimson rays of the sun tinging her brow with
a rich glowleaned from the cabin window, and
with a calm and thoughtful countenance, gazed
upon
the evening sky, its purple palaces of clouds
its winged creatures, and its mountains of gold and
emerald. Her dreamsfor although her eyes were
fixed upon the gorgeous west, she was wrapped
in a dreamy reverie of the pastwere of her
happy childhoodher paternal home near the
imperial
city of Montezumaher aged fatherhis death,
and the various scenes through which she had
passed
.
The character of Lafittehis crimes and his
virtues, and the kindness and noble nature of
Theodore
;
her capture and escape, all floated through
her mind, invested with their peculiar associations.
And am I at last happy? she said, half
inquiringly
.
Oh! that my poor father were here to
share my happiness! Can it be true that this is not
a dream? Am I indeed free, and is D'Oyley indeed
here?
Here! my sweet Constanza, and folding you in
his arms; said the count, who had entered the
state room unperceived, here! to make you happy,
and terminate your sufferings. Constanza leaned
her cheek upon his shoulder, and with one arm
encircling
his neck, looked up into his face with the
artless confidence of a child, while her features
became
radiant with joy. But she spoke nother
happiness was too great for utterance. For a few
moments he lingered in this pure embrace, and then
breathed into her ear:
When, dearest one, shall D'Oyley become your
protector? Tell me now, while I hold you thus!
and he clasped her closer to his heart.
She replied not, and the rich blood mantled her
brow, rivaling the crimson sun-glow which
delicately
suffused it. Her lips moved inaudibly, and
her lover felt the small hand he held, tremble like
an imprisoned dove within his own.
Say, Constanza, my love! this evening shall it
be? shall the chaplain of the frigate unite us this
very hour? Refuse me not this request! he
continued
ardently.
She pressed his hand, and looked up into his face
with her large black eyes full of confidence and love,
whose eloquent expression spoke a deeper and more
befitting language than words could convey.
Bless you, my sweet angel! he exclaimed,
reading with a lover's skill the language of her
speaking eyes; and their lips were united in that
pure, first kiss of love, whose raptures to mortals
wedded or betrothedif minstrels tell us trulyis
never known but once.
The count ascended to the deck to complete the
preparations for his expedition against the rock.
From his knowledge of the pass and mode of access
to the cave, he determined to conduct the expedition
himself.
It was his intention merely to proceed to the
cavern, and leaving his men under the command
of one of his lieutenants, return to the frigate and
be united to the fair maiden, whom from her
childhood
,
when he first saw her, the pride of her father's
eye, and the idol of his household, while on a
diplomatic
mission to Mexico, he had admired, whilst
her image lived, fondly cherished, in his memory.
In after years, when the old Castilian became an
exile, he sought him out in his retired villa in
Jamaica
.
But a few weeks before it was attacked by
the pirates, he had renewed that admiration, which
a few days beneath the same roof with the fair girl,
ripened into love. For a few short weeks he left
her for the purpose of cruising in the neighborhood
of Carthagena, to return, and find the villa a scene
of desolation, the venerable parent lying a corpse in
his own house, which was filled with armed
soldiery
,
and the daughter, his beloved Constanza,
carried
off, no one could tell whither, by the daring
buccaneer.
In one hour more, their scenes of danger and trial
passed, they hoped for ever, he was to fold her to
his heart, his wedded bride! This hope filled his
bosom with ecstacy, as with an elastic step and
joyous
eye he ascended to the deck.
The boats were already along side and manned;
and delaying a moment, to repeat his instructions to
the chaplain in relation to the approaching ceremony,
and commending Constanza to the watchful
attention
Vol. II.15
of young Montville, he entered the cabin once
more, to embrace her and assure her of his speedy
return.
Why must you go, dearest D'Oyley? she
inquired
pleadingly, I cannot trust you in that
fearful
cave again.
I shall not stay, my love; I alone can conduct
the expedition, which the safety of these seas
renders
it necessary should be undertaken.
But you will quickly return? she inquired,
detaining
him.
Before Venus hovering in the rosy west, he
said, pointing to that lowly planet, shining low in the
western sky like a lesser moon, shall wet her
silver
slipper in the sea, will I return to you.
The next moment, he was standing in the stern
of the boat, which, propelled by twelve oars, moved
steadily and swiftly up the rocky passage to the
cave.
About a quarter of a mile to the south of the grotto
occupied by the buccaneers, extended from the
cliff a narrow tongue of land, strewn with loose
gigantic
rocks. This tongue, connected by rocks and
sand bars, with one of the parallel ridges confining
the passage from the sea to the cave, formed the
southern and eastern boundary of the basin, or
lagoon
,
often before alluded to. Near its junction
with the rocks of the pass, it spread out into a level
flat, covered with long grass. It was half buried
at noon day in shadow, cast by the rocks which
overhung it on every side, but that opening to the
water. In this direction the sea was visible through
a narrow gap, a few yards in width.
In the back part of this area, whose surface was
rather less than an acre and a half, hid by a
projecting
rock, which formed its roof, stood a rude hut
made of cane branches and bamboo leaves
interlaid
.
A single door facing the sea, was the only
aperture in the rude habitation, which, a wreath of
blue smoke curling up its face indicated it to be.
The sun just setting, reddened with his fiery beams
the hideous features of an old decrepid hag, with a
sunken eye full of malignity, toothless jaws, grizzly
wool, long and tangled, and squallid figure bent
nearly double with age and infirmity. It was Oula,
and the rude hut, her habitation.
She was an aged African sybil, a degenerate
priestess of the terrible deity, fetish or the Obeah.
Through her incantations, charms, amulets and
prophecies
,
besides her skill in foretelling evil tidings,
and her accuracy in giving the fortunes of her
deluded
votaries, which were usually of her own hue,
her name was widely extended.
Occasionally there would be some of a paler
complexion from among the buccaneers, from time
to time resorting to the grotto, who sometimes
honoured her art by seeking of her knowledge of
their future destinies.
As she squatted in the door of her hut, her eye
was fixed upon the advancing frigate, though she
watched its approach with apparent indifference.
As the ship lessening her sail, finally dropped her
anchor within half a mile of her wild abode, her
features
gave indication of interest.
Quacha! she called in a low harsh voice, as
the ship swung to her anchor.
At the sound of her voice, a little deformed
negro
,
whose size indicated extreme youth, but whose
large features, and the lines of sagacity and
cunning
drawn in his face, showed that he had seen
many years, perhaps one-third of the number his
mother, for in this relation she stood to him, herself
counted, stood before her. His head was large,
and covered with long, strait, shaggy hair, which fell
in thick masses over his eyes. It was the head of an
adult, placed upon the shrivelled body of a sickly
child.
Hoh, mummy! he replied, as he emerged from
the hut where he had been lying, with his head
among the ashes, with which he was cooking their
evening meal.
Did you sa' dat Spanis' Martinez, come down
in boat' day, Hugh? she inquired, without turning
her head.
'Es ol' mum.
Wat I tell'er 'bout nebber call me ol', you
debbles'
brat, she said, in a loud angry voice, and
aiming
a blow at his head, with a long staff she held
in her hand, which he from much practice,
dexterously
evaded, and improving his phraseology,
replied
'Es, mummy.
Wat he come for, Quacha?
Quacha don't know, mummy. He sa' he come
see de ol' Obi.
Ol' Obi! he say dat? she said, muttering; I'll
ol' Obi him, wit his black Spannis fas.
Hoh! here he come hesef, mummy,
exclaimed
the hope and promise of the old beldame; and
the athletic, finely moulded figure of the young
Spaniard emerged from a path, which, winding
among the rocks, led to the main land, and stood
before them.
Good even to you, Oula, he said, with an air
in which superstitious reverence struggled with
incredulity
and an inclination to jest with the
mysterious
being, whose supernatural aid he sought.
Oula is't, an' god een, she growled. Well,
that's better nor ol' Obi, she said, without turning
her eyes from the frigate. You needn't 'spose
any thing's hid from Oula. Wat for is she Obi, if
not to know ebery ting.
Now be at peace, Oula, and harm me not with
Obeah, he said, soothingly. I meant not to
anger
you. Listen! do you know the music of this
gold? he asked, shaking several gold pieces in his
handI have brought it to give you, Oula.
The eyes of the negress sparkled as she
stretched
forth her bony arm, to grasp the coin, which he
resigned to her greedy clutch.
Wat want for dese, Martinez? Sall Oula Obi
you en'my, show you de prize-ship, or find de white
breast buckra missy for you, she said, as slowly
and carefully she told the money from one hand
into
the other.
The Spaniard approached her, and said, with
emphasisThe last, Oula! Serve me, and you
shall have five times the coin you clasp so tightly
there.
Come in, come in, Martinez, said she, rising
upon her staff, and hobbling into the hut. Obi can
do nothin' wid de fire-stars, looking down so bright.
With a paler brow and flatering step, he
entered
the gloomy hut, half filled with smoke, and hot
and filthy, from the fumes of tobacco, and nauseous
herbs, drying in the chimney, which was built of
loose stones.
Closing the door, after commanding Quacha to
stay without and watch against intrusion, she
pointed
Martinez to a seat upon a fragment of rock, and
bidding him turn his back and preserve the strictest
silence till she spoke, she commenced her
mysterious
preparations.
Baring her shrivelled arms and scraggy neck,
she passed her long fingers through her tangled
hair till it stood out from her head like the quills of
a porcupine. Then taking from a box by the
fire-place
,
a tiara, or head-dress, formed of innumerable
stuffed water-snakes, curiously interwoven, so that
their heads were all turned outward, forming in the
eye of her credulous devotee, a formidable and
terrific
15*
coronet for the sorceress, she placed it upon
her dishrivelled locksa second Medusa.
From the same repository which used to
contain
her materials for practising Obeah, she drew
forth a necklace, strung with the claws and teeth
of cats, the fangs of serpents and the teeth of
hanged men, which, with great solemnity of
manner
,
she passed three times around her neck. To
this, she suspended a little red bag, filled with grave
dirt, and tied up with the hair of a murdered
woman
.
Bracelets, of similar materials of the
necklace
,
with the addition of the beak of a parrot, which
had been taught to speak the three magic names of
Fetish, ornamented her arms. Encircling her
waist with an enormous green and black serpent,
she tied it by the head and tail, leaving them to
dangle before her.
Then oiling her face, arms, neck, and breast, she
dipped her finger into a basin of water which stood
upon the box, muttering mean while, words
unintelligible
to the Spaniard. Taking an iron pot,
she placed it, with great solemnity, in the back
part of the hut, leaving room to pass between it and
the wall.
These preparations completed with great show
of ceremony, she took from a branch upon which
it lay, a long slender human bone, and stirred the
fire with its charred end. Laying this aside, she
took from the same place, a skeleton hand, the
joints retained in their places by wires, with which
she took up a live coal, and placed it under the pot.
After several coals were transferred from the fire
place, in this manner, she got down upon her knees,
before the fire, she had thus kindled under the
pot, and began to blow it until it blazed.
Then rising and hobbling to the fire-place, she
slipped
a slide which had once belonged to a binnacle
case, and reaching her hand into the cavity, drew
forth from its roost a snow white cock, fat, and
unwieldy
,
from long, and careful keeping.
This bird, held sacred in all Obeah rites, the old
sorceress placed over the coals, upon a roost which
she had constructed of three human bones, two
placed
upright, and one laid on them horizontally.
These mysterious preparations completed, she
walked three times round the cauldron, working, as
she moved, her features into the most passionate
contortions, so that when she stopped on
completing
her round, her face was more demoniac than
human in its aspect and expression. In a shrill,
startling voice she then addressed her votary.
Rise, buckra, look; no speak!
The Spaniard had witnessed with feelings of
dismay
which he could not subdue, all the ominous
preparations we have described, reflected in a small
broken mirror which he was made purposely by her
to face, that by its imperfect representation the
reality
might be exaggerated by her visiters, and their
fears acted upon, better to prepare them for her
purpose.
As she spoke, he stood up and turned with a wild
look, while his hand voluntarily grasped the hilt of
his cutlass. The distorted features of the beldam,
and her strange ornaments and appalling
preparations
met his superstitious eye. She allowed him
to survey the scene before him for a moment, and
then commenced chanting in rude improvisatore:
Now tell buckra, wat dat you
Ax of Fetish for you do?
If you b'lieve dat Fetish know
Ebery ting abub, below
Den you hab all dat you seek,
Walk dree times roun', den buckra speak.
Seizing his passive hand as she addressed him, she
leaped with almost supernatural activity three times
around the pot, drawing him after her with
reluctant
steps, yet fearing to hold back. The third time
she paused, and taking an earthen vessel from the
box, she commenced dancing round the fire,
commanding
him to follow, dropping as she whirled,
something she took from it into the iron vessel, the
while chanting in a rude measure;
Here de unborn baby heart,
Fetish lub dis much!
Here de hair from off de cat
Dat knaw de nails,
Eat out de eyes,
Dat drink de blood
Ob dead man.
Here de poison for de friend!
Fetish lub dis too!
Here de trouble for de foe!
Here de egg ob poison snake
Here de head ob speckle cock
Here de blood, and here de dirt
From de coffin, from de grave
Of murdered 'ooman an' her babe.
Then followed some unintelligible incantation, in a
language unknown to the Spaniard, and still
grasping
both of his hands, she whirled with him around
the cauldron. Suddenly stopping, after many rapid
revolutions during which her body writhed in
convulsions
,
while the astonished and paralyzed victim
of his own superstition, yielded passively to the
strange rites in which he was now an unwilling
actor
,
she again commenced her monotonous chant,
in the same wild and shrill tone of voice:
Now de blood from near de heart,
Perfect make de Obeah art;
Buckra's wish will den be grant,
An' Fetish gib him dat he want.
What mean you, Oula? he inquired, as the
Obeah priestess drew a long knife from her girdle
and held the earthen vessel in the other hand. She
replied, while her eyes darkened with malignity and
her features grew more haggard and hideous:
After buckra tell his wish,
Den his blood mus' fill dis dish;
Middle fingermiddle vein,
Blood from dat will gib no pain
In de kittle it shall mix,
Wid hangman's bones for stirring sticks!
Now buckra Spaniard, wat's dy will?
Speak! dy wis' to Oula, tell.
And she fixed her eyes, before whose strange
expression
his own quailed, full upon her votary.
The Spaniard, who had sought her in the full
belief
of her supernatural powers, to solicit her aid in
the accomplishment of his object, was wholly
unprepared
for the scenesof magnitude, to one of
his tone of mindwhich he had passed through.
It was several moments before he recovered his
self-possession, and then an impulse to withdraw his
application, rather than pursue his object, influenced
him. But after a moment's reflection, and
recollection
of the object he sought in this visit to her,
he summoned resolution, and replied with a hoarse
voice, while he looked about him suspiciously, as if
fearful of being overheard,
Oula, there is a maiden beautiful as the
moon! I love herbut she would scorn me if I
wooed her, and she is also betrothed to another.
He was my prisonerI brought him to this
island and imprisoned him to await our captain's
arrival. The next day, before my vessel sailed
again, she was brought in a prisoner. I bribed my
captain, and lingered behind in disguise, that I
might see her, of whom I had heard so much. I
at length had a glimpse of her from the opening in
the top of the cave, and when I saw herI loved
her.
Loved her to marry, Martinez? she said, with
an ironical grin.
I said not so, replied the Spaniard, quickly.
I loved her with a burning passion. I sought to
gain the part of the grotto she occupied, and
arranged
my plan; but Lafitte returned, and the next day
I would have effected it, but they the last night
escaped
,
she and her lover, and I have all the day been
planning some way to obtain her. This evening as
I was sitting by the cave, cursing my fate and
thinking perhaps I should never see her more
yonder frigate hove in sight. I took a glass and
watched her until she dropped her anchorand
whom think you I saw upon her deck?
The buckra lady?
The sameI knew her by her form and air.
She leaned upon the arm of my late prisoner, who
is, no doubt, commander of the ship.
What you want done? she inquired, as he
abruptly
paused.
I would possess her, he replied warmly; now
good Oula, fulfil your boasted promise, he added
eagerly, as his dark eye flashed with hope and
passion
.
It hard businessbut Fetish he do ebery ting
you 'bleive dat, buckra Martinez, she added, fixing
her blood-shot and suspicious eye upon him.
All, every thing, only give me power to
accomplish
my desires, he exclaimed, impatiently.
Dat you sall hab, she replied, seizing his arm;
hol you lef armdat next de heart's blood, she
cried, chanting,
Blood from heart,
Firs' mus' part,
'Fore Fetish
Grant you wish.
With revolting gestures, and brandishing her
glistening knife, she danced around him, then
fastening
her long fingers upon his hand, she
continued
,
From middle fingermiddle vein,
Blood must flow, you' end to gain.
When the Spaniard, after a struggle between
apprehension
and fear of failing in his object, and of
danger to himself, made up his mind to go through
the ordeal, though resolved to watch her so that she
should inflict no severe wound upon his hand, the
voice of the old beldam's son was heard at the door
in altercation with some one in the possession of a
voice no less discordant than his own.
The Obeah surprised in the middle of her orgies
in a shrill angry voice, demanded the cause of this
interruption.
It is Cudjoe, mummyhe want see ol' Obi, he
sa'.
Maldicho! exclaimed the Spaniard, it were
as much as my head is worth for Lafitte's slave to
find me here, when I should be at sea. Is there
no outlet? he inquired, hastily.
Nobut here be de deep hole, she said,
removing
some branches and old clothingthis will
hide you. He mus come in, or he brak in, she
added, as Cudjoe's anxiety to enter grew more
obvious
by his loud demand for admittance, and his
repeated heavy blows against the door.
The Spaniard, not in a situation to choose his
place of concealment, let himself down into the hole,
which formed her larder and store-room, and seating
himself upon a cask, was immediately covered over
with branches and blankets.
What for such rackett, you Coromantee nigger
break in lone 'oomans house af'er dark, she
grumbled with much apparent displeasure, as taking
a lighted brand in her hand, she unbarred the frail
door.
At the sight of her strange attire and wild
appearance
,
increased by the flame of the burning
brand she held, alternately flashing redly upon her
person, and leaving it in obscurity, the slave drew
back with an exclamation of terror. The old
sorceress
,
who with a strange but common delusion,
believed that she possessed the power for which
the credulous gave her credithaving deceived
others so long, that she ultimately deceived herself
enjoyed his surprise, feeling it a compliment to
her art, and received character, as one of the terrible
priestesses of Fetish.
Hugh! Coromantee, she said, if you start
dat away, at Oula, wat tinky you do, you see
Fetish
?
What you want dis time? she inquired,
abruptly
.
What for you no wid you massa Lafitte?
Him sail way af'er de prisoners dat get way
las night, and leave Cudjoe sleep in de cave like a
col' dead nigger, and know noffin.
Gi me! well what for you come 'sturb Oula
you no 'fraid she obi you?
Oh Gar Armighty! good Oula, nigger! dont
put de finger on me. Cudjoe come for Obi,
exclaimed
the slave in alarm.
Obi can do nottin without music ob de gold,
she said, mechanically extending her hand.
Cudjoe know dat true well 'nuff, he replied,
taking several coins of copper, silver, and gold,
from the profound depth of his pocket, in which
almost
every article of small size missing in the
vessel
in which he sailed, always found a snug berth.
Giving her the money, which she counted with
an air somewhat less satisfied than that she wore
when telling the weightier coin of the Spaniard,
she invited him into her hut.
Casting his eyes around the gloomy apartment
with awe, he at last rested his gaze upon the white
cock which still reposed upon his roost of human
bones. Gradually, as he looked, and became more
familiar with the gloom of the interior, his eye
dilated
with superstitious fear, and without removing it
from the sacred bird, he sunk first on one knee, then
on the other, the while rapidly repeating some
heathenish
form of adjuration, and then fell prostrate,
with his face to the damp earth.
For a moment, he remained in this attitude of
worship, in which fear predominated over devotion,
when the voice of Oula aroused him.
Dat goodObeah like dat. Now what you
want Cudjoe? be quick wid your word, coz I hab
much bus'ness to do jus dis time.
Cudjoe want revenge ob hell! replied the slave
rising to his knees, his features at once changing
to a fiendish expression, in faithful keeping with his
wish.
Bon Gui! Who harm you now, Coromantee?
she inquired in a tone of sympathy, gratified at
meeting a spirit and feelings kindred with her own.
Debble! Who? he said fiercely, more dan
de fingers on dese two han'!
What dare name? she inquired. Obeah mus'
know de name.
Here the slave, who never forgave an insult
elicited
by his personal deformities, recapitulated the
injuries he imagined he had suffered from this cause,
while the old beldam gave a willing ear, forgetting
in her participation of his feelings, her first visiter,
who impatiently awaited the termination of this
interview
.
And as he heard his own name in the
catalogue
of vengeance repeated by the slave, he
muttered
within his teeth, that the slave should rue the
hour he sought the Obeah's skill.
Gi me! she exclaimed, as he ended. All
dese you want hab me gib obi! Hugh! what nice
picking for de jonny crows dey make. But dare
mus' be more gold. Hough! hoh! hoh! she
laughed, or rather croaked. Gah me! what plenty
dead men! Well, you be de good cus'omer, if you
be de Coromantee nigger!
Vol. II.16
Will de obi be set for dem all? he impatiently
inquired.
Dare mus' be two tree tings done fus; you mus'
take de fetish in de fus place, she said, going to
her box and taking from it an ebony idol carved into
many grotesque variations of the human form.
Here is de great Fetish, she continued; now
put you right han' on de head ob dis white bird,
while I hol' dis fetish to you lips. Dare, she
continued
,
as he tremblingly assumed the required
position
and manner, dare, now swear you b'leve
wat I speak
Fetish he be blackdebil he be white,
Sun he make for nigger,for buckra is mak de night.
Now kiss de fetish, she said, as he repeated after
her the form of an Obeah oath, administered only to
those of her own race and religion. One or two
other similar ceremonies were performed, when
she suddenly exclaimed, Dare I hab ithow de
debble, no tink sooner?
Coromantee, she said abruptlydare is one
ting more mus' be done, or Fetish do noffin' and
Obeah no be good.
The slave looked at her inquiringly, and she
continued
:
Dare mus' be de blood from de heart ob a
white breas' lady, to dip de wing ob de white bird
in. You mus' get de lady; she mus' be young,
hab black eye, an' nebber hab de husban'. Do dis,
an' you sall hab you wish.
The slave's countenance fell, as he heard the
announcement
suggested by her practised subtlety.
Dare was a white lady, he replied, in de
schooner, but she goneoh gar! it take debble time
to do dis; he said with an air of disappointment.
Mus' de great Fetish hab one? he inquired
anxiously
.
He mus', he do noffin widout; she replied
determinedly
.
The slave stood lamenting the loss of his
anticipated
revenge, when she inquired if he saw the
frigate
that dropped her anchor half an hour before, off
the pass. On his replying in the affirmative, she
said, dare is a lady board dat ship, may serve de
purpose. As de ship was swung roun', I see her in
de window on de stern.
The eyes of the slave lighted up at this
intelligence
.
Wat frigate is dat Oula?
I don' know, she replied; fearing if the slave
knew the lady to be the Castillian his master had
protected, he would decline the enterprise upon
which she was about sending him.
No matter 'bout de ship, she replied, de lady
dare. De stern lie close to de rocks; you can go
out to de end ob de passage, and den swim under
de sternclimb up de rudder, or some way into de
window an' take her off before dey can catch you
in de dark. You hear disnow wat you say?
The slave, without replying, darted through the
door, and before the old woman could gain the
outside
,
to warn him to be cautious, his retreating form,
as he ran rapidly along the rocky ridge in the
direction
of the frigate, was lost to her eye.
CHAPTER II.
The dissimulation and cunning of those practising Obeah, is
incredible
.
The Africans have an opinion that insanity and supernatural
inspiration are combined, and commonly, knaves and lunatics are the
persons who play the parts of sorcerors or sorceresses. Instances are
on record where they have fallen victims to the revenge of votaries,
when their Obeah failed in its effects, or did injury.
The West Indies
.
THE SLAVE AND HIS CAPTIVEHIS REVENGEPURSUIT OF THE
STRANGE SAIL.
After
the count left the frigate on his expedition
against the rendezvous of the pirates, the fair girl,
whose star of happiness seemed now in the
ascendant
,
and about to shine propitiously upon her
future
life, re-assumed her reclining attitude by the
cabin window, which overlooked the sea in the
direction of her native land. For a few moments,
her thoughts were engaged upon her approaching
bridal; but gradually, they assumed the garb of
memory, and winging, like a wearied bird, over the
evening sea, reposed in the home of her childhood.
As she still gazed vacantly upon the fading
horizon
,
she was conscious that a dark object broke its
even line. It grew larger, and approached the
frigate
rapidly before she was called from her
half-conscious
abstraction by a change in its appearance;
when, fixing her look more keenly in the direction,
she saw it was a schooner just rounding to about a
mile beyond the frigate. Apparently, it had not as
yet, been observed from the deck, as all eyes were
turned to the shore, following the boats which had
just gained the foot of the cliff.
At the sight of the vessel, so nearly resembling
the one whose prisoner she had been, her capture
and its trying scenes came vividly before her mind,
and she turned her face from an object, connected
with such disagreeable associations. The
approaching
ceremony again agitated her bosom; and as her
eye rested upon a mirror in the opposite pannel, she
parted with care her dark hair from her forehead,
arranged in more graceful folds her mantilla, and all
the woman beamed in her fine eyes as they met
the reflection of her lovely countenance and
symmetrically
moulded figure.
How long he stays!he must have been gone
full an hour, she said, unconsciously aloud. The
virgin protect him from harm?
The count will soon return, ma'moiselle, said a
small mulatto boy, who acted as steward of the
state rooms, now that they were occupied by their
fair inmate. She turned as he spoke,
Is there danger, boy?
None, please you ma'moisellethe men on
deck, say the rovers have left their rock, and that
there will be no fighting.
Sacra diable! he suddenly shrieked, pointing
to the state-room window, at which appeared the
head of the slave. Constanza also turned, but only
to be grasped in his frightful arms. At first
surprised
,
and too much paralized with fear to scream,
Cudjoe prevented her from giving the alarm by
winding her mantilla about her mouth, and hastily
conveyed her through the window or port hole, from
which the gun, usually stationed there, had been
removed. Rapidly letting himself, with his
burden
,
down by the projections of the rudder, he
dropped
with her into the sea, and raising her head
above water with one muscular arm, a few vigorous
16*
strokes with the other bore him within the black
shadow of the rocks behind a projecting point of
which, he disappeared.
Re-entering the hut after the abrupt departure of
the slave, Oula released the Spaniard from his place
of concealment, and informed him of her plan to
place the lady in his power.
You are a very devil for happy thoughts, he
said, with animation; but if the revengeful slave
gets her, I may thank you, and not Fetish, for the
prize. Have her this night I must, for I expect my
schooner.
Ha! there is the Juli now, by the holy
twelve! he exclaimed, as his quick eye rested upon
the object which had attracted the attention of
Constanza
.
Getzendanner will be putting a boat in for
me, and yet he must see the frigate unless she lays
too dark in the cliff's shadow. St. Peter, send
fortune
with the slave! Will he bring her to the hut
if he succeeds, think you, Oula? he suddenly and
sharply inquired, as a suspicion of change in the
negro's purpose flashed across his mind.
Bring de lady? she exclaimed in surprize,
he know he finger rot offhe eye fall outand
he hair turn to de live snake wid de fang, if he no
bring herHe no dare keep her way.
Solaced by this assurance, he paced the little
green plat before the cabin, often casting his eyes
in the direction of the frigate. Nearly half an hour
elapsed after the departure of Cudjoe, when the
robes of the maiden borne in the arms of the slave
caught his eye.
Back, back, you spoil de whole, exclaimed
Oula, as the impatient Spaniard darted forward to
seize his prize.
Instead of the maiden's lovely form, he met the
herculean shoulders of the slave, whose long knife
passed directly through his heart. Without a word
or a groan, Martinez fell dead at his feet.
Resigning the maiden to the faithful Juana, who
followed immediately behind, Cudjoe sprung
forward
with a cry of vindictive rage, and before Oula
could comprehend his motives, the reeking blade
passed through her withered bosom.
Take dis hag ob hell! he shouted, as he drew
forth the knife from her breast. You make no
more fool ob Cudjoe, for de curs' Spaniard.
Grande diable! what debble dis? he suddenly
yelled and groaned, as the son of the slain Obeah
leaped upon his neck, when he saw his mother fall,
and grappled his throat tightly with his fingers,
while he fixed his teeth deep into his flesh. The
struggle between them was but for a moment.
Finding it impossible to disengage his fingers, the
slave bent his arm backward, and passed his long
knife up through his body. The thrust was a
skilful
one, and fatal to the boy, who released his
grasp, and fell back in the death struggle to the
ground.
In the meanwhile, Juana had borne Constanza
to the fire, in the hut, and was using every means
to restore circulation to the chilled limbs of the
unconscious
girl.
The interview between the Spaniard and Oula,
had been overheard by Juana, from the rock above
the hut. After the escape of her mistress and the
count, and the departure of Lafitte and his men, in
pursuitwith the exception of Cudjoe, who, in the
hurry and confusion of getting underweigh, was
left behind, and with whom she was accustomed
occasionally to indulge in social African gossip on
ship-boardshe had been left quite alone. This
solitude and anxiety on account of her mistress, led
her, at the approach of evening, to pay a visit to the
old sybil, for the purpose of consulting her
respecting
her safety.
After the hasty departure of the slave, to obey
the commands of Oula, she descended the rock
overhanging
the hut, and rapidly following him, she
awaited his return, and then communicated to him
the information relative to the Spaniard and the lady.
Indignant at this treachery towards one whom he
regarded as his master's lady, and enraged that
the old woman should thus use him as the tool for
the Spaniard, he drew his knife, bounded forward,
and met Martinez with the fatal result we have just
mentioned.
When the slave entered the hut, after his bloody
revenge was completed, Juana informed him of the
expedition against the cave which she had seen
moving from its destination towards the rock above
the hut.
Constanza soon recovering, Juana led her forth
into the air, and told her that she would go round
with her to the cave, where the boats of her lover
then were, at the same time warning Cudjoe to
endeavour
to get on board the schooner, and escape
from the French seamen. The slave looked
seaward
,
where she could just be discovered lying to,
and in a few seconds afterward, he saw a boat
pulling
close to the shore. Supposing, from the
language
of the Spaniard, that it was sent for him, and
that the schooner was the Juli, he bid Juana
conduct
Constanza to the barges of the frigate, and
hastily
leaving them, he approached the boat, which
now touched the beach.
Boat ahoy! he hailed, as he came near.
Ha, Cudjoe! that's your sweet voice, in a
thousand
!
replied one, in answer to his hailhow
came you here?
The captain sail and leab me sleep in de cabe,
he replied; I must go to Barrita in de Juli.
You are right welcome, my beauty; but where's
Martinez?
He was jus' killed by de Frenchman, in shore.
I jus' 'scape wid my neck.
Frenchman? how? exclaimed the man, in
surprise
.
What do you mean?
No see dat frigate, dar? I tought you bol' nuff
to com' in right under her guns. See her! dere
she lay. You can hardly tell her masts from de
trees.
The man looked for a moment steadily, and then
exclaimedBy the joly St. Peter, you say truly.
Spring into the boat, Cudjoe. Shove off, men
shove off, and give way like devils to your oars.
We must be out of this, or we shall have hard
quarters
between Monsieur's decks.
In a few moments, they stood on the deck of
the schooner, which immediately filled and stood
seaward.Her subsequent career is already known
to the reader.
Before Juana gained the cave, with her charge,
to effect which she had first to ascend the cliff, and
then descend by a perilous foot-way, to the platform
before it, the object of the count had been effected.
The gun had been pitched over into the basin, and
the arms and stores either destroyed or carried off.
When he gained the deck of his frigate, he was
met by the first lieutenant, who reported a sail in
the offing. She has been lying to some time,
sir, he added.
Ha, I see her! she is now standing out, said
the count, as he took his glass from his eye.
Shall we get under way, sir? inquired the
lieutenant
.
Not yet, Monsieur, replied he smiling. We
have a festival below, which will require the
presence
of my officers; and the men must make merry
to-night; and winged with love, he hastened to meet
Constanza. Entering the state-room, he
encountered
the prostrate form of the mulatto boy, who
was lying insensible by the door.
Glancing his eyes hastily around the apartment,
whilst his heart palpitated with a sudden foreboding
of evil, the loved form he sought, no where me this
eager gaze. Alarmed, he called her name, and
searched every recess of that and the adjoining state
rooms.
My God! where can she be? he exclaimed,
now highly excited; Can she have fallen into the
water from this port? yet, it cannot beConstanza!
my betrothed, my beloved! speak to me, if you are
near! he cried, hoping, yet with trembling, that she
might still be concealedplayfully hiding from him
to try, as maidens will do, her lover's tenderness.
Yet if here, what means this? he added raising
the boy; There is life herehe has faintedspeak
Antoine, open your eyes and look at me!
The boy still remained insensible; but the count
by applying restoratives hastily taken from the
toilet
of the maiden, soon restored his suspended
faculties
.
To his eager questions the boy told in reply
of the hideous visage that appeared at the port-hole,
enlarging upon his black face and white tusks.
Was it a man or a wild beast? he interrogated.
Oh! Monsieur, one man-devilwith such long
arms, and long white tusks like a boar! he replied,
clinging to the person of the officer, and looking
fearfully around, as if expecting the appalling
apparition
to start momentarily upon his sight.
The brow of the lover changed to the hue of
death; the blood left his lips, and faintly
articulating
Lafitte's slave! he reeled, and would have
fallen to the floor, had not the boy caught him.
Recovering
himself by a vigorous intellectual and
physical
effort, he stood for an instant in thought, as if
resolving upon some mode of action.
All at once he spoke, in a voice hollow and
deep with emotion, and awful with gathering
passion
.
Lafittethou seared and branded outlaw
cursed
of God and loathed of menfit compeer of hell's
dark spiritsblaster of human happinessdestroyer
of innocence! Guilty thyself, thou wouldst make
all like thee! Scorner of purity, thou wouldst
unmake, and make it guilt. Like Satan, thou
sowest tares of sorrow among the seeds of peace
thou seekest good to make it evil!Renegade
of mankind!Thou art a blot among thy race,
the living presence of that moral pestilence which
men and Holy Writ term
sin!
Oh, that my
words were daggers, and each one pierced thy
heart! then would I talk on, till the last trumpet
called thee from thy restless shroud to face me.
But, Lafitte! Lafitte! he added, in a voice that
rung like a battle cry, I will first face thee on
earth! As true as there is one living God, I will be
revenged on thee for this foul and grievous wrong!
Ha! why do I stand here, idly wasting words?
he is not far off. I may pursue and take him within
the hourand he added, bounding to the deck,
perhaps Constanza, ere it betoo late.
His voice, as he issued his orders to get at once
under weigh, rung with an energy and sternness
the startled officers and seamen never knew before.
Having rapidly communicated the disappearance of
Constanza, he learned from the officer of the watch
that some of the men who had joined the shore
expedition
,
on returning, said they had seen a sail in
the offing. But after having swept the whole
horizon
with my glass, he continued, and
discerning
nothing, I concluded they must have been
deceived
,
and therefore, did not report it. Now, I
think they were right.
That vessel was Lafitte's and Constanza is on
board of her, exclaimed the count. We must
pursue, and if there is strength in wind or speed in
ships, overtake and capture her this night. Call the
men who saw her.
The seamen being interrogated, indicated by the
compass the direction the sail bore from the frigate,
when they discovered it. Towards this point,
leaving
her anchor behind, the ship, in less than three
minutes after the count had ascended to the deck,
began to move with great velocity, her tall masts
bending gracefully to one side, as if they would
kiss the leaping waves, the water surging before her
swelling bows, and gurgling with hoarse but lively
music around her rudder.
All that night, a night of intense agony to the
count, a bright watch was kept on every quarter;
yet the morning broke without discovering the
object
of their pursuit. The horizon was unbroken
even by a cloud; a calm had fallen upon the
sea, and not a wave curled to the zephyrs, which
from time to time danced over its polished surface,
scarcely dimpling it.
For several days, within sight of the distant
island
,
the frigate lay becalmed, during which period,
the lover, unable to contend with the fever of his
burning thoughts, became delirious. The winds
rose and again died away! Storms ploughed the
face of the deep, and calms reigned upon the sea!
Yet he was unconscious of any change; day and
night he raved, and called on the name of his
betrothed
.
During this period the frigate cruised
along the coast, the officer in command not wishing
to take any step until he knew the mind of the
count.
On the twelfth day after the disappearance of
Constanza, he was so far recovered as to ascend to
the deck. His brow was pale, and his eye piercing
with an unwonted expression.
Twelve days Montvilleso long? There is no
hopebut there is revenge! and his eyes flashed
as his voice swelled with emotion and passion. Put
about for Barritaria! he added quickly, rising and
walking the deck with much agitation. My only
passion, my only purpose now shall be to meet that
manthe bane of my happiness! Destiny has bid
him cross my path, and destiny shall bid him die by
my hand.
On the third morning, they arrived at the island
of Barritariaprepared to destroy that strong hold
of the pirates, when, instead of a formidable fleet
a strong fortress and extensive campthey found
desolation. The day before, the buccaneers had
been dispersed, their vessels captured, and their
fort dismantled. Here and there wandered a
straggler
,
ragged and woundedno boats were visible,
and the smoke of two or three vessels, and the
ruined camp of the pirates, told how recently and
completely the revenge of the count had been
anticipated
.
From a wounded pirate, whom they took prisoner,
he learned that Lafitte had been recently at
Barritaria
,
and had gone to New Orleans to join the
American
forces in the defence of that city.
Piloted by one of his men who was acquainted
with the inlets and bayous, communicating with
the Mississippi, he gave orders to his first
lieutenant
to await his return, and proceeded at once up
to the city. On his approach the next morning, the
thunder of artillery filled his ears, and burning with
revenge, he urged his oarsmen to their strength.
Entering the Mississippi about two leagues
below
the city, on the morning of the eighth of
January
,
by a different route from that taken on a former
occasion by Lafitte, he crossed to the opposite shore,
from which came the roar of cannon, the crash of
musketry, and shouts of combatants, while a dense
Vol. II.17
cloud of smoke enveloped the plain to the extent of
half a mile along the river.
There, face to face, steel to steel, will I meet
him I seek, ordeath, he exclaimed.
Learning from a fisherman the disposition of the
two armies, and the point defended by the outlaw,
he crossed the river, and after pulling up against
the current for a third of a mile, he landed amidst
a shower of balls and joined in the battle.
After he had, as he thought, achieved his revenge,
in the fall of Lafitte, whose personal combat with him
has already been detailed, the count, himself severely
wounded, returned to his boat. In a few minutes
he grew faint from loss of blood, and was landed
by his crew at a negro's hut on the banks of the
river. Here he remained several days, confined to
a wretched couch, until his wound enabled him to
proceed.
As he was about to order his boatmen to prepare
for their departure, he heard the name of Lafitte
mentioned by the hospitable slave who was his host,
in conversation with some one outside of the hut.
What of him? he exclaimed.
Dere him schooner, massagwine down de
ribber!
What, that light-rigged vessel? he said,
pointing
to a small, but beautiful armed schooner. No
nohe is slain.
He was wounded in the battle of the eighth,
with two of his lieutenants, Sebastiano and a
Dutchman
,
Getzendanner, I believe they call him, said
a fisherman, coming forward; but Lafitte is now
well, and has purchased that vessel, formerly his
own, and is goingthey say, now he has received
his pardonto spend his days in the West Indies,
or in France.
Hasay you, Monsieur!Was it not him then I
met on the field? Yet it must have beenknow
you certainly that he sails away in that schooner?
he inquired, eagerly of the man, turning to look as
he spoke, at the vessel which, with swift and
graceful
motion, with all sail set, moved down the river,
rapidly disappearing in the distance.
I saw him standing upon the deck as she
passed
,
replied the fisherman, decidedly.
Then shall he not escape me, cried the count;
and calling to his crew, he hastened to his boat, and
in a few minutes was on the way to his frigate,
resolved
,
if possible, to intercept the schooner at the
Balize.
The following day he reached his ship, and
immediately
,
with his heart steeled to the consumma
tion of his revenge, got under-weigh for the mouth
of the Mississippi.
CHAPTER III.
The consequences of crime are not confined to the guilty
individual
.
Besides the public wrong, they are felt in a greater or less
degree
by his friends. Parents suffer more from the crimes of men than
others. It ought to be the severest mental punishment, for a guilty
man, if not wholly depraved, to witness a wife's or a parent's
wretchedness
,
produced by his own acts.
Letters on Political Economy
.
A RAMBLESURPRISEAT SEACONVERSATIONLAFON.
We
will leave the count in pursuit of Lafitte,
now no longer
the outlaw
. He had recovered
his favourite vessel, The Gertrude, which had
been captured with the rest of the fleet; and with
a select crew, drawn from his former adherents,
set sail a few days after we left him in the convent,
for his rendezvous in the Gulf of Gonsaves, for the
purpose of carrying into effect the resolutions he
there made. To Constanzawhom we left at this
rendezvous, with the faithful Juana on her way to
the boats of her lover's frigatewe will now turn
the attention of our readers.
When the desolate and unhappy girl found the
frigate's boats had left the rock, her heart sunk
within
her, and when the ship, shortly after, stood
seaward
,
under full sail, she at once surrendered
herself
to hopeless wretchedness. Three weeks she
remained in the grotto, with a kind slave, her only
companion, from whom she received every
attention
that circumstances permitted.
Her mind was daily tortured with fears of the
approach of some of the pirate's squadron, or of
Lafitte himself, whom, if again thrown into his
power, she feared above all. As yet she was
ignorant
of the scenes he had passed through
the great change in his destinythe honourable
career he had commenced, and his pardon by
the administrator of the laws he had so long
violated
.
If she had known all this, and known that
love for her, united with a noble patriotism,
influenced
him to take these steps, how different would
have been her feelings?With what other
emotions
than of fear, would she have anticipated his
approach?
The moon had shone tremblingly in the west,
like the fragment of a broken ring, had displayed
a broad and shining shield, and had nearly faded
again into the pale eastern skies, and yet Constanza
remained an inmate of the grotto.
Late in the afternoon, three days after we took
leave of the count, on his way to intercept the
Gertrude
at the Balize, Constanza ascended the
cliff, above the terrace, to survey, as she had done
each long day of her imprisonment, the
extensive
horizon spread out before her to the south and
west, hoping to discover the white sails of the
frigate
,
which contained all that bound her to
existence
.
As night gathered over the sea, she descended
the cliff, and walked towards the point where stood
the hut of the deceased Obeah. The waves
kissed
her feet as she walked along the sandy shore.
The stars, heralded by the evening planet, one
by one began to appear, sprinkling a faint light
upon her brow; the night wind played wantonly
17*
with her hair; but unmindful of every
surrounding
object, she walked thoughtfully forward,
unheeding
her footsteps, which carried her
unconsciously
to the extreme point of the rocky cape. Here
seating herself upon a rock, she leaned her head
upon her hand, and, gazing upon the sea, while
thoughts of her lover and her desolate and
unprotected
situation, filled her mind, insensibly fell
asleep.
About midnight, a hand laid upon her forehead,
awoke her. Instinctively comprehending her
situation
,
she recollected where she was. A tall figure
stood by her side. With a scream of terror she
sprung to her feet, and would have fled; but he
detained her by her robes.
Stay, Constanza, seora! staytell me why
you are here?
Is it Lafittethe outlaw? she exclaimed,
breathless with alarm.
It is lady; but no more Lafitte the
outlaw
.
Oh seor, have pity, and do not use the power
you have, she cried with nervous emotion. I am
wretched, miserable indeed.
Lady, he replied, moved by her pathetic
appeal
,
Lady, there shall no danger come nigh
you while I can protect you. How you came once
more in my power, or here, is to me a mystery. I
thought you happy as the bride of
Nooh! no. He returned here after we
gained
his frigate, and your slave stole on board into
the port, and siezing me, prevented me from giving
the alarm, and brought me on shore to the hut of an
old negress. The frigate, on my being missed,
stood out to sea, probably after a schooner, which
they thought was yours, and on board of which
they no doubt thought I was, or they would have
searched the shore and cavern. Three weeks have
I been here with none but Juana. Even your
presence
seor, is a relief to me.
The chief listened with surprise to this rapid
account
of her capture.
Ha! he exclaimed, the conduct of the count
on the field of battle, flashing upon his mind. I
see it all. `Revenge,' was his war-cryrevenge
for his betrothed. He must have suspected my
agency in this, and pursued me to avenge his
wrongs. Thank God! I am herein guiltless. But
my slave! know you whose tool he was, or what
his purpose, seora? he inquired quickly.
I do, seor, she replied, and then related to
him the deception practised upon Cudjoe, of which
Juana had informed her, and his instant revenge.
I knew that Martinez to be a second Hebrto
Velanquez in villainy; he said. Lady, I
congratulate
youHeaven surely watches over you
for good! My slave's vengeance was like himself.
Strange, when he arrived in the Juli at Barritaria,
a day or two after, he told me not of all this. But
perhaps he feared for his head.
At this moment a voice startled the maiden, and
timid as the hunted fawn from the excitement she
had gone through, she raised a foot to fly.
Stay lady, it is but my boatmen on the other
side of this rock. Passing up the channel to the
grotto in the schooner, continued Lafitte, I saw
your white robes even in this faint star-light, as you
were sleeping on the rocks. I immediately let
down my boat, and ordering the schooner to keep
on into the basin, I landed to ascertain who it was,
not dreamingalthough my heart should have told
mehe added tenderly, that it was you.
Now seora, he said, addressing her earnestly,
will you so far place confidence in me as
voluntarily
to put yourself under my protection? I need
not assure you it shall be a most honourable one.
Let me take you, and this very hour I will sail to
your friendsnay, to the Count D'Oyley himself.
If you desire it, I will seek him in every port in the
Mexican seas. Confide in me lady, and allow me
to show you the strength of my love for you, while
I manifest its disinterestedness.
In less than half an hour, Constanza and Juana,
whom she had left in the cave during her absence,
were once more occupants of the gorgeously
furnished
state-room on board the Gertrude. Before
morning, Lafitte having also completed the business
for which he visited his rendezvous, was many
leagues from the grotto, his swift winged vessel
almost
flying over the waves before a brisk wind,
in the direction of Havana, where he expected to
hear of, or fall in with, the French frigate Le
Sultan
.
From the moment his lovely passenger had
entered
the cabin he had not seen or spoken with her.
Again her young protector Thodore became her
page, and Juana her faithful attendant.
From Thodore she learned, with surprise and
pleasure the scenes through which his benefactor
had passed since she last met him. With
prayerful
gratitude she listened to the strange history of
the last few weeks he had passed at Barritaria and
in the besieged city, of his exploits upon the
battlefield
,
his pardon by the executive, and his resolution
to devote his life for the good of his fellow men, by
retiring to the monastery of heroic and benevolent
monks, on the summit of Mont St. Bernard.
May the virgin and her son bless and prosper
him in his purposes! she said, raising her eyes with
devotional gratitude to heaven, while all the
woman
beamed in them, as she reflected how far she
had contributed to this change. And she sighed,
that she could not requite love so noble and pure
as his.
With perfect confidence in the sincerity of her
captor, she now became more composed, and a ray
of joy illumined her heart, when she looked forward
to the meeting with her betrothed lover.
And where will you go my Thodorewhen
your friend becomes a recluse?
Lady, I shall never leave him, where he goes, I
go! He is my only friend on earth. There is none
besides to care for the buccaneer boy, he added,
with a melancholy air.
NaynayThodore. The count D'Oyly, and
myselfesteem, and feel a deep interest in you.
Will you not be my brother, Thodore? Our home
shall be yours, we will supply your present
benefactor
.
The gloom and solitude of a monastery's
walls will not suit your young spirit.
Ladyurge me notI will never leave him,
he said firmly, while his heart overflowed with
thankfulness for the kind and affectionate interest
she manifested in his welfare.
At that moment an aged man, bent with the
weight of years, with a majestic face, although
deeply lined with the furrows of time, came to the
state-room door, and in a feeble voice, called to the
youth.
Who is that old man, Thodore? she inquired
with interest, while her eyes filled with tears as she
thought of her own venerable father. It is old
Lafon, Seora. He was taken prisoner a few weeks
since by one of our cruisers, and having been at
times insane, he was compelled by the officer
Martinez
,
I thinkwho captured him, to perform such
menial duties as were suitable to his age.
Was not this unfeeling, Thodore? Where was
your chief?
It was, lady. On account of his numerous
duties
,
captain Lafitte, who permitted no cruelties of
that kind, was ignorant of this degradationfor,
miserable
as he now is, he appears to have seen
happier
and brighter daysbut when he heard of it, he
released him from his duties. We stopped at
Barritaria
after we left the Balize to take on board some
treasure concealed there, and found the old man on
the shore, nearly famished and torpid with exposure
to the cold and rain.
We took him on board, intending to leave him
in Havana, where he has friends.
Is he insane, did you say, Thodore? she
inquired
.
He has beenbut I think is not now.
Poor man; he is, no doubt, the victim of some
great affliction, she said, with feeling. Do you
know any thing of his past history?
I do not, Seora. He is studiously silent upon
that subject.
Is he now a menial? she said, looking with
sympathy upon the aged man, who still stood with
one hand upon the lock of the door, and his body
half-protruded into the room; in which position he
had remained during their low-toned conversation,
waiting for Thodore.
No, Seora. He is now passenger in the
schooner
,
and by kindness and attention to him, the
captain
seeks to atone for the rigorous treatment he
has heretofore received. He also feels a strange
and unaccountable interest in him.
Go, Thodore; keep him not in waitinghe
speaks again!
The youth left the apartment, to ascertain his
wishes, which were, to communicate, through him,
to Lafitte some instructions relating to his landing
at Havana; and then ascended to the deck, to
ascertain
the rate of sailing and position of the vessel,
which, bowling before a favourable breeze, was
with within less than two day's sail of their port of
destination.
CHAPTER IV.
St. Julien
. If sincere penitence be atonement for an ill-spent
life, then has my guilty sire gone up to heaven.
Martin
. The Holy Fathers preach another doctrine.
St. Julien
. But which is which they can no two agree.
Martin
. 'Twere better then methinks, sir, to live healthy and
honest
lives, and so through the blood of the Holy Cross, we'll have the
best assurance.
AN AMERICAN SLOOP OF WARA CHASEFIGHT OFF THE MORO
CASTLECLOSING SCENECONCLUSION.
My
eye, Bill, but that's a rare tit-bit in the
offing
,
exclaimed a sailor straddled athwart the
mainyard
of an American sloop of war, anchored near the
entrance of the harbour, ostensibly securing a
gasket
,
but in reality roving his one eye over the
harbour
of Havanaits lofty castellated Moroits
walls, towers, and cathedral domesits fleet of
shippingand its verdant scenery, luxuriant and
green even in the second month of winter.
That she is! returned his shipmate, further in
on the same yard, at the same time cocking his
larboard
eye to windward, hitching up his loose
trowsers
,
and thrusting into his cheek a generous quid
tobacco, dropped from the top-gallant-yard by a
brother tar. That she is, Sam; and she moves
in stays, like a Spanish girl in a jig, and that's as
fine as a fairy, to my fancy.
Lay to, there, my hearty. Blast my eyes, if I
have'nt seen the broadside of that craft before now.
If it's not a clipper we chased when I was in the
schooner last month, cruising off St. Domingo, you
may say, `stop grog'.
What! one o' your bloody pirates? inquired
Sam, with an oath.
Aye! and she run in shore, and lay along side
of a high rock, up which they mounted like so
many
wild monkeys. We followed as fastbut they
beat us off, and sent to the bottom of the sea,
twenty
as brave fellows as ever handled cutlass.
What is this, observed languidly one of the
lieutenants on deck, interrupting a most luxurious
yawn; that those fellows can feel an interest in,
this infernal hot weather? Take that glass, will
you Mr. Edwards, and make us wise in the
matter
.
The young midshipman rose indolently from an
ensign on which he had ensconced himself to
leeward
of the mizen mast, to avoid the extreme heat,
even on that winter day; for winter holds no
empire
through all that lovely clime, and after two or
three unsuccessful attempts, at last brought the
instrument
handed him by the officer, into
conjunction
with his visual organ. He then gazed a
moment
seaward, and his face, before expressionless,
now beamed with pleasure.
By all that's lovely, that craft carries a pretty
foot. She glides over the water like a swan; and
yet there's hardly breeze enough to fan a lady's
cheek. Look at her, sir.
The officer took the glass, and slightly raising
himself, so that he could see over the quarter, the
next moment convinced those around him, that his
features had not lost all their flexibility, and that his
muscles were not really dissolved by the heat, by
exclaiming still more eagerly than the
midshipman
,
Vol. II.18
Beautiful! admirable!
Can you make out her colours? inquired one
lying upon the deck, under the awning, without
raising his head, or moving from his indolent
attitude
.
She carries the stars and stripes; yet she
cannot
be an American. There is not a boat in the
navy to be compared to this craft for beauty and
velocity.
She is not an armed vessel?
Evidently; although she shows gun nor port.
She looks too saucy for a quakeress; her whole
bearing is warlike; and there is a frigate half a mile
to windward of her, I believe, in chase.
By this time, the officers, yielding to curiosity,
abandoned, though reluctantly, their various
comfortable
positions, and gathered themselves up, to
take a view of a vessel, that had induced even their
ease-loving first lieutenant to throw off his
lethargy
.
The object of general interesta beautiful
taunt-rigged
rakish schooner now advanced, steadily
towards
the entrance of the harbour. The air was
scarcely in motion, yet the little vessel glided over
the water with the ease and rapidity of a bird on
the wing.
By Heaven! that craft has been in mischief!
exclaimed an officer, or that frigate would not
spread such a cloud of studden-sails in chase.
He is no doubt a pirate, said Edwards. Shall
we give him a gun for running under our flag.
No, no! we will remain neutral. As true as
that schooner has lighter heels than any craft that
ever sailed the sea, she will escape her pursuer!
exclaimed the lieutenant with animation.
Unless taken between wind and water; added
another officer. See that!
As he spoke a flame flashed from the bows of the
frigate, and a shot, followed by the report of a heavy
gun, recochetted over the waves, and carried away
the bowsprit of the schooner, which was about half
a mile from the frigate.
My God! we shall be blown out of the water
by that hasty count! exclaimed Lafitte, as the
shot struck his vesselfor on board the Gertrude
we now take our readersHoist that white flag
at the peak, he shouted.
The order was obeyed; and still the frigate bore
down upon them, and a second shot shivered her
foremast, killed several of the crew including his
mate Ricardo, and mortally wounding his favorite
slave Cudjoe.
The schooner was now wholly unmanageable,
and defeated in his exertions to get into the harbor,
Lafitte put her before the wind, which was now
increasing
,
and run her ashore, about a mile to the
eastward of the Moro.
The frigate continued in chase until the water
became too shallow for her draught, when she lay
to and put off two of her boats filled with men, the
smallest of which was commanded by the count in
person.
Lafitte, although determined not to fight unless
compelled to do so in self-defence, ordered his men
to their guns. Every officer was at his post. The
carronades were double shotted, and hand grenades,
boarding-pikes and cutlasses, strewed the deck.
He himself, was armed with a cutlass and brace of
pistols, and a shade of melancholly was cast over
his features, which, or the thoughts occasioning
it, he sought to dispel by giving a succession of
rapid
and energetic orders to his men.
The count, who learned from the prisoner he had
taken at Barritaria, that this was Lafitte's vessel,
which he had fallen in with the day before, after
missing him at the Balizestood in the stern of his
boat which swiftly approached the grounded
schooner
.
His face was pale and rigid with settled
passion
.
He grasped the hilt of his cutlass nervously,
and his eye glanced impatiently over the rapidly
lessening distance between him and his revenge.
He saw his rival standing calmly upon the
quarter-deck
,
surveying his approach with seeming
indifference
.
This added fuel to his rage, and he cheered
his oars-men on with almost frenzied energy.
Count D'Oyley said Lafitte aloud as the boat
came near the schooner; she whom you seek is
safe, and in honor.
Thou liest! slave! villain! shouted the count,
and at that moment, as the boat struck the side of
the schooner, he leaped, sword in hand, on to her
deck, followed by a score of his men.
Now, or we shall be massacred, fire! cried
Lafitte, in a voice that rung above the shouts of the
boarders, at the same time parrying a blow aimed at
his breast by the count; and the light vessel recoiled
shuddering in every joint, from the discharge of her
whole broadside.
The iron shower was fatally hurled. The larger
boat, which was within a few fathoms of the
schooner
,
was instantly sunk, and fifty men were left
struggling
in the waves. The barge along side, shared
the same fate before half its crew had gained the
deck of the vessel.
A fierce and sanguinary contest now took place.
In vain Lafitte called to the count to desistthat
Constanza was on board and in safety.
Liar in thy throat! villain! with more rapid
and energetic blows of his cutlass, was alone the
reply he received from his infuriated antagonist.
Lafitte now fought like a tiger at bay upon the
quarter-deck of his schooner, his followers
encircling
him, each hand to hand and steel to steel with
a boarder.
Two nobler looking men than the distinguished
combatants, have seldom trode the battle deck of a
ship of war. In courage, skill, and physical
energies
,
they seemed nearly equal, although the count
was of slighter make, and possessed greater
delicacy
of features. Cutlass rung against cutlass, and
the loud clangor of their weapons was heard far
above the din and uproar of battle.
The combatants on both sides, as if actuated by
one impulse, simultaneously suspended the fight to
gaze upon their chief, as if victory depended alone
upon the issue of this single encounter.
They fought for some moments with nearly equal
success, mutually giving and receiving several slight
wounds, when a blow, intended by Lafitte who
fought in the defensive, to disarm his antagonist,
shivered his steel boarding-cap, which dropped to
the deck, while a profusion of rich auburn hair fell
down from his head, clustered with almost feminine
luxuriance around his neck. At the same instant,
the sword of the count passed through the breast of
his antagonist.
A wild exclamation, not of pain, but of surprise
and horror escaped from Lafitte, and springing
backward, he stood staring with dilated nostrils, a
heaving breast, from which a stream of blood
flowed
to the deck, and eyes almost starting from their
sockets, upon his foeman.
Art thou of this world? speak! he cried in
accents of terror, while his form seemed agitated
with super-human emotion.
The count remained in an attitude of defence,
displaying by the derangement of his hair, a scar
18*
in the shape of a crescent over his brow, and
transfixed
with astonishment, gazing upon his foe, who
moved not a muscle, or betraying any sign of life,
except in the deep sepulchral tones, with which
he conjured him `
to speak!
'
The count slightly changing his position, an
exclamation
of joy escaped the venerable Lafon, and
tottering forward, he fell into his outstretched arms.
Henri, my sonmy only son!
My father! and they were clasped in each
other's arms.
Their close embrace was interrupted by a deep
groan and the heavy fall of Lafitte to the deck.
Henri! It is indeed
my brother
! exclaimed
the wounded man, raising his headforforgive
me, Henri, before I die! and he fell back again to
the deck.
At the sound of his name, the count started,
gazed
earnestly upon his pale features for an instant,
and all the brother yearned in his bosom.
With a heart bursting with the intensity of his
feelings, he silently kneeled beside his brother.
Achille!
Henri!
They could utter no more, but wept together in
a silent embrace; the count laying his head upon
his brother's bosom, whose arms encircled him with
fraternal love, while the aged parent kneeling
beside
them, with his uplifted hands, blessed them.
Suddenly a loud scream pierced their earsand
starting up, the count beheld Constanza making her
way with a wild air towards him, followed by
Theodore
,
who had, till now, detained her in the
state-room
,
lest in her excitement of mind, she should
mingle
among the combatants. The voice of her lover
reached her ears in the silence that followed the
discovery of the brothers, and she flew to the deck.
Oh, my Alphonze! my only love! we will
part no more! she exclaimed, throwing herself
into his arms.
The count affectionately embraced her; but his
face betrayed the whilst, unusual emotion, and his
eye sought his brother's.
Take her! fold her in your arms, Henri! she
is yourspure as an angel! he replied,
comprehending
the meaning of his glance. Here,
Constanza
,
let me take your handyours, Henriand
he joined them together:May God bless and
make you truly happy! he continued, while his
voice grew more feeble.
My father! my venerable father! I am ashamed
to look you in the face! forgive your repentant son!
I am dying, father!
The aged man kneeled by his son, and blessed
him! and wept over him! in silence.
My brotherHenri! continued the dying man:
I have wronged you; but I have suffered! Oh!
how deeply! How true, that crime brings its own
punishment! Forgive! forgive me, Henri! Think
not you have slain memine is the blame. I
armed
your hand against my life!
Constanza! forgive! I have loved you in death!
Farewell, he added, after a moment's silence, while
they all kneeled around him. Farewell, my
father
brotherConstanzafarewell!
Thodore!
he said, affectingly taking the hand of the youth
Thodore, my orphan boy, farewell! May God
bless and protect you, my child! Henri! be a
brother to him.
The count pressed his hand in silence.
Now, once moreadieu, forfor ever! May God
forgive!and, with this prayer on his lips, he
expired
in the arms of his father and brother.
CONCLUSION.
One autumn twilight, five years after the peace
was ratified between the two belligerent powers
Europe, and the North United Statesa group
might have been observed by one, sailing up
to the capital of Louisiana, gathered on the
portico
of an elegant villa, situated on the banks of the
Mississippi, a few miles below the city. This
group consisted of six. In a large armed chair, sat
an old gentleman, with a dignified air, and a bland
smile, dancing upon his knee a lovely child, just
completing her third summer, with sparkling black
eyes, and silken hair of the same rich hue, while
an old slave, seated at his feet, was amusing
herself
with the antics of the delighted girl.
Near the steps of the portico, stood a gentleman
of middle age, with a lofty forehead, slightly
disfigured
by a scar, a mild blue eye, and manly
features
,
who was directing the attention of a
beautiful
female, leaning on his arm, to the manuvres
of a small vessel of war then doubling one of the
majestic curves of the river.
The lady, united in her face and person the
dignity
of the matron with the loveliness of the
maiden
.
The sweet face of the cherub upon its
grandsire's
knee, was but the reflection of her image in
miniature!
Leaning against one of the columns of the
portico
,
stood a noble looking and very handsome young
man, in a hunting-dress. A gun rested carelessly
upon one arm, and a majestic dog, venerahle with
age, whom he occasionally addressed as Lon,
stood upon his hind legs, with his fore paws upon
his breast.
Leaving this brief outline of the happiness and
fortunes of those whom we have followed through
their various adventures, we will take leave of the
reader with a few words of explanation.
Henri, on reaching France, fell heir to the title
and estates of the nobleman whose name Alphonze,
the Count D'Oyley, he assumed. Lafon was a
name given to their aged captive, by the buccaneers,
from his resemblance to one of their number, who
bore that name. Gertrude has long since been
translated to a better world. Achille, after exiling
himself from his native land, assumed the name of
Lafitte, by which and no other, he was known to
his adherents, and to the world:
He left a corsair's name to other times,
Link'd with one virtue and a thousand crimes.